Quite tasty! Can't believe I've never come here before. Their Eggs Benedict is very good, as is the St. Mike's Omelet. One complaint is that it's a little pricey - those dishes are $16 and $15 respectively. It's also pretty small, so expect to wait on the weekend. The service is quite cordial, but I wouldn't say is super warm.
Food was delicious, service was mehhh. Sorry! I hate to complain about service, I use to work at a restaurant and I know how crazy it can get, but this place is tiny with plenty of waiters to take care of everyone, maybe the kitchen was short on staff? I don't know but anyway, on to the food! I had their omelet, pretty standard but still delicious. We had their pancakes of the day, apple cinnamon, they were very fluffy and pretty yummy. So the food was good, but sorry, you deserve a 3 star for now for service, just because I know your service could be better!
this review is based on my 2nd try here at St. Michael's Alley.  Long story short, I did not have a great experience the first time around, but decided to give it another try since the average review seems to be strong. This time, the wait was about an hour, so we finally got sat down, the waiter was so oblivious and inattentive.  I asked if the OJ is freshly squeezed, he said no, it's from Wholefoods, I hesitated a little, then asked "is it Odwalla?" he paused a bit and then said "yes".  2 min. later, i see the bartender pouring OJ from a big galon that does not have Odwalla label (some other generic brand) into the glass, and that glass was brought to my table. I gave it a try, it tasted nothing like Odwalla OJ, it was very concentrated, thick and not fresh.  The waiter lied to me!  Furthermore, I asked for blueberry pancakes, he brought me blueberry and banana pancakes, not what I asked for!  Furthermore, he never came to our table even once to ask "how is everything?  do you need a refill on your coffee?" so I never got my coffee mug refilled. It took about 20-25 min. to get our food, and eating took only 10 min.  Food was just a-okay, nothing special or extraordinary.  We left the restaurant feeling jibbed, especially on the time we spent waiting to get seated and then for our food.  Price was also on the high end. I don't understand why this place has such a hype, the service is bad, food is average, price is high, wait time is longer than what this whole experience is worth.
i ordered "fresh Grapefruit juice" and it wasn't freshly squeezed, it was "freshly squeezed" by the... Read more 
omg omg omg!  O M G!!   This place was incredible.  We went for a late breakfast this Sunday.  The cafe was quite crowded, but we were able to sit at a sidewalk table and sip mimosas in the sunshine while we were waiting.  Lots of pretty plants, right near whole foods, so it was pleasant as waiting can be.  Once we were seated, the food came quickly.  The best pancakes of my life!  Blueberry banana.  And this place doesn't use fake syrup, they have the real stuff, maple, which is the only way to complement those fluffy, fruity miracles of unbelievable deliciousness.  The pesto based vegetable scramble I had was also fantastic.  FANTASTIC!!!  I can't wait to go back here.
We came for the blue monkey pancakes, and they were on point. Hefty portion of 4 gorgeous blueberry- and banana-filled beauts. Not all flour and just a hint of filling like most other places. And not too sweet. Long waits, but the neighborhood is good for dilly dallying.
FINALLY. I found a fabulous brunch location in the Peninsula. Recently went to Joanie's and had an utterly awful experience and after trying a couple other places, I thought there was no hope of finding a new brunch home since moving here. We were impressed from the get-go. Seating was relatively quick even on a Saturday, our server was very attentive, the atmosphere was great but the food... the only real factor of importance was actually great also. Best eggs benedict I've tried in the Peninsula (although i wish the muffin they used for them was the same type as the small buttermilk biscuits they give you on the side, I love homemade biscuits instead of english muffins on a benedict but I'll let it go). My husband had to send back his omelet b/c he had asked for an egg-white omelet and it came as a regular omelet but they re-cooked it fairly promptly. They lose a star for being nearly TWICE as expensive as most other breakfast/brunch places we've tried. It would be a 2 star loss but there is a marked difference in the quality of the experience.
Overrated. In the past I have enjoyed this restaurant but after tonight... DONE!  The waiter was at best... a buffoon. The food was at best... good. Dealing with them to set up a reservation? At best... how much would it cost them to just sign up with Open Table? If are in this neighborhood and you want good food, you are better off getting take out from Whole Foods.
I feel like there aren't that many brunch places, let alone GREAT brunch places in the Bay Area.  I had gone to St. Michael's Alley years ago (10-15) for a work lunch, but having left the area, I never had the chance to go back.  So when I made plans to have brunch with a friend, I decided to check it out. You will definitely have to expect a wait, no matter what time you show up, but it's not really THAT long (~20 min).  We ended up sitting at the counter and had phenomenal service! There's a variety of breakfast options to choose from, and I opted for the Eggs Florentine.  Aside from the slightly too much paprika sprinkled on top, it was great!  I probably shouldn't have eaten the entire entree, but I managed to eat all but a few bites and left completed stuffed! I've already recommended this place to my parents, who will probably go soon to try the Blue Monkey Pancakes.
What the. How does this place have such stellar reviews? And how does this place have so much business? I had a terrible experience here. In short: -I came here with my sister and cousins for brunch. We all agreed that the water tasted really, really weird. When we got our glasses replaced, the water that we received tasted even worse. As my sister described it, it tasted like the water was melted from ice that had suffered from freezer burn. It was really that bad. -The service was really, really slow. It took almost two hours for us to finish brunch, which is kind of ridiculous. -Smoked Salmon Benedict (which my sister got) apparently was watery and the tomatoes were of poor quality. -Prices are really expensive, especially considering the quality of food. After tax and tip, everyone ended up paying between $20-$25 for brunch. Maybe we just came on a bad day?
This review is based on my recent experience for Mother's Day with a prefixed brunch menu.  The menu was $30 which included a pastry or soup, one of the main course items, and two drinks.  Typically brunch courses range from $16-18, so the restaurant is essentially charging $12-14 for a pastry/soup and two drinks.  Fair enough, it's Mother's Day.  The issue I had was the quality of the food that was served.  We had: Lemon poppy seed scone and cranberry orange scone - bought from Costco? Lentils soup with ham - under salted and bland. Smoked Salmon Benedict - the best dish that was ordered, standard issue.  You can probably imagine what this would taste like, but pretty good. Lobster Ravioli - the sauce was really soupy and the ravioli had a lot of filler. Crab and Artichoke Omelet - this dish was so horrible it annoyed me.  It was completely filled with cream which made it inedible.  I would expect more from a restaurant like St. Michael's Alley with a 4 star review on Yelp then to under deliver with cost cutting techniques such as primarily using cream and butter instead of what the customer expects, crab and artichoke. Another reason we chose the restaurant was that you could order mimosas as part of the two drinks.  We ended up only ordering one because the mimosas were not good and I was disappointed that it came in a wine glass instead of a flute.  I appreciate when my drinks come in it's proper glass.
I am writing on behalf of my step son who is 9, who said with such animation, "I want to come back again... Pretty pretty please." A must try is the apple sausage, goes well with the Mimosa. Service - excellent
A chilly morning in Palo Alto, it was also a perfectly good day to have brunch. We gotten here during the late morning St Michael's Alley has two locations, bought of which specializing on the meal. This location is just for Brunch, when coming here we were lucky enough to have seats almost immediately because of we opted for an outdoor seat. While we were there, we also ran into other fellow Yelper Elites! We tried the Blue Monkey Pancakes and their Smoked Salmon eggs benedict. The blue monkey pancakes were deliciously buttery and soft with a crisp edge, even for a person that isn't really into pancakes, I can definitely vouch for them. Furthermore, the Smoked Salmon Egg Benedicts is absolutely my favorite. The salmon on the egg benedict has but the dish on another level. Special thanks to Alesia T. for bringing me here, it's an awesome brunch spot. ----- + Pro: One of the best brunch locations in the South Bay! - Con: Can be a very busy location, expect a long waitlist for some groups. \( ^,^)/ Overall: Reason I love brunch :D
I don't know why there are so many low ratings below, but I absolutely love St. Michael's Alley! I have been coming here with my parents for Sunday brunch since I was just a wee little one and the food has always been delicious. There is almost always a wait, but it is really only around 20 min most of the time and well worth it. I always go for an omelet with chicken apple sausage and a mimosa.... mmm. One of the best places in downtown Palo Alto for brunch!
Nice! Not a Dotties (SF) but measures well to may other top brunch places in San Francisco. Good portions, distinct flavors and cheerful service. We tried the Salmon benedict and a Brie Omelet, with mimosa to wash it down. And we were smug and full almost till dinner - can't complain! Tip: After the mimosa settles, get a coffee at the nearby Philz (Alma/Forest). You are very welcome!
I love brunch. I am always down for eating at brunch places, and St. Michael's fits that bill very well. My group of friends shared the Eggs Florentine, St. Mike's Omelet, and the Blue Monkey Pancakes. Everything was well portioned and delicious! The Eggs Florentine and St. Mike's Omelet were definitely more cheesy than I'm used to, but that's definitely not a bad thing. The home fries that came with the savory entrees were SO GOOD. Major props to the friendly service! We requested a carafe of half mimosa and half codder (cranberry juice + champagne), and the staff was so accommodating. With the cute decor, friendly service, and tasty brunch, this is definitely a wonderful way to spend a sunny weekend afternoon. The rest of downtown Palo Alto is also just a few blocks away, in case you need to walk off all those mimosas later. ;)
Brunch is my favorite meal and I take it quite seriously... especially since the only time I truly ever get to dine out for brunch is on the weekends. As much as I love trying out new restaurants, I hate gambling when it comes to brunch. With that said, I think I've found a new favorite brunch spot in the Bay Area. The wait to be seated outside was about 35 minutes. My only complaint is that they didn't have heat lamps and you have to dine amongst the hoards of people waiting to be seated. You can feel their eyes watching you eat and their mouths drooling due to beautiful food presentation - that & the fact that they must be starving from the wait. I was a little disappointed that they ran out of their Smoked Salmon Benedict (it was only 11am!) so I opted for the regular Eggs Benedict - still very good. I could only imagine how amazing their smoked salmon must've been. Portions were large & very filling - left me in a food coma for the rest of the day.
Good brunch food, long wait. I went here with a friend that suggested this place.  We sat at the counter, got great service and the food was delicious.  I got the blueberry pancakes, chicken apple sausage and earl grey tea.  I ordered the pancakes because when I looked around everyone was eating it so I figured they must be good.  Everyone was indeed correct. I think the only down side is the wait, it wasn't bad but we still had to wait about 20 mins.
Sunday brunch. I ordered the pancakes (upgraded to blue monkey), egg, bacon. It tasted as it sounds. They were able to accommodate a table for ten. We'd put our names down before the place opened, we did wait about 30min or so before our name was up; it was alright, we were still waiting for our group's stragglers. They said if we order for the absent folks, they can seat us now; we said yes. We also brought our own cake, S.MA charged a $2pp cake cutting fee.
easing back into yelping. this review is coming a little late but better late than never! the first time i went to st. michael's about a year ago, i was blown away by the cuteness (and deliciousness) of their blue monkey pancakes (blue = blueberry. monkey = banana. GENIUS). AND they had crayons for us (big kids) to draw with! the wait is not bad, and there's always university ave shops nearby and a whole foods right across the street for you to peruse if desired. more recently, revisited the lovely pancakes with two galpals for a birthday celebration. Shared the Eggs Florentine, St. Mike's Omelet, and the Blue Monkey Pancakes. Ended up with one pancake to spare (I probably could have eaten it but we'd already split everything into perfect 3....regrets) highlights: get something that'll let you have HOMEFRIES because they were bomb. crispy and flavorful on outside, not hard on the inside. MIMOSA CARAFE: they give you a whole bottle of bubbly and a carafe of juice and let you pour out the ratio yourself. options are orange or cranberry, but do yourself a favor and as for a combo. SUNRISE MIMOSA FTW. i say: get something savory so you get the homefries and the blue monkey pancakes to split if you're with one other person.
The Good: Great food presentation Good quantity of food Friendly Staff Good for kids, who can draw on the paper table covers Cozy The Bad: Too expensive for what it's worth Not tasty enough to justify the higher prices.  A fine place to go for brunch, but certainly not my favorite
Had a brunch date with a girlfriend here the past weekend...yum! We got a little table right be the window, tucked away from the bustle. The service was excellent, our waitress came by regularly to check on us and my tea cup was never empty! I got the St. Mike's omelet...delish! Two tiny gripes: 1) we arrived when the place opened and had to wait (outside) to be seated even though the place was empty and 2) their bathroom is in the kitchen!
Lived up to my high expectations! If there were a couple teaspoons less Hollandaise on my dual poached eggs atop smoked salmon, tomato, onions, capers, and English muffins, the Smoked Salmon Benedict would be faultless. If you like a little green in a Benedict, go for the Eggs Florentine--sauteed spinach, mushrooms and onions take place of the classic Canadian Bacon, or another protein, and hit the highest note for an Eggs Benedict. Biscuit on the side is so good, too.
Friendly service, delicious brunch and charming decor all translate to "yay! I'm a fan."  I've been here a few times and my only complaint is they don't take reservations for brunch.  However, the food and the charm of the locale definitely make up for it. Also, something that's very important to me:  parking.  St. Michael's Alley is conveniently located away from the main strip of downtown Palo Alto, making parking very easy and very convenient.
I've been to St. Michael's Alley twice so far. Once with my family for their weekend brunch and just recently for a Christmas/Holiday lunch with my coworkers. I thought that their food and atmosphere were phenomenal both times. Since my brunch experience took place nearly two years ago, this review is primarily based on my experience with their weekday lunch service. Although if you go during lunch, I highly recommend the eggs benedicts because they have been one of the best I have had! First off, I love the decorum and setting of St. Michael's! It's a house/inn-turned restaurant; so there are many "private" rooms that can house private functions or multiple parties. The "furnitures," lighting and table setting showcase the elegance and class of their food and service. I also love the scent in their bathroom! The whole ambiance is very relaxing, upon your arrival and departure. I recommend getting a reservation if your party size is medium (4-5ppl) or larger because the restaurant is quite small and intimate. Their menu rotates often (maybe monthly), so there's always something refreshing to choose. I don't think one can go wrong with any of their items. I appreciate that they have a wide and creative selection of vegetarian entrees, juxtaposed with the normal omnivore selection; likewise for their starters. Our group began with 4 different starters: wild mushroom cake-incredibly earthy and rich; interesting texture bruschetta with goat cheese and tomato/herb relish-refreshing, citrusy and great textural contrast butternut squash and goat cheese tart-loved the contrast of the rich, creamy squash-goat cheese against the flaky puff pastry. the goat cheese added a nice acidity to cut through the richness crispy chicken and mushroom wontons-didn't have any since I am vegetarian, but the coleslaw garnish, soy ginger and mango coconut sauces were delicious. everyone seemed delighted with the wontons! Overall, the starters were nicely portioned for sharing; our host also allowed us to the modify the order so that it would be easier to share amongst our large group(~11). Now onto the star entrees! Around 10 were offered during lunch, which ranged from casual sandwiches to fancy new york steaks. Everyone was very impressed with the presentation and flavors of their choice. Our party had: pumpkin ravioli-it was surprisingly the smallest portioned entree served, probably because it was incredibly rich, cooked in a bacon brown butter sauce! presentation was simple and elegant, showcasing the ravioli as the star seared ahi tuna sandwich-large portion, served with a wasabi aioli sauce and refreshing bed of vegetables grilled newman ranch new york steak- looked incredibly juicy, served with a good-sized dollop of cabernet shallot butter, medley of heirloom small carrots and onion rings (keeping it real and american :) I had the roast fall vegetable lasagna with four cheese, served with a healthy kale-arugula salad. I was very impressed with the rustic lasagna, filled with roasted mushrooms, fennel and butternut squash. my only objection about this dish is that it was slightly overcooked, making it difficult to cut and the crust hard to chew. Might I add that the lasagna slice was towering (HUGE), so tread with caution and a big appetite. I, somehow managed to finish it, probably because it was delicious and I couldn't help myself XD My boss kindly offered to order us dessert as well. (thankfully most of us paced ourselves and had either tea/coffee/dessert). Me, being a foodie--absolutely ordered! I chose the dark chocolate glazed profiteroles, filled with coconut ice cream! I was surprised that I got 3 for one order, so I shared. The hot chocolate sauce was divine, melding the flavors of the pastry and coconut ice cream amazingly! My coworkers ordered and equally enjoyed the other desserts, which were: pumpkin bread pudding, chocolate pots de creme, seasonal sorbet with gingerbread cookie Although it felt a little bit over-the-top extravagant--then again, that's what the holidays are for! Overall, St. Michael's provided a sweet ending to a wonderful year! I will definitely be back! An interesting fact according to my boss and Steve Job's recently released biographical book: St. Michael's Alley was one of Steve Job's frequently visited restaurant; it was mentioned in the book because the restaurant kindly made vegetarian accommodations for his diet :)
Great seating, bad service, yummy toasted almond pancake with rasberry jam filling as their special. Really was hoping to try lemon poppyseed pancake someone had a picture of though :(.  Not amazing food but very cute, especially on a sunny day with outside seating.  I asked for side of yogurt which they gave me a tablespoon for and I had to ask for more.  Looked curdled, but I'm sure it was fine.  Great weather today for outside shaded seating.
Love coming here for brunch! I love their chunky monkey pancakes!! The only down side is that they don't take reservations... so get there early! They have good mimosas as well. Their omelettes are nices and fluffy and chock full of goodness!
The food was excellent, portions huge, but I don't think it was worth the money and the waitstaff was not very attentive. I ended up spending $25 on an omelette & jasmin tea, which is WAY too much.  We spent 1.5 hours at the restaurant simply because we had trouble getting the staff to come give us the bill and then take it after.  They never checked up on us after giving us the food, though the place was small, packed but not extremely busy. There was a line outside despite the fact that three tables were ready to go. It also annoyed me that they had a $2 shared plate fee.  The portions were HUGE.  Either don't charge a shared fee or else make it cheaper.  I don't like being forced to pay for two meals.
Came here for brunch with my gfs on a Saturday and boy it was PACKED! Good thing we made reservations but still had to wait for 10 mins which is not bad. I ordered Blue Monkey Pancakes with some bacon and they were good. Ofcourse we all had to have some mimosas for brunch which was good as well. My friend had an eggs benedict and it was good as well. Might come back again if I'm in the area. Parking is super busy around the area too so come early if you can.
There are a handful of rare and special occasions when I arrive somewhere early. Not just on-time, wiping the sweat from my brow as I fumble for passport and boarding pass. Not late, when I am trying to convince my doctor's front office that the microbes made me oversleep and miss my appointment. But early. Luxuriously early. Able to have a luxurious breakfast, not just coffee and coffee cake crumbs. I love when it happens. Chance, full-night's sleep, and a limited train helped get me to Palo Alto early one morning. Hasn't happened since. Just a ten-minute or so stroll from the University Avenue Caltrain station, St. Michael's Alley was the perfect place to toast my uber-punctuality. It's not in an alley, probably because the outside of the restaurant is covered in verdant foliage which requires beaming sun rays. It's positioned well because the plants are gorgeous. I heard tell of a long-wait, but I sat right away. It pays to be sola sometimes. St. Mike's was more white-table cloth-y than I expected, but it is Palo Alto after all. Servers were very cordial and unpersonable, much like you'd expect from a nice place. I stuffed my desire to chit-chat about the Giants or the newest album from whomever and decided to save that for Oakland. I ordered the seasonal Belgian waffle which was topped with peaches and plain yogurt. It was the perfect amount of food, the perfect amount of sweet, and the perfect amount of crisp. I like the taste of being early. I ordered coffee, which was topped off, topped off, and again topped off. Had I not been watching a bone marrow transplant later, I would have ordered a mimosa. I needed a pitcher of them later. The couple next to me was drinking their weight in mimosas and playing footsie, the man next to me working on a design for a particle accelerator, and the woman outside was talking to herself. Nevermind, she's on a bluetooth and she was talking venture capitalism. A perfect microcosm of PA! St. Michael was invoked as a battle cry for the good angels when fighting their war in heaven. St. Mike's is already a little piece of heaven, but if it helps I'll bellow his name and help cast out demons. Just as he's an Archangel, St. Mike's served some of the best breakfast I've had. Almost better than the best and the rest.
Great neighborhood restaurant! Creative dishes that are executed well. Good bar scene. Love brunch... try the eggs benedict. :)
Went here with some friends while traveling for work in Palo Alto.  Food was good, service was good.  Limited bar selection (no Basil Hayden), and very nice, quiet atmosphere.  Solid spot to grab a bite.
To begin with the ambiance is great. It's a perfect place to have brunch on a nice sunny day. A cozy little place tucked in the streets of Palo Alto. Now for the food. I would like to see more variety in the menu for brunch / lunch selection. Also it is open till 2pm on sundays. We had the Belgian Waffles which was nice and yummy.  It was served with fresh yogurt which I think was a nice touch.  My friend had curried eggs which was a little too spicy for my liking. The  potatoes it was served with was delicious. Also, they are not too accommodating when it comes to mixing things up. There are few vegetarian options. So you might want to take that into account . The service is nice and friendly. Oh as a footnote, if you order something and want them to split it by two, they charge you $2 extra bucks for that . You are better off asking for an extra plate and spliting it yourself. They don't accept Amex.
Really great selection, with huge portions. I had the curried vegetable scramble and added tofu. Spendy, but good.
Excellent brunch place. Very good service, very comfortable atmosphere. Rachel was an excellent server and the hostess was a hot Asian girl. Definitely a good first impression. Mimosa Carafe = They bring out a huge bottle of champagne and fresh squeeze orange juice. A perfect morning hair of the dog. Eggs Benedict = Poached egg was done well, with a tasty hollandaise sauce. St. Mike's Omelet = Extremely large omelet with fresh ingredients and delicious potatoes. Fall Garden Scramble = A little on the bland side, but it's a "garden scramble" so you can't really expect anything too tasty. I wish the eggs were a bit fluffier though. Chilaquiles = Decently made. Goes very well with the Cholula hot sauce. Pancakes = Average. Big fluffy pancakes that didn't have a strong buttermilk flavor. St. Michael's Alley is definitely one of the better brunch joints in the University Avenue area. I would actually come back just for more of their mimosas.
Content. I felt very content after a nice brunch at St. Michael's. Here's why: I arrived punctually before opening this crisp Sunday morning (first 3 guests on the early bird list) and it got progressively better knowing that I knew exactly what I was going to order. Blue monkey pancakes, a side of mischievously crispy bacon with a nice glass of mimosa really does the trick. Especially the mimosa. You'll be sporting blue birds on your shoulder and whistling chipper little ditties when your belly is full. So happy brunching!
Came here on a Sunday morning after a massage at Watercourse Way. Can I say an amazing breakfast was served with hot coffee and a nice environment? Ordered the Egg Benedict with coffee, slices of potatoes. It literally melts in your mouth. This place is pretty expensive for breakfast hough, but it is worth it if you are dying for breakfast. All in a small plate but warm and soft.
This place is (very) overrated. The food is good, service is slow, and unless you want to wait 40 minutes to be seated, you can easily find similar or even better places in the Palo Alto Area.
Basically, this place is okay. I could write about the times I've had delicious, well-prepared food, but then I'd have to write about all the times they've messed it up. So, I'll write about how they're inconsistent, and in a convenient pro/con format. I do come relatively frequently, as Ruth C. loves this place. Pros: - Very good when it's good - Generally easy parking - Outdoor seating (unless you get bumped by the waiting hoards, even worse when they're gassy) - Nice window seating - The head waiter with the mustache (who's also the waiting list Nazi, bless him), is a good guy - Walking distance to Anthropologie (yes, this can be a motivating factor) Bad: - Inconsistent: it's especially disappointing when something you've had here and was delicious is not as well-prepared on following visits. For the most part, this refers to their scrambles, which (beware!) can vary from a soft, fluffy, well-cooked consistency to a dry, crumbly, gummy overcooked mess. It can also refer to starchy goods (pancakes) and meat sides, but not as much as the eggs. - Price: I think it's expensive for what it is (for brunch, at least). For example, the vegetarian scramble is listed for $14, the half-pound hamburger is $12. But honestly,  this doesn't bother me all that much if it's well-done. Of course, being one of the better brunch places on the Peninsula, it's very much a captive audience. - Seating: The center of the dining room is very drafty if it's cold out. And the place echoes badly, which is terribly amplified if a gaggle of Asian girls are chirping like birds at a big table. - The Young Male Waiter: I wish I knew his name. He's a terrible, terrible waiter. Inattentive, inconsistent, and terrible table-side manners
From the reviews, skip the brunch.  Not their strong suite. Fortunately, we were there for dinner.  It was good.  Very reasonably priced covering a variety of budgets on the menu.  We were having a geek dinner outside and we were well-behaved but louder than most normal diners.  Fortunately, we were alone outside for most of the night.... The gnocchi has meat sauce - says marinara on the menu but it is meat sauce.  Two guys in our party ordered it.  Both said it was excellent.  One stopped after the first bite when he realized it had meat in it.   The great thing is that the wait staff knew exactly what to do to remedy the situation and had it quickly resolved. Good house wines reasonably priced.
I really can't say anything bad about this place. The decor is clean, nicely organized and brightly lit by it's skylight. We were promptly seated and ordered the salmon omelet, veggie omelet and the blue monkey pancakes. Both omelets were flavored well with lots of herbs and the home fries were cooked perfectly, tasty alone or dipped in ketchup. The winner here is the pancake. Loaded with lots of blueberries that retain their shape and bite, they are light and fluffy and really don't need syrup. On a bright and sunny day, it's the perfect brunch cafe to sit and relax. Will definitely remember this place.
Split the Eggs Benedict and their special, Orange Ricotta pancakes, with a friend for Sunday brunch. Both dishes were awesome and I would willingly go back to try some of the other Yelper suggestions like Blue Monkey Pancakes (awesome name!). I think everyone had the same idea of getting in right as they opened bc there were a ton of people huddling in the cold waiting for the door to open. Make sure your whole party is there if you're going to do that!
Food Wow, just wow, I had the ABC burger, that was by far one of the most savory pieces of burger patty I tried so far. Onions were only 4-5 slivers, not even full red onion rings in the burger tho. But besides the onions, the burger was mighty tasty. Based on what i saw, other entrees were neatly prepared. Becareful what you order tho. not everything is worth the price. For example, the OJ is straight from the jug. Not that fancy for a $$ place. Atmosphere/Service waited for about 30 mins during the brunch hours. after we got seated, the service was prompt.  The place is somewhat crowded, but not to the point where people go into each others way. Nice little cafe.
I pretty much joined Yelp for the purpose of writing this review after seeing all the hype about St. Michael's Alley and then being utterly disappointed when I ate there. Showed up with my BF about 10 minutes before the place opened for Brunch on a Saturday. The hostess jotted down our name and told us to come back when they opened. Came back when they opened and she had forgotten who we were, and seated all of the people who showed up for the next 10 minutes until we reminded her that we were first on her list. Sat down, took a while to decide. We shared the two specials of the day: orange ricotta pancakes and a steak scramble. Boyfriend and I agreed that the pancakes, while rather light and fluffy, tasted like neither orange nor had any apparent hint of ricotta. The steak scramble was nothing special. For the food alone I might have considered 3 stars, but the price we paid for that brunch drops them down a star in my book. I've definitely had better food for less money at Joanie's or the Creamery. The wait staff also seemed to border on incompetent that morning. While we had no issues because we ordered the two specials, the table next to us couldn't get the waitress to understand that he wanted a bowl of yogurt separate from his granola and a bowl of fruit on the side. I know the menu says no substitutions, but it wasn't even like she had to pick the granola and fruit out of the yogurt by hand. The kitchen probably has all of those things in separate containers to begin with anyway!
It was fine, but honestly nothing memorable or taste worthy that stands out for me personally that makes me wanting to go back. Maybe I'm just craving bar food right now, is all.
Came here for Sunday brunch not sure what to expect since I've read mixed reviews. The place was packed with a line out the door, but we only had to wait about 10 minutes to be seated. Decor kind of felt like a small bar/restaurant or even a little boutique store converted into a small restaurant with some out door seating. Service was friendly and fairly fast... Had a mimosa to start off with and ordered the St. Mikes Omelet while the wifey just had coffee and Blue Monkey Pancakes. The omelet was stuff with goodies like BACON and a side of potatoes. I was definitely in a food coma when I was done, and the wifey was pleased with her pancakes. The food wasn't "to die for", but it was filling and good. Conclusion: It's a cute little place to grab brunch/lunch although prices are on the higher end...especially since you could make most of the stuff on the menu at home.
2nd time back at St. Michael's Alley for brunch so I thought it deserved an update. Their salmon Benedict is flavorful and I appreciated the fact that they left their smoked salmon on the raw side. Just the way I like it. Blue monkey pancakes are amazing! I personally don't enjoy pancakes but these were delicious and I found myself gobbling them up. Sorry bf! Since there are no reservations, the wait time can be a brutal. If the outdoor tables are out of commission due to bad weather, expect a bigger delay. Food is consistent, portions are generous +5 stars On the pricey end for basic brunch, spotty service -1 star Overall, excellent food but expect to pay $40-$50 for brunch for 2 and a wait time of at least 20-30 minutes.
Although palo alto's university ave restaurants and bistros are one of my favorite areas to grab a... Read more 
Went at about noon on Sunday; table for two took about 30 minutes. Being horribly indecisive over whether we wanted pancakes or french toast, our server informed us we could do half orders!! YAY!! If we had known earlier, I would not have been so vexed. LOL So we ended up ordering: 1/2 order Blue Monkey Pancake - delicious. Good amount of blueberries and bananas that give moisture and natural sweetness to the pancakes. I had it with butter, no syrup and it was perfect. 1/2 order French Toast - Meh... A tad disappointing. Crusty and dry, a little tough to eat. Needed lotsa butter and syrup to make it soft enough to cut through easily. Generous amounts of fresh strawberries though. Salmon Benedict - Pretty darn good. Eggs were poached so beautifully, with dark yellow yolky goodness oozing everywhere. Hollandaise was rice and a tad tangy. Good amount of salty smoked salmon and the capers rounded it all off nicely. Service was a tad lacking. As much as I wanted to love the service (because our server was really sweet), it was pretty bad... It took forever to get our order taken, another good 10 minutes for our drinks, another 20 or so minutes for food and then no refills offered throughout my meal or even check back on the food. I flagged someone for more coffee and it took almost 10 minutes to get some. Overall, the food was good albeit a tad pricey. Do not come here if you are in a rush because everything from getting drinks, getting the food and even more coffee takes forever. Great if you are just out for some good food, good conversation and good ambiance.
S.O.: let's go to the Farmer's Market! Me: Ok! S.O.: We should get something to eat before hand. Me: Ok... 15 mins later... we were in front of this place waiting for it to open at 10 am for a gorgeous Sunday brunch (weather was perfect!) A couple of reminders: - it's tiny place (typical brunch = gets crowded quickly) - they don't take reservations - they won't sit you unless your whole party is present Since it was just the two of us... plus we were both present... we had an option of tables... we opted to sit by the window. Our server was friendly and prompt... told us the specials and took our drink orders. Will not review S.O.'s food since I'm sure he'll review it himself anyway... My order: - soy mocha = it took awhile to get ... barista was backed up? When it did arrive... first sip... it was well worth the wait! By far the best coffee I've had in the PA area... not to strong... not to light... chocolatey flavor and it was just the right amount of taste! - Breakfast Sundae (HOMEMADE GRANOLA, PLAIN LOWFAT YOGURT AND FRESH FRUIT) = S.O. and I shared this ... I'm beginning to think restaurants are really conservative with the amount of yogurt they put on their "yogurt sundae" -- I think it was only a teaspoon full... granola in the bottom and then tons of fruits. The S.O. liked it but I didn't like the watermelon with my yogurt and granola. That was odd for me...didn't like the taste and combo... - Eggs Florentine (TOASTED ENGLISH MUFFIN TOPPED WITH SAUTEED MUSHROOMS, CARAMELIZED ONIONS, AND SPINACH, POACHED EGGS, HOLLANDAISE SAUCE) = totally forgot about the caramelized onions... so that threw me off but it was my fault for not paying attention. This was actually decent. The hollandaise sauce was subtle and they gave the right amount... didn't made the whole dish soggy. Overall... we'll probably be back but be sure to be there early... it becomes a cluster mess after 10 am! Also... since it's small...privacy is limited.
On top of  my favorite restaurant list in Palo Alto.  Good food, good ambiance and friendly service.  Specially love their Wild Mushroom Cake! Best to make reservation before you go, always crowded.
I actually found this place to be quite delicious despite seeing now that many of my favorite yelpers did not like this place. I had this place on my "list of to-try" for a while so the bf and I stopped by on a sunny spring day to give it a go. They had some outdoor seating but we waited about 10 minutes+ for indoor seating since it was a bit chilly outside still. Our table was cute and right next to the window so you have a gorgeous view of the greenery outside without feeling the cold temps. The place is, obviously, dog friendly outside and there were a few super cute pups roaming around. The whole atmosphere is cozy, quaint but also open and airy for such a small restaurant. It IS pricey, I will give you that, two drinks and two entrees came out to be almost $50 plus tax and tip which is very ... high for brunch when you just want a quick stop over. The biscuit I got was pretty good (English Muffin?) and my eggs were runny on the Benedict. The bf's smoked salmon was pretty yummy but definitely not my type of breakfast! Overall, this place was cute, I can see this as a nice brunch date place, but do expect to bring a full wallet at these prices!
Their biscuit wasn't all that great (=not Brenda's in SF), but LOVED their eggs florentine!
This is by far one of the best resturants for Sunday brunch on the Peninsula. The waitstaff is perfect; they are attentive but not so much that is detracted from the meal, and the food is always fresh and well prepared.  Especially for those who love eggs benedict (yes, it's amazing)! Even the sidewalk tables offer a nice (e.g., Victor Frost-free) ambience... On the filpside... they don't take reservations for brunch service.  Either arrive early to be guaranteed a table at the head of the line or get your name on the waitlist and then grab a quick coffee at the Peets around the corner.
If I could rate this place any less I would. To start off we showed up ten minutes after they had opened Sunday the 4th of December. The place was mobbed so we were hopeful that it was as good as it was touted on yelp. We had our name signed in and they told us it would be a wait, we inquired about outdoor seating as they were all empty. The host had to come in and out at least six times to ask different groups if they wanted the outside seating first. Which in itself would not be bad if he had just used his brain and taken the list outside with him but I digress. We were happy as our party of two was able to be seated. There we sat for twenty minutes with no one even asking if we wanted water. I finally got up and asked if we could see our waiter, the host was most apologetic. We finally were able to order, thirty five minutes later we finally received our food. At this point we were thoroughly unimpressed  the food was so so and the service was horrible. I then had to once again track someone down to get our check. I was so displeased I did something I almost never do, I did not tip. I clearly wrote a giant zero in the place of the tip and wrote out clearly the amount owed. Today one day later I check my bank balance and to my surprise I find the waitstaff was nice enough to give themselves a twenty percent tip. SO TO ANY ON THINKING OF GOING TO THE PLACE I SAY AS LOUD AS I CAN DO NOT GO HERE. THE FOOD IS NOT WORTH IT, THE SERVICE IS NOT WORTH IT AND HAVING MONEY STOLEN FROM ME IS REALLY NOT WORTH IT. SO TELL YOUR FRIENDS KIDS THIS IS THE WORST PLACE TO GO FOR BRUNCH!!!!! Update: 12/06/2011 I spoke with one of the owners, to which she denied the claim. She told me my statement was and this is per her" very slanderous". In calling them would resolve this, unfortunately it has not. I have had to file fraud charges with my bank. Also I may have to consider speaking to the local police department to see if I have recourse in resolving this matter. Truly sad that we live in a day and age where one we have to put up with someone stealing from you when all you want to is get something to eat. To top it off when we point out such thievery to the owners rather then think hey the "Customer is right" they instead play it off on the banks. I have news for them the bank has confirmed that it was at the point of sale that the transaction took place. So fellow yelpers if you are reading this while I will say I am sure it does not happen often at this restaurant, I am on the unfortunate end of being a person who has had money stolen from whoever entered in the transaction. So beware next time you make a purchase at any establishment when presenting your credit card. Even in a upscale town such as Palo Alto can you easily be robbed of your money.
Love this place and I have never been for brunch!  When I do leave my office at lunch, I like to wander downtown Palo Alto from Stanford's campus and, on a very nice Spring or Smmer day, sit outside at St. Michael's Alley and have a lovely lunch. The service has always been very pleasant here, attentive, solicitous and helpful.  The menu is small and when I have asked for recommendations (as a vegetarian), the staff has been really kind in getting to know what I like and then they'll offer a thoughtful suggestion. The quiche with spring greens and the beet side salad are my favorite.  They may only be seasonal offerings however.  I've never been here in the Winter and am not sure about the offerings they have at that time. They also have a really nice wine list, by the glass, and when I don't have a taxing mental set of tasks back at the office, I usually get a glass and try to luxurIate in my meal and my companions' conversation.  I love reading all of the brunch reviews here on YELP, so I will come back quite soon to try it on a weekend.
We showed up for Sunday brunch and got in before the morning rush started. The waiter was friendly enough - he took our drink orders and disappeared........ We looked through the menu and hemmed and hawed at the selection. I was able to change my mind several times and still had the time to marvel at how long it took the waiter to come back and take our orders. Finally I ordered the Eggs Florentine and my friends ordered the salade nicoise and the gnocchi. All were amazingly cooked and I loved every bite of my perfectly poached eggs, the excellent hollandaise sauce and country fried potatoes. A reliable place for brunch with good food and okay service.
Lovely brunch spot near University Ave. in Palo Alto. Delicious waffles with spiced apples and yogurt. Arrive early (I'd suggest a few minutes before 10) to skip the long line that forms soon after. The staff was very chill and accommodating for our party of 5 (baby included). Crayons and paper were provided for entertainment. Very friendly waiter. On a warm day, it'd be nice to return and dine outside...
A very charming brunch place. This location used to the main restaurant, but they have opened another larger location a stones throw away and made this location exclusively for brunch only. The food is average I think. Nothing too special, but ambiance of the place is what I like the most. It always gets full and they usually open the main windows in the front and it creates a nice indoor open-air dining experience. Blue Monkey Pancakes are very flavorful but not as moist as I like. French Toast is not very good, egg coverage was mainly on one side and the taste was very average. Special Brie, ham, spinach and green onion omelet is fabulous. Brie in an omelet is a perfect combination. This one or its variation is my must have. Service is very good, very polite and attentive even though they have a fully packed place.
Came here for Saturday Brunch this past weekend We waited 10min for a table for two even though there were large groups ahead of us.  Get their early.  We sat by the window in the front corner of the restaurant and got a nice view of dining area and street with other patrons sitting outside enjoying their meal The table was nicely set with parchment paper like Macaroni Grill style with crayons in the condiment holder to doodle with while you wait. We ordered the House Coffee, Blue Monkey Pancake (blueberry and banana pancake), and homemade Waffles, side of potatoes and scrambled eggs. The food was delicious.  Pancake was light and fluffy, with fresh blueberries on the underside (not cooked too long).  The waffles were cooked perfectly brown on both sides with a crunchy outer layer and light/fluffy inside topped with butter, dusted powder sugar and fresh strawberries. Our waiter seemed a bit disoriented.  We didn't get our coffee until 10min after we received our food (after we asked for our coffee).  He ran back to the bar, brought out a lukewarm cup of coffee and seemed a bit lost at who ordered it and started circling around other dining guests trying to figure out who ordered the coffee.  I waved and he brought it over, took a sip and asked for a hotter cup.  Brought out the replacement and forgot the cream....like I said, he seemed disoriented. Overall, the experience was good and the food was great.  They don't take AMEX though.
I should preface that this review is based on their Brunch. There was about a 20 minute wait, unless we wanted to sit at the bar.  We decided that would be okay.  So we had our choice of sitting on the corner of the bar (which was pretty awkward) or next to a wall.  Neither seemed optimal, but being that we were hungry we decided to take the corner. We ordered a non-fat cappuccino.  It was fantastic.  They used local organic milk, which I approved of. For breakfast we ordered the chiliaquiles and eggs Florentine.  The chilaquiles had really great flavor, but they were a little...I don't know.  They were missing something.  I'm being snobby here, because I truly think Reposado has better chiliaquiles, but bear with me.  However, their potatoes were hands down perfection.  Yummy.  They were golden and crisp and seasoned perfectly. The eggs Florentine wasn't executed as well as the chiliaquiles.  As soon as I added salt, they were slightly better, but they still lacked seasoning.  Salt is only one dimension.  I wanted something with a kick.  We ordered the hollandaise sauce on the side, and really if the idea was to use butter flavored butter as the seasoning, I think that's a bit of a cop out. I also think our brunch was a little more expensive than we have paid elsewhere as well. Its good, but not the best.
Good food for brunch, salmon scramble is great, monkey pancakes are legit! Crowded for brunch ... 20 to 30min wait, friendly and accommodating host!
I've always passed by St. Michael's Alley on the weekdays and when I saw that they were open for brunch, I decided to give them a try.  We waited for about 30 minutes before they sat us down.  We ordered the blue monkey pancakes and the breakfast medley with eggs, potatoes, and pancakes. The regular pancakes were tasty and not dry and flavor wise, the blue monkey(blueberry and banana in the pancake) was delicious.  I've never had both of them fused before!  Our server was busy but she did a decent job. It was a tight squeeze in terms of seating and the volume of the dining room can be loud, but it was an overall nice experience.  Oh and since it was brunch, most entrees were over $10 so diner experience this is definitely not!
In an attempt to satisfy my brunch cravings, I frantically searched Yelp for "mimosa" and "eggs benedict".  The result -- St. Michael's Alley! BF and I came on a rainy Saturday around 1pm.  Luckily there was no wait and we were seated immediately.  I got the smoked salmon benedict and BF got the special of the day which was the chorizo scramble.  I found the egg benedict to be just OK -- the yolk wasn't runny enough and there was too much sauce.  Therefore, the entire dish was too wet.  BF really liked his chorizo scramble. We ordered a carafe of mimosa and they gave us a whole bottle of sparkling wine and a carafe of orange juice.  Great deal for $32! Service was decent -- they filled up our water glasses when it was empty and checked on us twice during the meal.  We received our bill fairly quickly too. I would come back here again just for the mimosas! P.S. BF noted that they lack "meat" options on the brunch menu.  Many items do not contain meat.  This is great for vegetarians but not so good for us carnivores looking for a hearty meal.
What a gem!  You can tell from every aspect of the location, decor, menu, and even Yelp page - this is an privately owned restaurant with an owner oozing with passion. It's fantastic!!!  It's a small bistro with a beautiful bar area.  Waits can be long because of limited seating - so get a reservation for dinner.  Service is reasonable, but not quick - so don't come here for a quick in-and-out. I had the mushroom cakes, beet ravioli, and Apple tart.  INCREDIBLE!  Everything was creative, fresh, and chef-inspired. Believe me - you have to go here.  It's a top 5 Palo Alto restaurant without a doubt. Love it!!!
**MEH BRUNCH EXPERIENCE IN DOWNTOWN PALO ALTO** I met a girlfriend here for lunch and she warned me that it would be somewhat pricey. $16 for eggs benny was indeed. It was a warm and cutsey place in downtown Palo Alto with woodsy interior and ivy-lined exterior; walking distance from Whole Foods. ORDERED: *FRESH GRAPEFRUIT JUICE ($3.25) - Tasted fresh, not too sweet and not too sour. *BREAKFAST SUNDAE ($8) - Homemade granola, plain lowfat yourt, and fresh fruit was NOT impressive. Watermelon was not sweet and yogurt was bland. I can make this better at home. *BLUE MONKEY PANCAKES ($11) - Fresh 4 medium-sized banana and blueberry pancakes. Tasty, but nothing mind blowing. I had a bite of my girlfriend's egg benny which was toasted English muffin topped with ham, a slice of tomato, and poached egg and hollandaise sauce. This was their special dish and although it was good, I wouldn't say it was worth the $16 price tag nor anything compared to the excellent brunch places I have experienced in Portland. The hollandaise sauce was just plain A-OK. Brunch for 2 was around $50 without tax or tip. Service was not memorable. MEH.
Oh man we had to wait like 2 hours to get a table but it was worth it.  St Michael's is the type of place you go to when you want breakfast food done right.  They're famous for their Eggs Benedict and while I did not order that, I did get the REEEEDONKULOUSLY good Smoked Salmon Benedict.  I cannot stress how awesome it was.  The portion was just right too being not too little as well as not enough to induce a food coma. The service as I recall wasn't especially memorable but I think that's a good thing.  They did everything you'd expect from a "diamond in the rough" kind of joint.  I also shared a carafe of grapefruit juice with my friends and was pretty impressed by the freshness of the juice. Only con I can think of is that this is an annex of the main restaurant and it's pretty small so the wait is long.  That paired with their short brunch hours makes it very important to get there EARLY.  Well I guess one other con is that I have to drive all the way to Palo Alto for brunch now.  Wish they were closer...but if you're in the area, DEFINITELY give this joint a try!
Contemporary-style, sparklingly neat, tidy place, completely standing out of its rustic Palo Alto neighborhood, but completely blends in with the ambience. I tried the grilled scallops and they were amazing -- very fresh, juicy, big, came with right mix of vegetables, and tasted great. The atmosphere was very romantic, quiet but "California quiet" with a lot of attention from waiters and lots of happy people around. I was happy there.
Had Darjeeling tea and eggs Benedict. Out of this world good, with great service. It's small and quiet inside, which was perfect for a Sunday brunch.
This is a great place for brunch. There is often a wait but the food is worth it. Even though I try to order something different, I always go to the Eggs Benedict with the greatest hollandaise sauce or the Monkey pancakes. Dont forget the champagne and make sure you are hungry because the servings are large enough to share.
We came for brunch on a Sunday morning.  There were numerous parties waiting outside when we arrived.  The host said we would be seated in about 20 minutes for a party of two, but we actually waited double that.  This place is also small and would not be a good idea to bring in large parties unless you're willing to wait for hours.  I say, 6 people max.  If you're in a rush, find some place else. Busy as they were, it can get pretty crowded inside.  You'll be dodging waiters/waitresses and bus boys if you ever need to find your way back to the bathrooms.  (You have to walk through the kitchen to get there.)  The place isn't very infant-friendly either.  They have two single bathrooms and no changing table.  I also saw strollers parked outside.  (This is something I've started looking out for now that I'm expecting.)  ;) Here's what we had: St. Mike's Omelet ($15) - 3-eggs with bacon, spinach, caramelized onions, cheddar and cream cheese served with herbed gold yukon potatoes and a biscuit.  This omelet normally comes with mushrooms, but I substituted for onions instead.  So much tastier.  The cream cheese added a creamy texture and blended nicely with the rest of the ingredients.  The omelet was fabulous!   However,  I didn't care for the potatoes and biscuit at all.  The potatoes were overcooked and the biscuit was dry and crumbly.   4/5 French Toast ($11) - 3 large slices of rich challah (egg bread) topped with tons of sliced fresh strawberries (one for each bite) and dusted with powdered sugar with natural maple syrup and butter on the side.  This may be one of the best french toasts dishes I have ever tasted.  Not too sweet, fluffy, delicious.  It was perfect!  5/5 We were both happy with our choices and would definitely come back again.  Service was really good here and I love that they pack your leftovers for you when you're done eating.  That's always a plus in my book.
There's not much to complain about when coming here. I guess my only complaint would be waiting in line to get seated. There's always a wait, so come early if this is where you're headed. I always get the Salmon Eggs Benedict when I come here. This dish is so good I find it hard to break away and try something else. Service is great, ambiance is nice and it's just an overall nice spot for brunch. One of my favs.
I was a bit apprehensive when I arrived at St. Michael's Alley, as it was my third choice of eateries for the evening (the other two were booked solid well in advance), and my first impression was that the restaurant space was small and somewhat loud. I was afraid that our group of six wouldn't be able to converse and enjoy our meal together and that we would feel cramped and rushed. It turned out that my fears were unfounded. The noise level wasn't as much of an issue as I had anticipated, and though the tables are close together, the waiters and other patrons did not encroach too much upon us. Our waiter (a goateed fellow with a ponytail, whose name I've regrettably forgotten) was affable and efficient. The wine list here is fairly extensive, and focuses mostly on local vintages from the Santa Cruz Mountains. I eventually settled on a 2004 Storrs old-vine zinfandel for my party. We started with an order of crab wontons, and then got a red beet tart that was so tasty that we needed another of the same. My entree of choice was a fantastic cassoulet with duck confit - I would happily eat that again any time. Others enjoyed the gnocchi, the prosciutto-wrapped salmon, and the scallops with blood orange and fried polenta rounds. For dessert, I had a decent French apple tart and an excellent Savannah-Chanelle (also Sta. Cruz Mtns.) syrah port. I also sampled a profiterole with espresso gelato that was lusciously delicious. Overall, I found St. Michael's Alley to be a very pleasant experience from gastronomic and service standpoints, and at a price that won't break the bank. One small note: if you come on a rainy evening, try to avoid sitting under the skylight, since it has a slight leak.
Not a lot of great brunch options in Palo Alto, but this place can be a pleasant choice. Untraditional and upscale breakfast dishes, such as the egg scrambles with salmon or chicken. My ham and pineapple omlette was mildly and lightly sweet and savory. The side of potatoes were a bit drier and emaciated than I normally like (but ketchup solves all). Shrimp frittata looked cheerful and tasted hearty. Good cobb salad. Their cinnamon buns looked amazing . . . Perfectly charming (fresh flowers on the table) place with consistently friendly service. Oddly and incongrously enough, there are crayons and paper tablecloths on the tables (perhaps to  make it a more family friendly affair like Macaroni Grill?). Recommend eating inside rather than at the outside tables near the parked cars on Emerson.  3.5
Hooray for reliable yelp reviews and hooray for finally finding a great brunch place! Decor: very cutesy, cozy and romantic Service: friendly and attentive Price: a little pricier than most but the quality makes it understandable Food: Yum yum yum A few out-of-towner were visiting the Bay area for the first time so I wanted to find a place that would impress, both food quality and ambiance. This place is a win. They don't take reservations so it's best to come early. There's outdoor (very limited) and indoor seating (which isn't that big). We were lucky to only have to wait 5 minutes for a party of 6. Everything on the menu looks delicious, enough to have me come back again just to try everything. The presentation isn't anything out of the ordinary but taste wise, I was very impressed. The only orders I remember were the Smoked Salmon Bennedict and the Chilaquiles, both of which were amazing. I forget what everyone else ordered but I do remember everything tasting really good. Our bill came out to $100 for 6 people, which was more than I expected for brunch but I was so impressed (and full) from the food that I didn't mind. I am definitely coming here again. I need to try everything else on the menu.
** Review for Easter Brunch ** I saw the largely positive reviews on Yelp and thought that St. Michael's Alley would be a nice place to try for Easter Brunch. Fortunately, upon arrival at the no-reservations restaurant, we found a very minimal wait at 1 pm and proceeded to enjoy our meal. For Easter, like many places, St. Michael's Alley had a special prix-fixe menu, which they were kind enough to inform us about before seating us.  At $38/person, it wasn't the cheapest brunch but it wasn't as high as the nearby $75 buffet at Quattro in Palo Alto. Our selection started with two beverages and I had an excellent codder (cranberry and champagne) to start.  Our selections then consisted of the appetizers and entrees: Roasted Bell Pepper soup - a nice soup with a hint of sweet bell peppers Lentil soup - made w/ corned beef, it was flavorful. Smoked Salmon benedict - by far, my favorite item, it was one of the best benedicts I've had in a while.  The dry mustard and capers added a great touch and the smoked salmon was excellent Buttermilk Pancake Medley plus - consisted of two buttermilk pancakes, chicken-apple sausage, and a fruit dish.  Nice sausage and buttery pancakes....solid, if unspectacular.  Probably in hindsight not the best choice for a $38 meal At the end of the meal, I thought we had a nice brunch on a gorgeous sunny day.  I was a bit taken back by the bill though: $95 for two.  From what I've heard about the regular menu pricing, there definitely was a price premium for Easter (and probably a reason for the reasonable wait times for a table) and an automatic 18% tip for all tables vs. the usual of only for tables of 6 or more.  The service was fine, so I have no real qualms, but I personally prefer places that let you tip as you feel warranted. Given the great Yelp reviews, I'd love to come back on a non-holiday, and next time, I'll be more cognizant of the price hikes on the holidays. (it's supposedly a good Valentine's Day spot...given the price hikes, probably not for me.) As always, I also found out: NO American Express accepted.
Went here for brunch and it was excellent. It's a pretty small restaurant so we had a small wait before we were seated. I had the cream of cauliflower and the smoked salmon eggs benedict. The cream of cauliflower was delicious. You can really taste the flavor of cauliflower. MMmmmm... It goes great with bread! Yums! The smoked salmon eggs benedict was awesome too! Eggs were perfectly poached, mixed with capers... drool! sooo good! The downside: It's kinda pricey for smoked salmon eggs benedict though... $18! yikes! Also they forgot to give us a muffin. :( I wanted my muffin. The tables next to us had muffins that I couldn't stop staring at. Another small thing that kinda bothered me... my soup came out for 1 minute and the eggs benedict showed up. I didn't have time to even enjoy my soup without worrying that my eggs benedict would go cold. Ended up just wolfing down everything. Indigestion here I come! Will definitely come back here to try again! I'll ask for my muffin this time! :)
Ah, St. Michael's, we meet again.  I was reunited with my beloved on my recent quick trip.  We had love in the afternoon as dear Michael fed me sausages, pancakes, and eggs over easy.  I let out a food coma sigh as I lit my noncancerous cigarette (ever hear of poetic license?). The brunch will kill you softly.  It is dirtily good.  I love eggs Benedict, and it is spot on here with that perfect lemon-laced tang.  The eggs Florentine is wonderful as well.  Someone at my table always gets the St. Mike's Omelet (crispy bacon bits, spinach, sauteed mushrooms, cheddar and cream cheese).  Their French toast is to die for.  Made out of rich challah, it is moist, plush, and spongy, and topped with fresh strawberries.  I recommend a stack of blue monkey pancakes--blueberries and bananas swirled in the batter.  Oh, and definitely try the special pancakes when offered, like cinnamon apple and peanut butter.  The salads are fresh and flavorful and the ABC burger is pretty tasty.  I am a brunch lover, so I stick to the mimosas and brekkie stuff.  To mix it up, I sometimes ask for a codder--cranberry juice and Champagne. The venue is darling as well.  Quaint, good old-fashioned hospitality, sunshine radiates from the windows and touches all.  On a beautiful day--and there are many in Palo Alto--enjoy your meal outside.  Either way, you should leave with a post-coital glow.
Been here a few times now for lunch and it's always a solid brunch.  Recently tried the burger which was REALLY good.  Good spot for team lunches as they have a good amount of space.  We go here sporadically to celebrate special occasions (new product launch, new hire for team, holidays, etc).  Good service, great food, beautiful space.
One word to describe St. Michael's alley: quaint. It's a great location in sunny Palo Alto. The space itself is on the small side but well decorated. As I waited 20 minutes to eat on a Saturday afternoon the customers were all raving about their previous experiences at St. Michael's alley. I had the special which was a huevos rancheros. I was impressed when they actually told me the price of the special. The huevos rancheros were very good. For $16 it wasn't mind-blowing but I would definitely have them again. If you're on Caltrain, St. Michael is only a 5 minute walk from the station. A great place for brunch. I would highly recommend it.
Dear St. Michael's Alley, I hope it's ok that I call you Mike? Good. So, Mike, I've been here about 5 times in the last year and a half, and I've always thought of you as a glamor brunch place. The type of place that's great to bring a date, for ladies who lunch, or for a family gathering. You've got elegant dishes, a sidewalk dining area, a nice interior, and, until today, good service. I'm not sure exactly what happened between our last visit and this one, but service today isn't what we expected. We had excellent service in terms of getting added to the waiting list and being updated on the status of our table, and then it went dramatically downhill. Our server took awhile before asking if we wanted drinks. Once we did get our lukewarm coffee, we practically had to send up flares to get a refill and our Splenda (thanks to my S.O. for that). We eventually managed to flag down a different server to get more coffee, since ours was nowhere to be found. The food arrived -- I ordered the Breakfast Medley with blueberry pancakes, and my S.O. got the Spring Vegetable Scramble. Both meals were tasty, so no complaints about the food itself, except for the fairly steep price. If only we could have installed a coffee carafe at our table because after 5 minutes, our server still hadn't checked up on us to see how our meal was and if we needed anything. We finally got his attention, and he seemed less than pleased to have to walk across the restaurant. So, Mike, while we've enjoyed visiting you in the past, we are going to have to take a break. In this economy, it would help you out to have servers that provide quality service to match the quality dishes you serve. For food alone, I'd give you 4 stars. For service today, I'd give 2. Average 3. Yours truly, Wendy K.
I came here the other day for my friend's baby shower. It was a Saturday brunch. This place is pretty small, but they set up a long table for us in the middle of the restaurant and found places for our gifts and things under the bar and upstairs. Our server did an excellent job taking care of our party. It may have been a little difficult to deal with us as we were busy chatting and didn't necessarily comply with the "schedule" but she seemed to be able to manage our party along with her other customers well. The fresh squeezed orange juice was really delicious and the food were equally good. There were so many great choices so one of my friends and I decided to split the St. Michael's omelet and french toast with strawberries. The omelet came with bacon, spinach, mushrooms and cream cheese and it was huge. It also had a biscuit and some really delicious country potatoes. My only critique would be that I wish that the cream cheese was spread a little more evenly throughout the omelet. The way they had it, it was in the middle so one bite had way too much while the others didn't have any. The french toast was good, but there wasn't anything unique about it. I definitely would like to come back here again and see what other menu offerings they have.
On a whim my girlfriend and I decided to head to Palo Alto for brunch. I find I always get stuck when trying to pick a place for breakfast/lunch. It seems like in San Jose finding a good place to eat is like a man... hard to find!  So we decided to go outside our comfort zone and head to Palo Alto, what a concept! It was a great day, the sun was out and it wasn't ridiculously hot. We were going to check out a couple different spots and went to St. Michaels Alley first. We decided that the quiet, quaint place was more what we were feeling like then diner food. We sat outside and pondered over the menu. The options were slim, but they still looked good. I went with the Andouille Sausage Scramble (special of the day) with andouille sausage, cheese, caramelized onion, and roasted red pepper. It was prepared well, but the flavor was lacking a bit. My friend had the St. Mike's Omelette with bacon, sauteed mushrooms, spinach, cheddar cheese, and cream cheese. Now that was tasty! The service was good, the food was scrumptious and the company made for a really nice Sunday afternoon. Not to mention after breakfast we walked around a bit to work off our breakfast and stumbled upon the 2008 Firefighters Olympics...Is it me or is it getting hot in herrreee?!
WOW!! WOW!!! We were looking for a brunch place and figured any review that said "I wanted to lick the plate" was a good place to go.  That review couldn't have been more right. We got there right at 11 since we thought it would be crowded on a Saturday morning, but it wasn't that bad.  They were able to seat 6 of us rather quickly. I had the Salmon Benedict and it was hands down one of the best dishes I have had.  We also got a corn risotto for the table to share and I think we ended up scraping the plate!  The only sounds coming from our mouths were MMMMMMM. The atmosphere is nice and relaxing and the service is top notch. Can't wait to go again.
St. Michael's Alley is hands down my favorite place for brunch in the whole wide world.  I can't believe I haven't had the pleasure of dining here for lunch or dinner, but if the countless amazing brunches I've had here are any indicator, I'm sure it's beyond wonderful.  I absolutely love the atmosphere: classy, but casual.  The quality of their food is unrivaled. I don't understand why people complain about the wait? The longest I've waited was maybe 15 minutes and given that it's a rather small restaurant and not to mention all around incredible brunch, it's a given that it will be busy and there may be a wait.  I will gladly wait any day of the week(end).   Another complaint I don't understand are the prices?  It doesn't seem that their prices are any more expensive than the next?  I find it very reasonable.  Plus their dishes are SO fresh and savory, you can tell that they must use only the best ingredients. My favorite dishes are Eggs Benedict (a lot of places slap on a slab of thick ham, but St. Mike's uses fresh, thinly sliced delicious ham on theirs, it's just heavenly) and the french toast- honestly the BEST french toast I've ever had.  They use challah bread which is perfect and so scrumptious.  The freshly sliced strawberries with powdered sugar on top make this dish a piece of perfection.  The overall presentation is beautiful.  I also enjoy a glass of fresh orange juice. To top it all off, the service at St. Mike's is unparalleled.  The wait staff seem like they take such pride in their work which is something I'm really only used to seeing in Europe.  They are so friendly and helpful, happy to accommodate you in any way possible.  They really shape your experience at St. Michael's Ally.
Let me just say that the local yelpers did not let me down. If you love brunch, then you make to make it out to St. Michael's Alley!!! The hubby and I came our around 1:00 pm on Saturday, Feb. 20th and we were able to get seated right away. If you're not familiar with the area, it may take you awhile to find it since the restaurant is so small. It's really close to the Whole Foods Market. Anyhow, I never thought an omelet could be so good. I mean an omelet is an omelet right, NO way!!! This omelet was out of this world. It is called St. Mike's Omelet, filled with spinich, bacon, mushrooms, cream cheese, cheddar cheese and of course eggs. Came with homemade potoates and a freshly made biscuit!!! Yum, my mouth is watering just thinking of it. I also had a glass of grapefruit juice with was out of this world. It felt like I was on Iron Chef judging these amazing food items. I know, a little much but definitely amazing. The husband had the burger with fries and told me it was amazing. He scarfed it down so quick I don't remember really seeing the full plate. The restaurant closes at 2:00 pm on Saturday so do come a bit early so you don't have to rush. It was so hard to decide what to eat, breakfast or lunch but I am bound to go back for other goodies. This place is unassuming and quaint. Nothing fru fru about it. The only tricky part is finding parking on the streets, depending on traffic this may take a little while. Hands down, my favorite brunch place and yes I would make the trip all the way from Dublin!!!
We had our Easter brunch at the St. Michael's Alley and it was good but it did not wow me for the price.  They had a special prix fixe menu for $38 per person and it came with 2 beverages, 1 soup/salad, and 1 entree.  The beverages included juice, soda, mimosa, codder (cran and champagne), coffee, tea and expresso drink.  I should've double fist with a mimosa and codder to make it more worthwhile.  I had the smoked salmon eggs benedict and it was pretty good.  The dry mustard and caper added some kick to it.  My mate had the medley with pancake, eggs and sausage.  It was a typical brunch plate that you can get anywhere.  One thing I have to mention is the pancake, it was very buttery and excellent. One thing I dismay about this place is that they automatically charged 18% gratuity for a meal for two.  I can understand auto gratuity for a party of more than 6, but party of 2? Why don't I get to choose how much to tip based on the service I get? Don't get me wrong, the service is not bad, but I like to have a choice. At the end of the day, brunch for two was $95.  Great atmosphere.  Food was good but not spectacular.  Very pricey for Easter brunch. Hopefully the regular brunch menu is better.
I've found my brunch spot in Palo Alto. This place is everything I've been looking for - quaint, relaxing atmosphere, diverse menu, pleasant waitstaff. We had the salmon benedict which was out of this world!!  The eggs were perfectly poached and the hollandaise sauce was sprinkled with paprika for extra flavor and a great presentation.  The potatoes that came on the side were perfectly crispy as well. The monkey pancakes were delicious too - four large pancakes mixed with blueberries and bananas - MMmm! I'll definitely be going back next weekend!
Came here for dinner on Saturday night with another couple.  The service was friendly and helpful- very professional wait staff.  Great wine, fabulous food, I would definitely eat here again.  Could be nice and romantic for a dinner out with the BF. I had the steak which was just delicious and a spring salad with goat cheese (yummy).  There is a large variety of wines on the wine list in all price ranges, and waiter was very helpful in selecting one that was both a good price and would go well with the meal. The one drawback is the atmosphere.  It is a beautiful place, but on Saturday night at 9pm our party was the only one in the restaurant that did not have white hair.  Not exactly a happening young spot. If you do happen to go there, check out the picture and letter posted beside the bathroom door from Bill Clinton.  Apparently the Clinton's also enjoyed St. Michael's alley.
This is the place where you can find the best pancakes in town for Sunday brunch!! I have been here over 10 times for brunch, and every time I am further impressed by their pancake specials. It is rare to find a cook that does not over-beat their pancake batter and thus make the pancakes too dense - but the chef at St. Michael's Alley is definitely in the know about how to cook. Thus, the pancakes here just melt as soon as it hits your mouth. Always try their specials for brunch. In case none of the specials sound appealing (a rare occurance), just go with the classic standard, The Blue Monkey Pancakes (a mix of blueberries and bananas - ummm)! Brunch on Sunday starts at 10 AM and the place does not take reservations. So, get their early, or be prepared for your party to wait. However, the food is worth any wait! Enjoy!
St. Michael's Alley is very...Palo Alto. It's a Michelin recommended restaurant with all that you would expect of such a place: beautiful food, high prices, and bougsie customers drinking mimosas while petting their well-groomed dogs outside. Since you can't make reservations for brunch, waiting is inevitable. However, there is a Whole Foods and Peet's across the street for you to hang out at while you wait. Now onto the food. The past two times I have gone, I ordered the waffles and the French Toast. Both were really good--overpriced, but good. Their scrambles are fairly standard, but the home fries are amaazing! Mm, I'd definitely consider ordering a mediocre scramble for a side of the home fries. Their Eggs Florentine is tasty as well. The biscuits are a bit on the dry side, but go very well with the slightly runny egg and hollandaise...mmm! And...as someone mentioned before, their Blue Monkey pancakes are really good. I usually hate pancakes, but these are a definite exception. They taste amazing with just a touch of maple syrup and go down well with the fresh squeezed orange juice-champagne deliciousness of their mimosas. I've always gone with a good-sized group and have been impressed with how they accommodate. Definitely go with people you like because service is a bit slow, which gives you a loot of time to talk! :)
This was another of our brunch locations. Great for kids.  They can draw on the table cloth and the acoustics are such that a little extra noise isn't noticed (it's not too loud though).  The food took quite a while, but maybe I just thought that because we had to wait for so long to be seated... Every dish was outstanding.  It's not cheap, but hey...it's Palo Alto.  The potatoes were seasoned and cooked to crispy perfection and not oily.  I had an omelet with brie in it which I never would have imagined...it was to die for.
BF: What are you thinking of having? Me: Ummm...blue monkey pancakes. You? Did you see the mediteranean fritatta? That looks good. I think you'd like that one. Mmmm...hmmm. BF: I'm not sure...the pancakes sound kind of good. Me: You can have some of my pancakes. Probably anyway. But doesn't that fritatta look good? BF: Okay, okay, I'll get the fritatta. I assume I have to share it with you? Me: *Brandishes fork menacingly* I love the blue monkey pancakes here. I'm not even a big pancake person but these are really pancakes done right. The fritatta is soooo good though, and it comes with roasted yukon gold potatoes that are really nicely seasoned. Maybe next time I'll have the fritatta and steal some of my bf's pancakes...just to mix things up a bit. Don't forget to get a mimosa or two...soooo good. Someday soon we are coming here for dinner, but for now it's our brunch spot numero uno. I only wish brunch went past 2pm.
Had brunch with a group of friends (6 people) at St. Mike's over Labor Day weekend.  While the restaurant does not take reservations for brunch, the host is happy to put you down on the list if you stop by earlier (he took my name, party size, and time we wished to dine, and saved us a table as it became available but did not seat us until our party was complete).  I ordered the Chilaquiles and thought that it was excellent.  The waitress humored me and allowed me to order the dish without ham, cheese, and sour cream and also with the eggs well done - my meal came out as I had specified, and all of the ingredients looked and tasted fresh.  The portion size was just right for me, but I can see how a large dude could leave hungry.  Prices are a bit high for brunch fare but not entirely unreasonable for the location of the restaurant and the quality of their ingredients. While waiting around for my friends, I perused their wines-by-the-glass list which included a number of wines from local wineries (no, not local as in Napa or Sonoma, but local as in Santa Clara & Santa Cruz counties - the wine list was reminiscent of that at Vino Locale, but of course, a lot shorter).  In general, I like restaurants that have an interesting wine list, so that definitely earns brownie points for St. Mike's.
The situation: 11 hungry people, brunch, and one tiny little restaurant.  It was so bustling at St. Michael's Alley on a Saturday morning that I felt waitresses, staff, and the manager kept flying out from every corner I chose to stand at.  It's a cute little place and based on crowds, the Zagat certificates and accolades posted to the window, it's popular and well-known.  Note that they also do not take reservations. The manager was nice enough to give us hope that he could find a way to accommodate our large party (although, I suspect that hope was stretched into the region of exaggeration).  Well over one hour later, we were finally seated along one wall of the restaurant.  There's a nice list of brunch items, including various pancakes, waffles, omelets, and egss benedict.  For those who aren't crazy about brunch, such as some folks in our party, salads and the burger & fries are also some options. I shared the Eggs Florentine and Belgian Waffle with my cousin - loved the first and was not impressed with the second.  The Eggs Florentine was a flavorful benedict with sauteed mushrooms and spinach atop a buttered English muffin.  A savory and more fancy brunch option that I devoured.  The Belgian Waffle came with an apple compote and cream topping.  I thought the topping was much tastier than the waffle, which was disappointingly thick and dry. While I wasn't blown away by my first experience here, I would definitely give it another try as it looks like a nice cozy spot for a date or a small group.
I called two days ahead for a Saturday reservation for a party of 4 @ 6:30pm. The receptionist paused and let me know she could make the reservation, but there was a party coming in at 7:30pm.  WTF?!? She SHOULD have said, we don't have the slot open, but if you wanted to come in at 6pm, it's available.  I don't like time constraints on my dinner. I called her out and asked, "Do restaurants usually limit dining time?" She didn't answer directly, but she did apologize for the inconvenience, mentioning they have very few tables and they will be moving to a new location soon. Mid-afternoon on Saturday, I found out that we could dine at 5:30pm, so I called and a gentleman answered.  He was more than happy to accommodate our party at the earlier time, but again, he had to slide in that we would have TWO hours to dine.  Grr. We plug the addy in the GPS and we're off!!!  I'm stoked that we don't have to travel on UNIVERSITY to get to EMERSON.  We avoid all the headache from the traffic and pedestrians. Plenty of parking lots and street parking. We entered the restaurant and it is truly charming: rich dark woods and terra cotta walls.  Very warm and inviting.  Just like the staff. We started with great glasses of Syrah and Pinot Gris. The food on the menu really reflects the produce of the season: Butternut squash & goat cheese tart $6 Sent this back to the kitchen, it was a mushy, cheesy mess. Wild Mushroom Cake $6 Pan fried, w/fragrant crispy leeks on top, mild mushroom flavor & tasted quite healthy.  This could be an entree.  It was huge. Crispy Chicken & Mushroom Wontons $9 DELICIOUS!!!  Use the soy ginger dipping sauce.  The filling was seasoned perfectly.  Our server was willing to switch out the butternut tart for another order of the wontons.  Each order comes with four. Check out the salads, fresh, great dressing & ingredients. Grilled NY Pepper steak $28 The steak was lean and the green peppercorn sauce was to die for.  I like the steamed broccoli on the side and the twist on au gratin with rutabaga. Pan Roasted Duck Breast 5-6 medium sized pieces of duck.  Succulant, tender and satisfying.  Sides are wild rice, haricot verts & baby carrots. Fresh herb marinated roasted Chicken Breast $19 Gorgeous presentation w/soft polenta & a nice complimentary sauce. Wonderful experience.  Quaint location, perfect service and great CA style food.  Good enough for me to forget the phone fiasco.  I'll be waiting patiently for the new location.
JF and I had an early brunch here on Saturday. Neither of us could decide between salty or sweet, so we ended up each ordering one and sharing-- the best of both worlds! JF ordered the omelette special (ham, brie cheese, green onions) while I ordered the pancake special (lemon poppy seed covered with fresh sliced strawberries and fresh whipped cream). The tangy citrus scent of the lemons preceded the pancakes... and it smelled mouthwateringly delicious. Unfortunately, the food itself didn't live up to the potential in the aroma, and was only ok. For brunch places, I still prefer Hobees... and although I don't want to admit this, the omelettes at OPH are better than the one I had at St. Michael's Alley.
Very cute little place... went in today for a St. Mike's omelet.. it was pretty typical.. nothing really too special about it..  the service was good and the it's in a very nice neighborhood.. so i guess we might give it another try another time
Went for a dinner date with the hubby. Sat at the bar. Drinks were wonderful. I had cocktails that were tasty and not stingy with the liquor. My husband was more than satisfied with the beer selection. Food was also very good. This will become a usual date night place for us.
YUM! Came here for brunch one Saturday to catch up with my girlfriend when our hubbies were busy. The good:  the food was delicious!  I had the Eggs Benedict, which had perfectly cooked eggs and wonderful hollandaise sauce. The bad: 1. Expensive.  We didn't order anything else except one brunch entree each and the bill still came to close to $20 a person (no drinks, nothing!) 2. Confused wait staff.  There were a few large parties so they pushed together all the 2-top tables to accommodate them.  There were about 3 4-tops open when we arrived, but they wouldn't seat us in one of those and kept us waiting for a 2-top for quite a while until we finally convinced them that the other tables were far from being done. I will definitely go back though, because the food was good, and I can overlook the probably one-time service issues.  But, it'll have to be for a special occasion or if I win the lottery.
It's really nice to find a solid breakfast joint in the area.  It's not your standard Carrow's or Stacks - what's with the  fascination for generic breakfast foods.... oily omelettes aren't better when served in mass quantities. And even IHop pancakes are better than Stack's! St Michael's has amazing fresh-baked cranberry muffin, creative omelettes, and mmm ... blueberry banana pancakes! The best part? I can make a stop at Fraiche next door for some Blue Bottle Coffee or a morning pick-me-up Froyo.
This place reeks of old white ladies/housewives on their lunch dates after a tiring day at the country club. i didn't realize it was *that* kind of brunch restaurant; i felt so out of place there in my tank top and shorts. Not to mention being the only table of color there. and also, the dining area has TERRIBLE acoustics - we had to yell across the table because it was so damn loud. Because of that, I'm bumping them down from 4 stars to 3.5 (you get a 3 star rating, St. Mike's). ANYWAYS...ambiance aside, I am extremely happy with my food, as were the other diners I was with. I ordered the seared ahi tuna sandwich, which came with a light side salad. the tuna was extremely tender and fresh, and the focaccia bread was the perfect texture and softness. it was an interesting and memorable dish, b/c of the pickled ginger. my friends all got burgers - the ABC burger and a burger which was the special of the day. There were no complaints at the table. The portions were big enough that we all politely took home half our sandwiches (which I secretly ate immediately upon returning home). we topped off the meal with a peach tarte tartin. the name was more special than the actual dish, just looked like glazed peaches over a danish with icecream. but i don't know much about sweets... The food is good and worth the money. I'm interested in trying out their weekend brunch, if I can find a housewife from palo alto who doesn't mind shouting to join me...
I liked this place a lot. The staff is very friendly and accommodating. I was just standing outside waiting for some friends and the hostess came out and asked if she should set a table for me and my soon to be here friends. She went ahead and set it up for the 4 certain that were coming. Later on right as we were ordering two others called to say they would join us for brunch. The staff was like no prob and moved us to a bigger table in a matter of minutes. When we all arrived our food came out in waves so we each got to eye everyone else's dish. There was a chorizo scramble on special that day that I was sold on as soon as she said chorizo. I was a little turned off by the mention of home fries (the thought of greasy mushy potatoes came to mind) but I ordered anyways. When it came out it was awesome. The scramble was perfect and the home fries ... I was wow'd. They were crisp (not burned) flavorful and no hint of grease or oil and just a hint of spices. Tasted sooo good. They have fresh juices and fruit too. It's a little hard to recognize from the outside, I drove by it so many times and it has shown up in Yelp searches for a while so I was dying to try this place. I want to come back and try the french toast. Sounded awesome. I would actually just return for the very sweet staff. They rocked.  I would recommend this place for anyone looking out for brunch. The other location is apparently down the block and this one is only open for lunch. I need to try that one at some point too.
I came here with my girlfriend for Sunday brunch around 11:30am.  The restaurant is so cute inside and has 4 small tables outside so you can enjoy the weather.  It was beautiful today, so we decided to sit outside for breakfast. We were starving, so it was awesome that there was a table available to us immediately.  Their brunch menu doesn't have a lot of options, but just enough that it will satisfy most.  We had the following (pictures attached): St. Mike's Omelette- Crispy bacon, sauteed mushrooms, spinach, cheddar cheese, and cream cheese.  OMG this was sooo tasty.   The egg wasn't super thick and dry like a lot of omelettes can be.  The egg was light and perfectly cooked.  The inside was full of the tasty ingredients.  They definitely don't skimp at all...tons of ingredients in the omelette, large portion of yukon potatoes, and biscuit.  It costs $15, but it was worth it in my opinion. Andouille Sausage Scramble (special of the day)- andouille sausage, cheese, caramelized onion, and roasted red pepper.  I had a few bites of this and it was good.  The eggs were scrambled perfectly and the dish had good flavor. Side of Chicken Apple Sausage- Yum, these were delicious and juicy. It was just the two of us for breakfast and let me tell you, it took a LOT of restraint on my part not to order the french toast or blue monkey pancakes as an "appetizer".   Looking around, everyone's dishes looked delicious.  The eggs benedict really caught my eye. I would definitely come back to St. Michael's Alley for brunch or dinner.  The service is wonderful and so is the food.  It is definitely on the expensive side, but I feel that it's worth it.
So, according to the stars that this restaurant has, it must be from brunch; I should have come here for that instead of dinner....although, after the experience I had, I'm really not sure if this restaurant pulls off any decent service.  I came here on Wednesday night in celebration of my birthday.......Not a good birthday dinner. We had a late reservation, at 9:00, which they must not be used to. We were told when we made the reservation not to be late, because they stop seating at 9:15 (huh? but they close at 9:30....doesn't that mean they seat until 9:30??). Then we were pretty rushed through dinner, and weren't even offered dessert, just a check dropped off and the server gone. I love dessert and almost always order it. I was really sad, especially since it was my birthday, you have to order dessert for your birthday!! The service bad: seated for about 10 minutes before greeted, and she did see us and walk by our table plenty of times....just didn't want to say hi I guess. Bussers are hard workers, but never smiled or talked, just poured us water and left. Server just not attentive at all. Never asked how are food was, or if we needed anything else. There was absolutely no personality or relationship with her. The real disappointment though was the food.  When I read about this restaurant it was said to be all about local, seasonal, farm fresh ingredients. Great, I LOVE that mentality in a restaurant and was really excited to have some of their California cuisine. Yea.......it was just BAD. All the meats were overcooked, I got a special chicken ravioli that was in no way made in house. They were defiantly mass produced by some purveyor, and they tasted like it, then drench in some canned ragu. The tomato quiche that's all the rave was soggy, overcooked....gross, undoubtedly previously frozen.  Terrible risotto (can't even call it that, just soggy undercooked rice with no flavor). EVERYTHING completely over garnished, if you can't eat it, no use putting it on my plate! There was absolutely nothing fresh and seasonal about this food. On the upside.....The mussel app that we got was fantastic.  The mussels were nice and tender, the sauce was really delicious, we all sopped it up with bread. If all their food was more like this dish....This restaurant would be a winner. This restaurant has so much potential and I really wanted to love it, the food and service was just too horrid. Word of advice, save your money until they do a complete menu change, one that will hopefully be more towards what their concept is all about.
Unfortunately the restaurant is on their Labor Day weekend hiatus now that  I'm back in town, but some dear friends were here a couple of weeks ago and guess what? The coffee was delicious, night and day they said, you wouldn't believe it came out of the same place. Just wanted to say thank you. Currently my favorite brunch spot in the south bay! Food: 3-4 (depending on what you order) Ambiance: 3.75 Service: 3 (the weekend host...he's the worst part, sorry) Noise: 3.5 Price: $30 average with tax and tip.
3.5* Returned for a late afternoon Brunch but this time... A. Summer Brunch Menu -Smoked salmon... Read more 
Very cute little brunch spot.  I love the ambiance and homey/adorable decor. The service is commendable, but not spectacular or memorable.  I was also surprised that they don't allow simple substitutions.  My bf asked for the eggs benedict but they wouldn't allow the tomatoes to be subbed w/ spinach so he went for the eggs florentine instead. Good presentation and pretty tastey.  I had the belgian waffles which you really can't go wrong with. I loved that they weren't stingy with the bananas and they even added strawberries upon my request.  I ate up everything! And of course, I judge my brunch place by the lattes.  My almond latte was delicious and served tongue burning hot.  Perfect.  I hope to go back and try the blue monkey pancakes. We arrived around 10:15 on Saturday and there was no wait and parking was not a problem.
This place is great. I've been there a couple times with my team for work lunches, and they have a yummy, seasonal menu. Both lunch dishes (salmon plate and eggplant sandwich) were excellent. Today my partner and I went for brunch. We woke up early, so we got there around 10:40 am. We easily found street parking and were seated immediately. The place was pretty full, but there wasn't a wait. The food was delicious. I had french toast, and they top it with all these fresh strawberries. My girlfriend had eggs florentine and said it was the best one she's ever had.  The only reason I don't give it 5 stars is because the service can be kind of shotty. Today, we had to wait pretty long for our food which meant we were kind of tipsy after nearly finishing our mimosas on an empty stomach while waiting. But maybe this is a good way to start the day? I'd also mention that you want to get here early. We ran some errands on foot in downtown Palo Alto after brunch, and when we passed the restaurant on the way back to our car around noon, the place was packed.
YUM! I loooooove brunch =) so I may be a bit biased. We got the Blue Monkey pancakes (blueberry & banana -- cute huh?) and Eggs Benedict. The pancakes were good, although I think I like the blue more than the monkey, and the eggs were good too. Also had a mimosa -- I don't think you could ever mess one of those up! The place is super cute too! Huge pictures (or paintings? Don't remember, don't really care haha) hanging on the walls and chandeliers dangling from the ceilings, love it. Only downside is that they DON'T and absolutely refuse to do substitutions. We wanted the St. Mike's omelette with sausage instead of bacon and she said N-O-spells NO! How hard could it be to do one tiny substitution? It's not like I asked them to totally change the recipe... but I guess if you allow change from one customer, then you have to for all customers and that could get pretty hectic in the kitchen. Besides that, this place is awesome and I'd love to come here again!
I love brunch. I liked brunch here. My vegetarian omelet was delicious, and the fluffiest eggs I'd ever seen. My mimosa was good, too. It's more expensive than having brunch in the midwest, but I guess that's a location issue. I'd definitely advise sitting outside too- especially if you're from out of town. Everyone in town seems really jaded about how lovely the weather is.
Their freshly baked muffins are delicious.  Pretty much everything we've tried here has been delicious!  We've tried their: St. Mike's omelet, eggs benedict, waffle with fresh fruit, whole wheat pappardelle (pasta), risotto... all of these have been top-notch. The only reason why it's 4 stars and not 5 is that it's slightly on the pricey side... but it's not a bad deal, considering the quality of the food & the ambiance.
I lived in Palo Alto/Mountain View for 2 years, 2 years ago, and I always forget what a great place St. Michael's Alley is.  It's just the right amount of adorable, with big windows, daisies in vases, and 3 unique, but different chandeliers. I'd been for dinner one or two times, but only recently did I try their brunch.  Where had I been all those two years?!!!  Why bother with the hassle of Judy's or Cafe Brioche (are those still even open?) when I could have perfectly cooked eggs and fantastical french toasts.
It is very charming location and the service was impeccable. We have driven by a couple times on a yelp quest, but they do not open until 10am, a little late for our usual breakfast, but  we were able to hold out over this past weekend for breakfast/brunch. We sat at the bar cause we did not want to wait any longer (however the wait did appear minimal.) The service there was really spectacular, I cannot say enough about the speed, efficiency and charm, very impressed! The food was fresh although a little pricey (1-St Mike's omelet, 1-Shrimp Frittata, one OJ and one tea was about $45.) If I wasn't preggers I would love to try the Codder (Cranberry Champi) so we will have to come back. Would be nice if they had more non-pork egg options....
Good food... pretty good service.... nice setting... not tooooo badly priced.  3 drinks, appetizer, 3 entres for $55 before tip.  Not somewhere I'd go every day.. .but it's good to know that places like this are out there for slightly longer or special lunches. Not a bad experience at all.. a nice little quaint place.
Had dinner here the other night. It's a rare restaurant where upwards of 90% of the menu cannot be easily ruled out, but this place manages lots of variety on a seasonally changing menu. Great location too; extensive wine list; service was better than some of the other reviews I'm reading. I only wish the food was as great as the menu looked. Still worth a return visit, to give dinner another go or to explore the brunch options.
I think I might need to eat here again and order something different. I ordered the 'Curried Vegetable Scramble' which was okay at best. I thought I'd be adventurous that day and try something new but after a few bits regretted my meal choice. Oh well... Service was great, but at that price point and wait time it better be. Our party of three had to wait for about 45 minutes to be seated. The hostess recommended I leave my number so she can ring me when our table was ready which was a nice of her to do. I'll definitely be going back.
This place is the real deal.  We eat brunch here mostly but the burger is awesome as well.  Looking forward to trying the rest of the menu. A great out of the way place with a nice bar and outdoor patio, too!
Oh Saint Michael's Alley. Trapped in this vast brunch wasteland (Hobee's? Really?), I tried so hard to like it. Maybe too hard, and all the disappointment has hardened into betrayal. Fact the first: Pretty decent but unremarkable brunch fare, slapped up with the 30% smug Palo Alto surcharge. Very tasty muffins, especially with an indulgent slather of butter. Tasty, big omelettes, and an overall good relationship with that culinary enigma, the egg. Caveat to fact the first: I did once order a bacon/spinach omelette and was promptly felled by violent food poisoning. This was about two years ago. And honestly I probably had it coming. Fact the second: TERRIBLE SERVICE. Egregious. Truly, the atrocity of their service must somehow be written into the restaurant's mission statement. On my eight or nine visits, it's gone so far beyond the standard brunch "can't get a table/never refilled water glass is a symbol for my meaningless life" service angst. The last time we were there, my party of three was asked to move tables MID-MEAL so the restaurant could accommodate a larger party. Once, a waitress dropped a full pitcher of OJ on our table, and did not offer anything for our trouble. Substitutions made to our orders without asking, looooong waits for food, and -- my personal bugaboo -- not informed that the food I ordered was unavailable until minutes after my companions had already received their own orders. Fact the third: What, you want a good brunch with decent service at a non-extortion price in Palo Alto? Tough. Friggin'. Luck.
After seeing all the great reviews, I decided I have to give St. Michael's a try. The line is pretty long, no surprise, so it's a good thing they are real close to Whole Foods. In addition, the service was slow (tho nice) and the hostess wasn't the most pleasant. Had the french toast with fresh strawberries. The slides were fluffy, good but basic compared to Bill's Cafe or Naglee Park Garage. Breakfast medley was pretty decent and again, basic, but the $13 price tag is a bit much for 2 eggs, 2 strips of bacon, 2 pancakes and potatoes. For a place that has a location for just brunch, I have to say I expected better.
I'm afraid that the quality and service during brunch may have fallen a bit since the opening of their other restaurant.  The excellent, warm service of the past feels more scattered and absent-minded now, and we haven't enjoyed our brunches as much on the last few occasions unfortunately. It is still a cute option for brunch, but I am downgrading from "I'm a fan" to just "A-OK."
St. Michael's Alley is one of my long time favorites for brunch.  I love their Blue Monkey pancakes!... Read more 
Went here for brunch with a friend of mine. The St. Mike's omelettehad mushrooms, spinach, cheese, bacon, and cream cheese. I was a little wary of the cream cheese but it turned out to be great! The potatoes/hashbrowny thingies were tasty too. The place had a very quaint atmosphere that small places like that usually have. Fancy enough that it makes you feel sophisticated but not too fancy where coming in with shorts makes you feel underdressed. The place did seem small and it got kindof busy the longer we stayed, so you may want to put your name in earlier. Was a bit pricey but the portions are pretty big so its worth it if you're willing to put down more than $10 on an omelette.
Have had this place on the list for awhile and had a chance to try it this weekend -- unfortunately, it definitely did not live up to the hype for me.  It was expensive with a side of foofiness that the food quality doesn't live up to. I had unremarkable breakfast potatoes (way much rosemary for my taste) and unsatisfying sausage (I'd prefer Italian sausage to chicken apple, personally).  Folks I was with tried pancakes, various breakfast combos, and the eggs Benedict -- consensus was the food was acceptable but not really worth the $11-$18 people spent for it. Also, the cinnamon roll was hard and difficult to cut through -- wtf?  The waitress took it off the bill after we complained.  Two people I was with ordered the hot chocolate, which seemed to completely lack sugar -- either they do this on purpose to be fancypants or someone screwed up. At least the fresh squeezed orange juice was good ($2.75 a wineglass' worth...) Most of us wished we'd gone to the Creamery instead.  Oh well.  Live and learn.
St. Michael's Alley is one of my go-to spots for Saturday brunch with the boy crew. We usually arrive on the earlier side so that there is no wait. The place does get pretty packed for weekend brunches and since it is a tiny place (seats about 50 people), you can expect to wait 15-20 minutes unless you arrive just after they open. They wait staff is usually very attentive and friendly (with a few exceptions when they were extremely busy - understandable). I haven't eaten anything here besides the Eggs Florentine and OH.MY.GOD - they are to die for!!! The wheat muffin is nicely toasted and not soggy from the sauce and veggies. The eggs are perfectly poached so the yolks run over your muffin and drench it when you make the first cut. The spinach, onions and mushrooms are beautifully sauteed and everything is perfected with a delicious, well-seasoned hollandaise sauce. Accompanied by roasted potatoes, this meal fills you up, lasts for several hours and makes you smile all day long! I usually have a mimosa here (OJ when I decide to hit the gym afterwards) with my brunch, which is served in a wine glass filled to the brim instead of a tiny champagne flute (+1).
St. Michael's Alley wasn't even busy late Saturday morning. I think the last gasps of Indian summer had something to do with it. This restaurant is clearly unprepared for hot weather, only sporting a single fan that's about as useful as a screen door on a submarine. Anyway, the reason I mention it wasn't busy is to highlight that the restaurant had no excuse for its poor service. It's not just that the waiter didn't even ask us how our meal was or that nobody said good-bye when we left. It's more that, here I am, sweatin' balls, wanting to get the hell out of this restaurant-turned-bikram-yoga studio and I can't even get the guy to give me the check. Oh, and the "special" smoked chicken omelette was mediocre. I felt like I could've gotten the same dish at the Creamery. (Edit/Update: I will say that drawing on the tablesheets with the crayons is a TON of fun.)
I had heard great things about St. Michael's Alley and was excited to check it out. We arrived and were told that there would be a 5-10 minute wait so we put our name down and ran to the Whole Foods across the way. When we returned 7 minutes later other people had already been seated (I guess they meant more like 5 minutes rather than 10 minutes). Nevertheless, we were seated a few minutes later. I thought the place was nicely decorated though the chandlers could use a dusting as there were webs hanging from them. Once I put my critical eye away - I ordered the medley ($13) - 2 blueberry pancakes, 2 eggs anyway (scrambled for me), 2 pieces of bacon (fruit for me), and some potatoes. The fruit was fresh, the eggs were flavorless, the potatoes were just ok, and the blueberry pancakes were so yummy! Bottom line, St. Michael's Alley has a small menu and the brunch really did not impress me. I'd be willing to try it again for lunch or their other venue for dinner but think I'll be sticking to Bill's in San Jose or Crepevine in Burlingame for brunch!
Ohhh deliciousness... The blue monkey pancakes are the BEST pancakes I've ever had... and I rarely like pancakes!  I could eat a whole stack of these.... mmm STARCH!  They are the perfect blend of batter, sweet but tart blueberries, and bananas.  Super light and cooked perfectly.  With just a little dab of butter and a drizzle of syrup... heaven. I always get the Breakfast Medley and swap in the blue monkeys for a small fee (it's worth itttt!!!).  Potatoes, eggs, bacon and pancakes.  A cup of coffee and OJ and I'm set.  My friend Emily once got the french toast and admitted the pancakes were better. Yes, it's pricey, but the quality is superb.  This place isn't Michelin rated for nothing! I've come a few times now and always had great service.  They don't take reservations but always have a policy of first come first serve.  One time I was waiting for the rest of my party to arrive outside after letting the host know I was waiting for a table and since it was still early, they did not have a sign-up sheet... after a while, once everyone had arrived, I went in and they were about to seat some guests that had definitely arrived after me.  Another host had put up the sign-up sheet without telling me and so that party was being seated because their name was on top of the list.  The first host apologized and admitted that I was there before them and seated me instead.  It was the right thing to do and I fully appreciated it. The atmosphere of the place seems very New York to me for some reason... bustling but classy with great food... a little cramped, but full of positive energy.  The decor is pleasant and minimal. Parking can be a pain and you can't park in the huge Whole Foods lot just behind the restaurant... but I usually find street parking somewhere just around the corner. Come early, bring an appetite, and enjoy one of the best brunches you'll ever have.
Being somewhat unfamiliar with the Palo Alto area, I of course referred to Yelp immediately when trying to decide where to dine for brunch.  St. Michael's Alley came up as #1 -- so St Michael's it was! *** The restaurant was everything I expected it to be -- sophisticated yet warm and welcoming.  The decor and setup reminded of a country, barn-style dining room, but with a bit of contemporary flare.  My only 2 minor, nitpicking complaints would be: (1) having to stare at a zoomed-in picture of a hairy bee on one of their walls while eating; (2) the ceiling fan was not enough to cure the 95-degree heatwaves coming into the restaurant. My friend and I shared: - Breakfast Medley (2 eggs, 2 buttermilk pancakes, 2 pieces of bacon, & potatoes) - Eggs Benedict (made with black forest ham; normally served with tomatoes, but I requested for none) I loved the big/filling portions, and everything for the most part was absolutely tasty.  My thoughts: - Wish I knew about the blue monkey pancakes!  I will definitely substitute the next time I come back. - The potatoes were nicely flavored, but wish they were slightly more crispy. - The Eggs Benedict was definitely not like any other that I've had.  I've never had it served in petite bowl -- which makes sense because it helps separate the sauce from everything else on the plate.  As a huge Eggs Benedict fanatic, I wouldn't say that I'm particularly won over by the sauciness of this dish.  I prefer the more "simplicite" version.  However, I appreciate its distinctiveness. *** All in all, the food was delicious; the service was great; and I would come back for more if I'm ever in Palo Alto during brunch hours.
We arrived right on time to grab the last table before the brunchtime rush began. Food is basic, basic, basic. Nothing too special. Then again, I didn't take the yelpers advice on the blue monkey pancakes, opting for the peach-filled pancakes instead. This is a place you go to for the dining experience. We ended up staying at the restaurant for 3 hours, enjoying the atmosphere and people watching...yes we were "that" table. The waiter never hassled us out. Five stars for their patience, service inquiries, and continuous water refills even after we had paid the bill. Rarely do you find a place that gives that much care and attention to their guests.
I forgot how good this place is until last week when I met up with some friends. Good food good atmosphere.
My girlfriend and I were heading to SF for an anniversary dinner when we hit ridiculous traffic.  After being stuck for 45 minutes, we gave up and drove around until we found something fitting.  She remembered co-workers mentioning St Michael's Alley, so we found it and gave it a shot. Since we didn't have reservations, and they were full (it's a tiny place), they invited us to sit at the bar and eat there.  We were hungry, so we probably would have eaten in the parking lot. The food was great!  We were very pleased.  We both had asian influenced entrees, which I thought was a little strange, but who cares?  They tasted great...and the menu is seasonal, so you can always go back and try something new.  The quality was fantastic, the portions were generous and the service was very good. But more than anything else, the prices were VERY fair.  This might be the best deal in Palo Alto.  You get 4-star cuisine and they don't charge you for 5-star...like most places around here.  In other words, they aren't pretentious.  I planned on spending $150 at the place we were going to in SF.  I ended up paying $80 or so at St Michael's Alley...and that's with a few glasses of wine. Can't wait to go back and try the new Spring menu for '08.
I feel mixed about this. Some of us had great food but less-than-fab service, and some of the food was not cooked right, so two stars I guess. We came as a group of six (with reservations) on our lunch hour to celebrate a birthday. It took them a while to take our order, then we waited a half hour for the food. My friends liked their salads, and the mushroom cake and the butternut squash soup-of-the-day was excellent. I had the burger, which was not cooked to medium, like I asked, and I had to scrape far too much mustard off of it. The fries were limp, not crispy at all, and really brown. Time to change the oil, folks. We waited a long time for the check.  I think they were short staffed, but it took us two hours all told for lunch. We all had our money out and had asked for the check 3 times, when they brought sorbet for the birthday girl, and six spoons, for two scoops of sorbet (awkward). The birthday girl felt like she had to rush...it just was not festive. I see positive reviews for breakfast, so maybe I should come back and try again.
Had brunch here over the weekend. The wait time was 45 mins, but it's nice that they take your number and call you when your table is ready. We wandered around Whole Foods while we waited. I got the eggs benedict sans ham. The florentine sounded good, but I wasn't in the mood for spinach and mushrooms, so I figured I'd make the benedict vegetarian. It has tomato on it, and the flavors went really well together. I enjoyed my meal, and ate every last bite. I'll be back.
St. Michael's Alley was my first brunch discovery in Palo Alto and was a long-time favorite.  Although my go-to brunch place is now Joanie's Cafe, St. Mike's is a brilliant alternative for a more elegant (and more expensive) experience. The brunch menu is nicely varied.  The blue monkey pancakes are a favorite.  Try the Breakfast Medley for a traditional breakfast with a classy twist.  Be sure to get the herbed Yukon potatoes as a side! St. Mike's also has an Easter brunch prix fixe menu.  We've been coming here for this special brunch for several years now.  While the menu is not especially different from the regular one, it does get a little more expensive (also, the gratuity is automatically added).  Nonetheless, it's a nice place for an annual tradition. The waiters are attentive and service has always been great.  It's nice that this tiny brunch restaurant is tucked away nondescriptly, making it much more intimate.  With the loss of the brunch menu at Zibbibo, I would consider St. Mike's to be the best place for brunch in the downtown Palo Alto area.
I love this place!  (Michael & Jenny, you're the greatest!) I've been going here for probably over 10 years now.  Long, long ago, Mike's used to be a kinda funky little place, but great food!  Then there was the "bad time".  Michael and Jenny decided to take some time off and sold (?) the restaurant to someone else.  In a very short time, the food became abysmal, the service was so-so, and the patrons, well, the patrons all disappeared. Then the restaurant appeared to close... but... it was not so: lo and behold! Michael and Jenny had come back! They remodeled and resurrected the restaurant! Friendly staff, great food, and you get Michael and Jenny! Brunch here is fantastic.  There are always interesting specials.  Dinners are wonderful too. As others have said, it is a small intimate restaurant.  Large group you wanna take to dinner?  Go somewhere else.  Small group?  Date you want to (maybe) impress? Go here. You'll have a good time.
I'm being a little unfair with the two stars... but I just can't get myself to give three. This used to be the weekly brunch spot... it was just a few blocks away, there was always parking... back then, the food was amazing!  I think the first thing to go was the service... what used to be excellent service almost became IHOP service, where you get the bare minimum, no mas. Then the food starting becoming more uneven.... the scrambles which were always good, were good every other time, and that's if they came out hot. To add insult to injury... they started getting so crowded that you'd have to wait.. that was the last straw!  alas... they were a definitely a 5 star spot a couple/few years ago, but like all good things.... Oh yeah.. had dinner here twice in that same  time period... it was good, but not that good that they would be a destination.
Cute atmosphere, nice staff. However, I was irritated at them when we went there for brunch. I ordered the breakfast sampler (bacon, egg, potato, 2 pancakes), substituting fruit for the two pancakes. When I received my plate there was a tiny cup of fruit on it along with the bacon, egg, and potato which were already small portions. I'm not a big person and it was tiny even for me. However, they still charged $12 for this sad little meal. If you're going to substitute something, it needs to be proportional. At least put on some more potatoes if fruit is more expensive than pancakes. I don't want to be hungry after going out to eat. That said, I had a chance to try some of my mother's food since I was still hungry. The spring scramble was really good and the biscuit was mediocre. If I came back here, I'd make sure not to subsitute anything.
Ambiance: Pleasant, intimate space with a European feel. Food: On the upside, the halibut was tasty with a crisp exterior and tender meat.  I enjoyed the sauteed spinach (not too garlicky), a properly zesty and creamy lemon and caper sauce and the appropriately buttered mashed potatoes.  On the down and dirty (as in martini) side, the pork chop was less than stellar.  Apparently the chef had brined the heck out of the chop before cooking it...not even a few olives could have saved this super-salty dish. Service: The staff was helpful, but the scene was hectic (Saturday night), so service was slow. This restaurant may be a better bet for brunch.
This place was hard to find, but thankfully a visiting friend had done all the research and picked this place specifically.  6 of us, 11:30 on a Tuesday.  Not surprisingly, we were the only ones in the place when we arrived.  But they had some awesome jazz playing in the background.  Not that wishy-washy Kenny G "jazz", or god forbid, "smooth jazz".  But some real good stuff.  Like Sonny Rollins, Miles Davis, Chick Corea.  I actually found my attention wanting to go both to the conversation and the music. I ordered the mussels - an appetizer that can serve as a meal.  This one had a nice sauce, with cream and lots of garlic, peppers and tomatoes.  Second only to the mussels I had once up in the Marina.  I was going to be content with just mussels, but a couple friends had ordered the soup of the day, which was a creamy roasted red pepper concoction with a dollop of goat cheese that looked and smelled amazing.  Amazing enough that everybody at the table decided to jump on the soup bandwagon.  Mmmm...tasty. Everything else looked really tasty as well, and everybody was quite happy with their meal.  We walked out for $18 each or so.  Not a bad price for a good lunch, but I bet their dinner menu is a little pricey as well.
This is a great little spot away from the main University or California street drags in Palo Alto. It's California cuisine and features many local wines that most people will not recognize. The food is innovative and delicious served by attentive staff. As a group of 8, we were able to try a variety of appetizers including the bruschetta, baked brie with roasted garlic, wild mushroom cake and crab wontons. All were good but the absolute favorite was the mushroom cake! My non-veggie friends also raved about the crab wontons. The appetizer prices are reasonable enough that you could order a handful of items and make a meal of them. I also had Roasted Garlic Tomato soup, the soup du jour, which was quite good. My entree was the spicy eggplant ravioli. While the ravioli was slightly bland, it's tossed in a generous amount of baby spinach. Too often veggie pasta dishes are dominated by the pasta itself and not enough veggies or other flavors. And if the pasta isn't cooked to perfection, it just becomes a big serving of tasteless carbs. Finally, dessert was the tiramisu. It wasn't bad, but nothing to rave about. Overall, it's a great little gem, a surprising menu, and a good value.
For the price of the food, it is not worth it.  I still felt hungry after!!  They give you this small little biscuit with your breakfast and it seriously can be eaten in 2 bites.  I had the Eggs Benedict and I've had better else where for cheaper.  It was about $15 for 2 Eggs Bennedict, a few potato chunks and that small biscuit.  The potatoes were quite delicious though.  I'd say just order a couple sides of the potatoes and call it a day. The service was really great but that could be because they only could seat about 30 people at a time (which includes the bar area).  I don't think I'll ever come back just because it's not too close to my house and it wasn't anything to die for.
Boy, do I regret not revisiting this place in the past 2~3 years!   I've definitely missed you, St. Michael's Alley. The Eggs Florentine, which I don't normally order at other joints, came out smelling divine and melted in my mouth.   My husband wanted a bite too but I just couldn't bare to share.   The addition of veggies in the dish is welcomed in this rich dish. We went on a Sunday afternoon around 1:00pm and the crowd had already died down.  We were seated promptly and the service was friendly. The only reason why I didn't get 5 star is because compared to my order, my husband's french toast just seemed rather "meh."   That said, we'll be back!!
We just came here for brunch today for a friend's birthday celebration.  Knowing that this is a... Read more 
Came here for brunch and it was a mixed experience.  At 11.30am, the place was already full but the wait wasn't long at all.  Until 12.30, we started to see lines forming outside. The place was very cute and chic, bright and neat, very lovely to sit inside or outside.  The host was efficient and friendly, overall service was at par, don't expect too much. As for the food, I had a mix feeling.  Everything everyone else ordered looked really good but ours just tasted OK.  I wonder if we ordered the wrong things or that other food may be just good to look at but not so good in taste as well. We ordered a cranberry champagne mix drink Codder and a decaf mocha.  The mocha was disappointing, very thin in texture and lacked that rich creamy consistency.  And hubby preferred mimosa after trying the Codder. For food, we ordered their daily special of chicken harsh (grilled chicken with egg, tomato, scallion and jack cheese harsh) and seasonal Belgian waffle with warm apple compote and an apple sausage on the side.  I found the chicken harsh a bit light on the flavor, not salty enough.  And the waffle was good but the apple compote was a bit too sour.  The apple chicken sausage was good.  Overall the food was a bit bland in taste. Total damage is $45 before tips.  Love the ambience, but the food seemed debatable.  Though we didn't see kids in the restaurant, crayons are available for doodle.
I'm sad to give this place a 3 :( Everyone's food around me looked so good! IT all looked so balanced and nicely put together and had lots of awesome side parts and stuff, and my dish was just one waffle with some stuff on top. Mind you, it was more than I could finish, but I wish my plate looked a little fuller :( The waffle is not really something I'd recommend... they put this apple stuff on top with some natural flavored yogurt. I tasted the waffle with just the yogurt at first, and it was a little bit sour, like I expected it to be. I assumed that the apples would offset the natural sourness of the yogurt, but the apples just ended up being sour, too :( It was a very sour waffle, even with some syrup on top. I was pretty disappointed. Not to mention all that apple and yogurt on top of the waffle made the middle of the waffle super soggy and like eating slop. The service was fine, it was pretty professional. I really liked how the waiter made a point to take the lady's orders first! Very cool :D It was a really nice brunch place. I just ordered the wrong thing :(
My wife and I went for Sunday brunch. I had Eggs Florentine. The food and service were excellent. The preparation of the dish was excellent. This was our first brunch there, and it was a 5-star experience. This restaurant is small, does not take reservations, and the wait can be 30 minutes or more. There is really no waiting area inside. We have had lunch here on many occasions, but for that meal we can arrive early and avoid the wait. For lunch we have had salads or hamburger.  We don't hesitate to go back.
This precious gem of a breakfast joint has won my heart over with their staff, ambience, and food!  Although we were prepared for a long line, we were surprised to find we were seated rather quickly (we probably showed up around noon-ish, when the general breakfast crowd was long gone). While I really wanted to try their omelets, I couldn't say no when I saw a plate of french toast piled high with strawberries pass by to another table.  Be warned, the french toast is deceptive!  It's light and fluffy, but quite substantial: try as I could, I wasn't able to eat that last piece.  I only wish there was a hefty dollop of whipped cream, but the strawberries were very sweet and juicy, and as red as the five stars I'm giving St. Michael's Alley! If you get the chance to go, know that they don't skimp on the mimosas ;).  Or anything for that matter.  A place with great food in generous (but not super-sized) portions.
Excellent California/Mediterranean fare in a small but comfortable single dining room.  Good option for a quiet date or small group dinner of 4-6. 1/30/06 UPDATE: Just tried Sunday breakfast here and really enjoyed it as an upscale alternative to your typical brunch spot.  I had the challah french toast with strawberries, crispy bacon and a freshly squeezed grapefruit juice.  Good stuff!
My friends dragged me down to The Peninsula for brunch yet again. I'd already read about long waits at St. Michael's Alley, so we got there at 10:30 a.m. for brunch. Wow, that's early. Anyway, so at that time in the morning on a Saturday, there was no wait at all; I don't think a line started to form until well after 11 a.m. The menu items seemed relatively reasonably-priced considering what I heard about dinner, though there weren't that many menu items that jumped out at me. I was initially drawn to the eggs benedict, but I always love huevos ranchers or chilaquiles...and there were chilaquiles on the menu! I was surprised to find the chilaquiles with ham since I've typically had them vegetarian; ham isn't my first breakfast meat choice so I had to order a side of bacon too. I was a bit disappointed with my chilaquiles: the chilaquiles didn't have much flavor besides the sodium/salt from the ham. I'd hoped there would be a bit more of a kick from the green chiles and more flavorful black beans. The service was fine, though I found that I had to keep asking for more water and coffee.
A review for their weekend brunch: Like all of the good restaurants in PA, there will be a wait for a table.  They have a few tables outside, which is nice, but the road isn't particularly nice and so I was happy to have a table inside.  The well-chosen artwork and the smaller dining area made the atmosphere very pleasant. The food is good, but I have to say that I still hold that Cafe Brioche is much better for the price.  I had the Eggs Florentine, which was delicious, but the potatoes weren't anything special and I was disappointed in their offering toast and not even jelly (no scone or brioche or at least a baguette?).... especially for almost $15.  Coffee was fine, but I was expecting a little better.  My partner enjoyed his French toast and yet we both agreed that there is better in the area. In general, a great treat and something different.  The price keeps it from being something that I would do more often....
Brunch ends at 2pm on Saturday and Sunday.  Having woken up at 1pm, it was a slightly frantic dash over to St. Michael's Alley.  All four of the outside tables were taken, so we were shown to a little table for two by the front window.  While waiting for our food, we doodled on the paper table cover with some crayons that had been left on the table and listened to the owner chat to the next table about an upcoming change of location.  Fortunately, they'll only be moving about a block away, but the current location is airy and elegant, while still seeming casual.  Hopefully, they manage to keep this atmosphere at the new location. Omelettes are listed at ~$13, belgian waffles with fresh peaches and yogurt are $10, and sandwiches are $8-$10.  The omlettes usually come with a small side of lightly seasoned, roasted potatoes (not the heap of oil-saturated potatoes you get elsewhere), but I swapped the potatoes for a side of fresh fruit and a biscuit--a nice light meal.  My boyfriend raved about the buttermilk pancakes and bacon.
I've been to this place maybe 15 times. I love the menu. I love the food. I love sitting outside, on a sunny morning, with a friend or my husband. I can take the kids and they can draw on the paper table cloth that covers the real one (they even have crayons.) And for some reason, I really like their water glasses. Water tastes so good there. But there is one thing that drives me BONKERS about this place. I went their today for a friend's birthday and I started thinking about "it" hours before. The service sucks so hard here. I don't know what it is, but it almost ruins my dining experience every time. My eggplant sandwich was amazing today. But the slowest-service-known-to-humankind makes me not want to ever return!!! I don't know how the owners don't know about this. Has anyone complained? My whole table was moaning and groaning about our terrible service by the time we were looking for the check. It's so sad that such a wonderful place can consistently ruin my breakfast or lunch. Today, the server was particularly clueless when asked kindly/respectfully to pick up the pace. Ugh. And last time I checked, they don't take AMEX. Bummer.
St. Michael's Alley: 1. The service on our visit was good. Our waitress was very attentive and friendly. 2. The interior and the sidewalk seating is pleasant. 3. The waffles were good. The fruit was fresh and I liked the dollop of plain yogurt on top. 4. The burger was EXCELLENT (five star burger)! It was cooked perfectly medium rare as ordered. The bacon was extra crispy. It was all around a wonderful surprise. Although we did not try any of the egg dishes we did notice that they were some of the most expensive on the menu. (I hope those eggs were laid this morning and were plucked from underneath the hen minutes before cooking!)  Have food prices gone up that much? Seriously? Eggs? Sigh...
Update: My original 2-star review is below.  However, this completely unprofessional comment from the owner Mike prompted me to update:  He said: "You cannot even remember what you ordered but you feel compelled to get out there and bash us anyway? Wow." I've been a Yelp Elite member for several years and have gotten plenty of feedback from business owners on reviews both good & bad.  Obviously every business owner wants a good review, but the responses to my negative reviews have always been professional and polite.   I have never received a response as rude & sarcastic as Mike's.  While he certainly makes a fair point that my assessment of the food may not be reliable, he could have done so much more politely (you catch more flies with honey and all that).  If you read through all the 1 and 2 star reviews of this place, you will see that he has responded in a similar manner to many others. For what it's worth, in response to his comment about the length of time since my visit, while I can't comment on details of the food (and didn't purport to), I do remember that it wasn't terribly impressive and a look at the online menu confirms my memory that it's exceptionally overpriced, even by Palo Alto standards.   My review was also not terribly critical of the food (I said it was "good but not great") and was mostly critical of the prices and wait time to be seated. As a resident of Palo Alto, and a Yelper, I like to share my take on local restaurants and let people know which places I recommend.  I was not trying to "bash" the restaurant - I was simply trying to convey that this is not a place I recommend for brunch in Palo Alto for the reasons I gave, and I think there are many better places nearby.  Many others clearly disagree, as evidenced by the overall 4-star rating, but my Yelp page is there to share my recommendations. ----Original Review---- I definitely seem to be in the minority here, but I'm not a fan of this place.  It's not horrible, but it's so overpriced, always has a long wait and I don't think the food is anything special.  With so many brunch options in Palo Alto, this isn't a place I'd go back to.  It's been awhile since I've been here so I'm not 100% sure what I ordered, but I think I had the pancakes? Probably, since those are the cheapest things on the menu (at $10-$11).  The egg dishes are mostly $15+.  I mean, really, $16 for a ham omelette?  I would only pay that if it had lobster in it or something.  I know Palo Alto is pricey, but there are plenty of places around with $6 pancakes and $9 omelettes, so why pay almost twice as much unless the food is really fab?  I remember thinking at the time that my pancakes were good but not great.   Service was fine and the atmosphere is really nice (if you ever get seated), but I wouldn't recommend it if you care about value or if you want really good food.
This is a fantastic restaurant.  I really like brunch here, but the dinners are outstanding too.  I think it's been voted as Most Romantic restaurant several times in the Palo Alto Weekly polls. The entrees are delectable.  The choices are diverse, and I always have trouble choosing, since the entrees are always paired with unique side dishes which makes the choice even harder.  I had an excellent butternut squash tart for an appetizer along with a fine rack of lamb.  Yummy delight. Service has been quite good, though perhaps not distinctive.  I liked the wine selection as well, including some solid wines-by-the-glass.  Dessert were not that insipiring to us, but you can't have everything. I like how this restaurant is a bit of a hidden gem, being off the beaten path from University.  It's actually a nice treat to pair after a couples massage at Watercourse Way, just down the street. I really think that the Califronia style cuisine is quite good here, and I definitely recommend.
A quaint intimate little place that is tucked away from the bustling University Ave.  We had the Wild Mushroom Cake and Baked Brie with Roasted Garlic as appetizers.  They were both quite good although one really can't ever go wrong with baked brie even in my own oven!  I ordered the Baked Gnocchi Gratin which was really good, well-portioned but quite heavy.  As a vegetarian, I wasn't able to nibble on others' food but everyone seems to enjoy what they had (e.g. roasted rack of lamb, the fillet mignon special, and macadamia nut crusted mahi mahi).  Unfortunately, the service was a real let-down with the older waitress who provide a better description about the Wild Mushroom Cake and the younger waitress who was extremely rude. In sum, I gave this place 1 star for service. 5 stars for food. Hence 3 stars overall.
I'm on the fence in giving 3 1/2 or 4 stars, we arrived with no reservations at 5:15ish on a Thursday evening.  Told the person who greeted us that we would like a table for five - he looked at his board and looked a bit perplexed.  The place was completely empty sans one table in the corner deep in conversation. Him:  We don't open til 5:30pm and we have a reservation for someone at 6:30pm - will you be done by then? Me:  I don't know, is your service fast? Him:  We have a large order calling in, let me see if the kitchen can handle it Me:  now having a perplexed look on my face Him:  OK we can seat you, but since we don't open until 5:30 we can't serve you until them Me:  I guess we'll have time to figure out what we want to eat then. Given the fact that I wasn't expecting service for another 15 minutes, I was pleasantly surprise when the runner came by and filled our water glasses and gave us bread and then our server came by to see if we wanted wine. The menu looked amazing.  I ordered the Asian Marinated pork tenderloin with gingered sweet potatoes and steamed green beans. My pork was a bit dry, I was expecting sweet potatoes meaning yams, but instead they were mashed potatoes sweetened with ginger and I got 5 green beans.   I guess I was expecting more seeing 4 stars on Yelp, but the others at the table were very happy with their meals. We had the duet sorbet for dessert and that was yummy, also got the profiteroles with chocolate gelato - that wasn't as good - the gelato was melted. By 6:30pm the place was packed - I guess everyone was eating at that time.  We finished up and headed out.  Overall our server was attentive and didn't rush us, the menu looked good and the others in my group all enjoyed their meals, I'll give them credit for seating us without a reservation and for the good service.  The place was very quaint and had good atmosphere. Minus 1/2 a star for the beginning conversation - it's all in the way you present it - could have totally been said differently, but it is what it is, minus a star for my dry tenderloin and potato surprise. I'll have to go back for brunch sometime and see if I want to update my rating.
I like this place - it's small, quaint with soft lighting...or maybe it was the company I had or the friendly service...or all of the above. There were 6 of us and we ordered just about everything on the appetizer menu and a few entrees and did it family style.  It was fun and allow everyone to try a little of everything.  Everything was pretty tasty but nothing really stood out as a must have.  We had 2 bottles of red that were very good but I didn't pay attention to what we ordered. They gave us a few glasses of port wit the dessert - the port was very good but again I have no clue what it was! I just like this place, it's away from the buzz of downtown Palo Alto...and look forward to returning...
Yay!  A nice local place that's great for brunch.  On our server's recommendation, we got the special apple cinammon pancakes which, when supplied with absolutely every packet of butter on the table, were just right.  And a bunch of syrup.  Good OJ.  Questionable coffee. I know fellow yelpers, it's a local place with some character and not a chain so I'm supposed to give it 5 stars.  Call me a nihilist.
I've been here twice now and it's hard to think of a better place to go on a lazy Sunday brunch. I had the steak scramble and it was really really good. There was a steak scramble special in fact, but the only difference was mushrooms instead of bell peppers. Creative huh?! lol!! Even our waitress joked about that. I'm not a big fan of mushrooms, so I opted for the regular one. Lots of small pieces of steak, eggs, cheese, bell peppers, and red onions with seasoned yukon gold potatoes and a small biscuit. TONS of food. The biscuit is delicious with some maple syrup drizzled on top, try it! I had a double espresso as a preventive measure to ward off the expected food coma. My friend had the eggs florentine, whose legend seems to be growing based on other yelp reviews. I will definitely have to try that next time. Come EARLY, meaning before noon. Put your name down and wait. If you show up after 12:30 or 1, you are screwed. There were tons of people milling about and waiting on the sidewalk as we left. I got there a bit early and put my name down before my friend arrived and we barely had to wait a few minutes. Lots of street/garage parking nearby. Prices are reasonable, most dishes are around $15 give or take. The crowd seems to be 30s+. Strollers and grade-school kids. Don't let them scare you off. I'm at the tender age of 28 and it really is pleasant to have a nice civilized brunch. ;P
Still my absolute favorite brunch spot. The food at SMA is impeccable every time, and the service is efficient with all smiles. I love how the restaurant is airy and sunny, and the seating spacious and clean. It is located in the heart of peaceful Palo Alto, so don't expect any cheapy prices, but both the wait and the bill will be well worth it. Their new specials (as of last week) are: Chicken scramble, tomato garlic soup, and cream of mushroom. The boy and I ordered soup on top of our usual: Him- tomato garlic soup (with usual burger) Me- cream of mushroom (with usual eggs benedict) Delightfully cozy brunch for such a cold few weeks :o)
The space at St. Michael's is charming, airy, and filled with natural light from its central... Read more 
I have yet to try this place for dinner (and I want to, if nothing else than to try the warm chocolate bread pudding!!), but the brunch was solid. I went on a Sunday morning around 11:30am to celebrate some recent successes with two of my co-workers.  We planned it a little earlier because we anticipated a long wait, but the wait wasn't bad!  I think we only waited 10-15 minutes max.  However, it was Super Bowl Sunday, so maybe the wait is usually longer other days. We each got glasses of mimosas, and they were pretty champagne-y (I don't enjoy champagne but I had it anyway to celebrate).  I was thinking about getting the belgian waffles, but I got the breakfast medley because I love having a little bit of everything.. it came with two buttermilk pancakes, bacon, roasted potatoes, and eggs (which I got scrambled).  Everything was pretty good (including the service!).  The only complaints were that the roasted potatoes slightly too salty, but still yum, and I haven't had truly good scrambled eggs in quite awhile and this place was no exception.  I finished every bite, even though the amount of food was fairly large.  One of my co-workers got the breakfast medley too and didn't finish, and the other got the blue monkey pancakes (blueberries and bananas, how clever!) and only had 2 1/2 out of 4. Bottom line: nice, cute place with good brunch food, and hopefully I will be back for dinner sometime!
We went here to celebrate Mother's Day on Saturday afternoon for brunch.  Overall a pretty decent experience. The Good: menu has an innovative spin on the classics, good quality food & fresh ingredients, intimate, bright setting, clean. The Bad: long wait (no reservations), REALLY REALLY loud, the restaurant can only hold 50 people max, limited (small) menu Overall I thought the food was a little overpriced for what actually came out of the kitchen.  I guess I just had really really high expectations.  If I order an $10 mimosa, for example, I'd like it to be fresh-squeezed OJ or at least something other than poured from a non-descript gallon jug (seriously.)  But the owner is nice and the atmostphere is pleasant.  The food is good and everything is fresh, just nothing that jumps out and says "WOW this is amazing."  For a nice breakfast with friends, this is a good spot.  I wouldn't come back here again for a special occasion brunch, only because we had to shout across the small table just to make conversation.
Yum-o. Reminds me of a cafe you'd find in Europe - very relaxed, fresh ingredients, great food & great people. Really couldn't ask for more in this open-air cafe!
I met a friend for a Wednesday night dinner at the new location on the corner of Homer and High.  I had been a fan of the Emerson house, which is intimate and cozy -- they're now located on the bottom floor of an apartment complex and have three separate dining areas (outside patio, indoor casual seating by the bar, and wrap around dining room).  The restaurant feels very different, less casual, but with a new charm. I called a week in advance and could only get a 7:30pm reservation.  The restaurant wasn't packed but a fair number of patrons.  Surprised that it was an older clientele -- brunch is fairly lively with a range of guests, but many tables definitely had older couples or a young couple with their parent(s). The waiter was very helpful in navigating their fantastic beer selection -- only bottles now but taps coming soon!  After mulling over my dinner choices as well, I settled on the hommel ale, a Belgian beer that was poured in a Chimay glass, YUM!  We split the wild mushroom appetizers, St Mike's staple -- hard to describe in an appetizing way but it's mushroom tart with a hard crust.  Their entrees looked to be on the heavier side, but good choices.  My meal was the scallops on bok choy and corn salad and scallion mashed potatoes, quite good.  My friend's four cheese ravioli was yummy as well. We did splurge on the chocolate mousse cake at the end.  It has a chocolate crumb crust, just delectable, but super rich and humongous. I think I am coming back when my mom's in town later in the month for dinner.  Brunch is good but cliche, might be overrated. $87 dinner for two with one beer each, tax and tip
We had brunch at the one on Emerson (across from Whole Foods).  The one on Homer is not even open for brunch on Saturdays.  That was a little confusing. The smoked salmon eggs benedict is 5 stars, even maybe 6.  Comes with smoked salmon, thin English muffin, capers, fresh purple onions and some kind of wet sauce that made everything taste good!  Herb potatoes were not bad and the biscuit was ok.  The Belgian waffle with peaches was pretty good too.  The mimosas are VERY GOOD here. I would give 5 stars if the waiter didn't give us attitude!  They LOST our order (what does that mean anyway - that they made it but lost it in the kitchen?).  They told us after all of the other tables that came after us got their food, which was 45 minutes later.  The waiter first said they would "comp our food".  Then he changed it to "comp the salmon bennie" after he heard our order (salmon bennie is $18).  That kinda pissed me off.  They didn't offer to comp our drinks so I asked for another mimosa but on the house and the waiter obliged grudgingly. So 35 more minutes later, we get our food and I'm glad we didn't walk out since it was well worth it.  The waiter was bitter and was afraid we would not tip him the normal tip without the discount due to their mistake and didn't greet us when we were leaving or looked us in the eye after giving our food (even though we did tip him based on the regular price of the food). Other than the confusion that the Homer location is not open during weekend brunch,  losing our order and telling us almost an hour later, being cheap about comping our meal and the attitude, the salmon bennie was very excellent.
This place is located in a cute little small town looking street full of mom and pop type of shops..it's super close to the Stanford campus well.  My friend and I decided to check this place out and were lucky to get there a few minutes after they opened (there was a long line by the time we were done w/ breakfast).  My friend ordered teh Smoke Salmon benedict and I ordered the Fall Vegetable Scramble.  Both were delicious...you can tell the ingredients were fresh... and the servings were pretty big.  all in all, a nice cute little restaurant w/ good service and good food.
F*I*V*E* Stars -- and they so deserve this, of all the Palo Alto restaurants, they have been consistently good.  I can always find something so very satisfying, even when the menu has changed.  I think the owner likes to change things up, which of course is a good thing!  My go to is always the Bruschetta and the mushroom cake.  The bartenders are always friendly and the place has a homey type feel, I always feel welcomed here.  From the moment you arrive, the hostess is smiling. Joey you are fantastic, too. PS I  do hope Yelpers are not lowering their star rating because an establishment has decided to not use Discover nor Amex -- I see an earlier review with 2 Stars for this -- next time, little Yelper, do your research in advance.  No need to shame the waitress for your error.  Thank you
Really pretty space, open and airy but terrible acoustics! It was as if everyone in the restaurant was shouting. No wait for 2 on Saturday morning at around 11. Nice and attentive waitress just not very friendly, no smiling going on at all. The Blue Monkey pancakes were tempting but I opted for the Cinnamon Apple instead. Hubster got the breakfast sampler (pancakes, eggs, bacon (which he gave to me) and potatoes) My pancakes came with plain yogurt on top which I quickly removed b/c I hate plain yogurt-yuck! The pancakes were good, nice fluffy texture and pleasant chunks of apple but not enough cinnamon flavor. There was granola on top of the cakes too and it was ok, it had too many sunflower seeds in it for my taste. Hubster seemed to like his sampler (the bacon was pretty good) but it was nothing special, no wow factor. A bit too pricey for kind of a blah meal.
Apparently brunch in the bay area runs from 10-2.  Huh?  Who eats at 10am?  Anyway, we got here at 1030, just ahead of the 11am rush, and sat down right away. Started with fresh fruit, which was great (CA fruit is awesome), then did the salmon benedict, which was pretty good.  Their "fresh" orange juice was not very good, but other than that, the meal was pretty solid. Problem: No bloody mary.  They actually said "there is a bar down the street where sometimes people go to drink before dinner."  ?!  How does that help?  Brunch without bloody mary is a disgrace.  Sorry.
Stick with the Blue Monkey pancakes or the St. Mike's Omelet and you're golden. Charming and intimate place, great for people watching if you sit outside. Convenient to Whole Foods.
St. Michael's Alley is one of my favorite places to meet friends for dinner. It's completely my stand-by.  Anytime a friend from the Peninsula wants to grab dinner, I take the liberty of making resos here. It's small, not too loud and intimate- perfect for catching up with good friends. I just dined there a couple of weeks ago with some friends and the restaurant offered the new spring menu.  I went with the calamari to start (which was lightly battered and crisp along with lightly battered peppers-which were super spicy hot and of course, I kept eating them).  Then I had the steak, perfectly cooked and lightly seasoned with a side of greens. If you are in the neighborhood and looking for the perfect dinner spot to dine- this is the place for you!
I've been here a few times, and still have yet to understand why it has a 4 star average on yelp and a long wait for brunch. I've ordered the eggs benedict and salmon scramble, and both were below average in taste but above average in price. Egg based dishes are usually my favorite, but the last time I didn't even want to finish it. The blue monkey pancakes was the only dish I liked, but having one good dish doesn't make it a very good restaurant to go to.
Come on Palo Alto, is this really the best you can do? For such a highly rated brunch spot, I was appalled at how flavorless the food was. My husband and I ventured into St. Michael's Alley on a beautiful Sunday morning. There was a wait (~30 min), but we didn't mind because we ended up at a table outside in the sunshine. The vibe here is very charming, and the service is great, but the food, my gosh. I had the breakfast medley with scrambled eggs, blue monkey pancakes and Yukon potatoes with Rosemary. The eggs ended up being flat, and lifeless and sadly, I've had better eggs at the hospital cafeteria. The pancakes are sooo hyped here on yelp, but really they aren't anything special. The potatoes were flavorful, but very dry and needless to say, I was in awe that this was the highest ranked brunch in PA. My husband had the French toast with strawberries. The highlight was the strawberries, and the French toast once again was dry and bready. I can't say that I'd come here again. I'd much rather do the drive to SF and have an enjoyable brunch at Olea or the ferry building farmers market. Maybe their dinner menu is more impressive?
This place is very cute and cozy.  Not a ton of seating, but perfect for a weekend brunch with the girls!  Nice and bright inside and very welcoming. We started off with mimosas, which were delicious!  I had the eggs benedict which was pretty good, and my friends had the salmon scramble which they enjoyed very much.  In general the food is not spectacular, but average for brunch. The service was a little lacking and the servers are not that friendly.  I wouldn't mind coming back again though to try some of the other menu items.
3.5 stars.  It was really hot in Palo Alto today and unfortunately for us there was really poor ventilation at St. Michael's Alley.  There was a ceiling fan that barely whirled and a small air condition unit that was installed on top of the door.  Neither kept us cool!  But once we ordered the water and juice, it was much better.  Still, the ventilation was bad and St. Michael's Alley should really consider bringing in some fans. Now, for the food.  It was decent.  I had a nicoise salad and it was quite decent.  The portions were not huge, but it was your usual fare--lettuce, eggs, string beans, potatoes, etc.  I enjoyed the vinagrette.  At $16+ for the small salad, the price is a bit steep.  But still, the ambiance was decent (despite the heat).  Overall, the restaurant was charming and pleasant enough, but given the heat I might have been too delirious to really enjoy the food and restaurant!
A friend was in from DC visiting and she wanted to go to a cute breakfast place to eat that morning. So I searched on Yelp and found St. Michael's Alley. We headed out and put our name on the list and about 40 minutes later we were seated (in the interim we went to Whole Foods to grocery shop and get a small snack). It's a cute little place that has indoor and some outdoor seating. We sat inside in a corner right by the window and door. My friend had the French toast and I had the special of orange ricotta pancakes. We split chicken apple sausages. The pancakes were a neat palate pleaser as the tangy citrus and soft cheese flavors played on my tongue. 4 sausages came in the sausage order and they were grilled not too crispy/burnt nor too soggy. The French bread was also a good middle texture, not too dry nor too soggy. The staff were very nice and they checked in with us while we waited inside a bit for our table. Service was swift once we were seated. Overall, a great little place to go to when you're in the mood for brunch on a sunny weekend morning (though they do lunch and dinner as well, so will have to go and explore that, too)
A lovely little gem best enjoyed on a Stanford expense account on a sunny afternoon Good wine list and fine food in an out of the way, easy to miss but not to be missed locale.
Caveat:  I don't particularly like breakfast, mostly because it occurs at an obscene time of day. But I LOVED St Michael's Alley.  The eggs benedict--by which I judge any breakfast place, without mercy--were fabulous here.  The hollandaise was creamy and smooth, not too tart, and lightly spiced.  The tomato on the muffin was a huge plus.  The eggs were perfectly poached, just enough yellow goo to be tasty, not too much to be gross (and no white goo, huge plus)  Coffee was great--and I am picky.  Cranberry mimosa, lovely.  I don't really like eating potatoes, but the home fries were amazing here, seasoned with rosemary and sea salt and perfectly crisp.  I made them take them away before I did even more insulin-spiking damage.   I also liked the ambiance--not breakfast divy but not uptight. I think I have finally found breakfast nirvana in the South Bay.  The arduous search was worth it!
*Caveat: This review is only for brunch. I'm rounding up as I can't decide between two and three stars. Absolutely cute restaurant with the sidewalk patio eating area and the flowers where you can bring your dog and enjoy your brunch!  Careful which table you select because otherwise, you'll find yourself continuing to move the table to keep the sun out of someone's eyes (as I saw with this poor couple eating outside) Inside, the atmosphere is really great as well.  It looked promising! The descriptions on the menu looked fantastic and my sister and I decided to select the chilaquiles and the St Mike's omelette and then share so that we could taste more than one dish. The portions are so huge that we basically had one full portion to take home to enjoy another day.  The herbed potatoes are really tasty and not oily which I was happy to see. The St Mike's Omelette was okay, but not really very tasty.  I'd definitely choose something else if I were to come again.  The chilaquiles was better, but not super-exciting. Coffee was okay, service was okay...I guess you can summarize my whole brunch experience as just okay.
Great service!  Excellent food.  I especially like the Peanut Butter Pancake.  Yummy! The servers are friendly and knowledgeable.  The food is delicious and fresh.  The decors are charming. I've been there on weekends, and the wait each time is less than 10 minutes.
It's a nice cozy spot to have brunch. I would recommend it but it's nothing out of this world.
While no one dish is likely to knock your socks off, St. Michael's Alley does so many things really well, that I know I can always expect a really great meal and experience whenever I go. The French/Californian cuisine is not as novel or complex as many Palo Alto restaurants try to be, but they're almost always better than you would generally expect. The cassoulet with duck confit ($20) sits in a wonderful white bean cassoulet that I enjoyed immensely even before getting to the duck.  The flavors are very well balanced and taste better than I would have expected for a dish so simply made.  I really enjoyed the rack of lamb ($20) on my last visit and the baked gnocchi gratin ($17) has a very sharp and distinctive cheese that makes it one of the better gnocchis I've had.   The thick wild mushroom cake ($8) made for a wonderful appetizer.  For lunch I've always enjoyed their salad nicoise and ahi tuna sandwich.  Everyone raves about the brunch, though the one time I went it seemed about on par with many other PA brunch locations. The waitstaff is always very friendly, especially one of the male lunchtime servers who always seems like he's auditioning for the role of waiter.  The bread is decent and most of the wines by the glass I've had have been pretty good (especially the Cab Franc and the Sancere).  Its reasonably quiet and being just a few blocks off University gives it a less business oriented feel that the heart of downtown.
We love brunch here and are looking forward to returning. The Eggs Benedict was cooked perfectly.
The menu here is extremely limited. Since I'm not the biggest fan of eggs in the morning I just decided to go the a la carte route and try some toast, sausage that people had raved about and had some of my wife's potatoes. To start the wait in line wasn't the best over 30 minutes at 11am for a table for 8 - and since the place opens so late at 10am, there's no chance to beat the morning rush by showing up early. For $4 toast - I'd normally expect some fresh artisan bread or something fancy right? Nope - All I got was four plain pieces of sourdough that could have as easily came from a bagged loaf from Safeway. The boring jam and wrapped butter equally disappointed. And the chicken apple sausage? Again plain jane in flavor, and I would have been better off buying some Jimmy Deans. They really overcooked it if you ask me! Potatoes were just waaaaay too salty and dry. At the table the only thing that seemed to satisfy of the 8 or so dishes brought to us was the pancakes. Now if I hadn't OD'd on pancakes over the last several weeks, I might have gone for those instead. Limited menu + poor a la carte options = 2 stars. Sorry seriously disappointed here and I'll be sticking with other places for my Sunday brunch that has better options and higher quality sides.
I went there for a Saturday brunch. The St Michaels Omlet is divine!!  The cream cheese adds a delicious flavor. The orange juice here is also really good.
Me and the gf were tired of breakfast in the lower east bay, (fremont, union city, newark etc. .. . ) SO we thought we would hop accross the dumbarton and have something new in Palo Alto.  We were excited by the high reviews but were dissapointed by the food.  I had the chilaquas. .   Which I don't think I spelt right;  The eggs were good potatoes mah. . . and the black beans tasted canned. My gf had the blue monkey pancakes.  Blueberries and banana pancakes. Sounds like it should be good but it was really meh. not mah. Service was slow and not very attentive.  Not a great escape from the lower east bay.  Most likely wouldn't come back.
We came here for brunch at the suggestion of a friend as well as the reviews on yelp. We were pleasantly surprised by the cute atmosphere and lovely decorations on the inside. Unfortunately, the food and service were only average.  The food is definitely over-priced. Here is what we ordered and how it came out: Spring Vegetable Scramble - No flavor and dry Rock Shrimp Frittata - Extremely Dry and over-cooked Eggs Florentine - Eggs we're too raw and runny Unfortunately, we did not get a chance to try the pancakes which looked a lot better than what we ordered. I would consider coming back again to try the pancakes alone. If anything, it is desirable for its quaint atmosphere and decorations. Maybe a nice place to catch up with a friend you haven't seen in a long time. Other than that, there are plenty of better brunch places at a better price.
My wife and I went to Saint Michael's Alley for a work function. Somehow they managed to comfortably get all 50 people seated in this small restaurant  with enough room for the wait staff to serve while our guest speakers were addressing the crowd. When we first arrived my wife and I kept looking for the back room or rest of the restaurant, but the enlarged front room is also their dining room. Our mingle for about an hour the wait staff serving exquisitely prepared appetizers. They have a small select house wine list with some very good choices and a nice size wine cellar list. Don't even bother with the CA Sauvignon Blanc as for a dollar more per glass the French Sauvignon Blanc is clearly a 92 point wine. Ceaser salad to start was a great choice for my wife and I. The salad was very fresh with baby romaine leaves and fresh shaves parmesan cheese. The dressing was light and not too much. For dinner we selected the "MISO MARINATED SALMON FILET, DAIKON CUCUMBER RELISH WASABI MASHED POTATOES, SOY REDUCTION, DAIKON SPROUTS" and hold the srpouts. The salmon filet had a tasty yet slightly spicy wasabi marinade that could be tasted all the way through to the center of each bite. Perfectly paired with cucumber relish and mashed potatoes. Dinner was perfect with a glass of their house chosen Pinot Noir for me and a glass of Chardonnay for my wife. After dinner I had a cup of coffee and my wife had the "BAKED MEYER LEMON CUSTARD WITH FRESH RASPBERRIES AND WHIPPED CREAM" which she said was good, but not overly fantastic. The food and wine here at Saint Michael's Alley is excellent, but it is very small and I can see how if you don't have reservations you may not get to eat on a regular night.
I have been going to St. Mikes for a few years now--and keep coming back.  They have a winning formula: Excellent food (and I mean truly excellent!), an extensive and thoughtful wine menu, and -- bizarre for this area -- very reasonable prices.  There are no weak spots on the menu.  Whether you go for a pork chop (a dish for which they are unmatched in the Bay Area) , pasta, or fish, the food is always knock your socks off good.  They are also very friendly and welcoming.  I usually ask Michael to pick a bottle of wine for my wife and I to share, and the result is always something new and interesting.  He's a veritable dictionary of local wines, but is too modest to show off his knowledge. What I think is presently holding them back from a fifth star is that their service has had to catch up a bit to the new space--I think they literally just need more feet on the ground.  At both a recent lunch and dinner I found myself looking for a waiter and feeling a bit lost in the experience.  This didn't happen in the old space,  where they were unrushed but prompt--they hit the perfect balance of giving you the sense of a leasurely meal while being there if you needed something.  I think in part because it was an open area that it was easier to manage.  I suspect that once they get used to the new space that will improve. So, overall, I recommend this place highly.  Its delightful.  Food, wine, and value are all five stars.  Hopefully the service will catch back up soon.  The new space is very pretty, too.
It was a Thursday for birthday lunch w/ my girlfriend. We heard they opened their new location - so thought we'd check it out. It's tucked away what looks like below a condo complex. it has a cute garden like patio which was a nice surprise for downtown palo alto. We were seated immediately (with reservations). the atmosphere is very cozy modern with a touch of luxury with it's beautiful wrought iron candle chandeliers. I love fall menus, so i went w/ the theme and chose the butternut squash and goat cheese puff pastry tart as a starter and the sweet potato gnocchi as the main. the tart was magnificent! a little overpowered w/ the fried onion garnish, but very very scrumptious. The gnocchi on the other hand - you could not really taste the sweet potatoe - but more of the dough. to finish, we had to have dessert and chose the pear tart tartin with vanilla bean gelato. it was very delightful - and not too sweet. i was however, disappointed they failed to put a candle on the dessert as i had requested in the reservation. nonetheless, i will be back to try more!
I came here on a sunday for brunch a few weeks ago and got the salmon eggs benedict.  It was pretty good, but definitely nothing special. Be aware, this place is very popular and does get busy, you can easily have to wait 20 minutes or more for a table, especially if you have more than 4 people.
Came here for a Sunday brunch recently. The place opens at 10 am on the weekend and the line of people waiting usually stretches around the block. If you want to wait under 5 minutes for a table, show up at 10am. If you want to wait 2 hours, show up at 10:30am. Got the chunky monkey pancakes (couldn't they have come up with a better name?) filled with banana, chocolate chip, and walnuts. Pretty delicious. Chorizo omelet was pretty decent too but nothing spectacular. Would have given it 4 stars for food, decor and service but the price is on the ridiculous side. For how much I paid for brunch, I expect bottomless mimosas or a ribeye steak, not bacon, eggs and pancakes. Still a pretty hip and happening place though so would probably return.
came from sunday brunch. the wait wasn't too long, since we showed up 30 minutes before closing. Had the St. Michael's omelette, comes with bacon (wasn't super crispy bacon though). i was skeptical about an omelet with cream cheese inside, but it was surprisingly yummy and an awesome combination! Eggs florentine, perhaps because i had my half after i had the omelet, but it was a bit soggy, but perfectly poached egg. yum. a bit pricey though.
I want to be fair and state, first off, that I've only come here for brunch and we only tried two things: the banana pancakes and a smoked-Gouda omelet. So my rating could have *possibly* been different if we came for dinner, for example. We arrived around 1:45 p.m., and it was crazily busy. But I actually liked the warm, bustling atmosphere--obviously, the roomful of diners were having a good time. Unfortunately, the dining area was overly warm and poorly ventilated--after adding my name to the waiting list, I stepped outside with a greasy odor clinging to my coat. Although the waiters were not exactly friendly, they were brisk and competent, and that's perfectly fine with me. The food arrived surprisingly quickly, around the same time as our drinks. My husband's omelet was, admittedly, good--almost creamy in consistency, which is how I like my eggs, with a nice balance of filling ingredients. The accompanying side of potato quarters were well seasoned, with a tantalizing hint of spice--coriander, maybe?--but I was a bit surprised at the use of dried rosemary, rather than fresh. My pancakes were disappointing. At least the flavor was okay--it didn't have that bitter taste that you get when there's oil (versus melted butter) in the batter. But they were obviously overcooked, dry, and tough. On the one hand, I don't want to judge this restaurant by its pancakes alone (obviously, this isn't IHOP), but on the other, shouldn't a good restaurant be able to make something this basic? If you're the cook, and you see the pancakes are verging on charred, make a new batch, damn it. Another thing: The sliced bananas in the pancakes had that unmistakable dry, mealy texture of unripe bananas. I was also unimpressed with the sticky-handled maple syrup bottles. And--okay, call me spoiled, but I was a bit annoyed with the individually wrapped pats of butter that came with my pancakes. At a Holiday Inn breakfast, fine. At a "real" restaurant, can't I get a little whipped butter or at least some of the regular stuff in a dish, so I don't have to get my fingers all greasy, unwrapping each butter pat?
I've since also tried the dinner here, which is also very good indeed, and the prices are reasonable considering the quality of the food. Also, in the original review I opined that due to cost it was appropriate to go there once in a while. At this point, I'm there for brunch almost every week, cost be damned. They know my fiance's order by heart.
This has become our standby breakfast place in Palo Alto. It's intimate and chill, and the food is... Read more 
When it comes to brunch, I'm an eggs and potatoes kind of girl. I like sopping up the gooey yellow of a fried egg with something dense, like a piece of homemade toast or a couple of potatoes fried with onions and green peppers, or eating a soft scramble with cheese and avocados tossed in. So the first time I went to St. Michael's Alley, I kept it simple and ordered scrambled eggs, potatoes, and toast. Which was fine. But my eating partners ordered chilaquiles, and the minute their plates arrived, I knew they'd made the right choice. I recently had this dish myself, and I can't argue with my first impression: the spicy, tortilla-laced eggs are delicious. And who can object to eating well-prepared black beans in the morning? Mmm. What a soft, subtle, flavorful addition to the first plate of the day. By the way, St. Michael's breakfast potatoes are also good. Herby instead of oniony, which may not equal perfection in my mind, but it certainly works well too. One note: this place is hot inside. The air seems not to circulate at all. If you can get one of the outdoor tables in the shade, definitely do.
Used to go here for brunch when I grew up in the Bay Area. I miss it fondly. Not much more to be said that hasn't already been said on this page here before. I do fondly remember the pancakes, omelettes & the burgers. Did I already mention, I miss this place?
My husband and I are self claimed brunch enthusiasts. We moved to Palo Alto from the city but insist on driving up to have brunch at our favs Foreign Cinema, Chloe's or Universal. BUT that is now going to change after we've experienced our first meal at St. Michael's. In two words fantastic food. We ordered the daily special red pepper and corn soup. Hands down the best soup Ive ever had. Next we shared a Chilaquilles. Scrambled eggs with chiles, onions, feta, peppers, tortilla chips and other goodness! DELISH. Finally, we shared a french toast. Ate it the way it's supposed to, dunked in maple syrup with tart strawberries and powdered sugar. Overall we left very satisfied, $50 poorer and $5 lbs heavier!
We ate here for brunch with a party of 6 on a Sunday.  We got here about 11AM and waited about 15 - 20 mins outside (and it was raining) since its really crowded inside.  I don't think you can make reservations for brunch. Our waiter/host was very friendly.  I tried the Salmon Scrambled with a side of bacon. It was very tasty.  Right when my hot plate came out, I can smell the delicious dill.  Overall, good food but you might have to wait awhile for a table.
This review is for their brunch: In food terms, I think this is the best brunch in the area. My boyfriend, a coffee buff,  is reluctant to go here because he says the coffee isn't good, and he hates the wait. We agree on the wait time: when we wake up, we want food *now*, not to wait for 20-40 minutes without any food or coffee, surrounded by food smells.   This is their brunch achilles heel, as their seating capacity doesn't meet demand.  Recently, they've gone to putting tables and chairs on the sidewalk.  This just doesn't work - it's not a patio area, there's sidewalk traffic and traffic going to-from the Whole Foods nearby, this is a "compromise" that enables you to eat without an hour long wait.  Also, the room is structured in a way that a couple who wants a table is most likely going to be stuck near the door or near the kitchen. Nonetheless, their food is *divine*.  I ordered the blue monkey pancakes based on others' reviews here, and am now a big fan.  I've also learned to go with their specials - the last one was an amazing chicken-pepper scramble that tasted simply amazing.  I love that the roll is obviously homemade, the potatoes aren't oily, and I've never had trouble with the service (provided I"m willing to wait 30-40 minutes for brunch). So, if you're prepared to wait for the food - go for it.  If coffee is important, or you are hungry, I'd point you to other spots instead.
Great brunch (more nicely done standard stuff then anything super inventive).  pricey though.  $15 looked to be the median price for a brunch entree. I have to say their benedicts were great.  I had a egg florentine and my friend had the smoked salmon egg benedict and both were yummy.  Very "Palo Alto-y" and with good portion sizes.
This place is super cute and the staff members are all very helpful and friendly.  They change their menus every quarter (ish?) so that there are many seasonal ingredients- fresh taste. sweet potato gnocchi with bacon- kind of greasy but still tastes really good.  i'm not a bacon fan so i'll eat around it.  the gnocchi are cooked so that they aren't too chewy/mushy/hard or worse, dry.  and i can actually taste the sweet potato... score! the beet salad is good.  and the ahi tuna sandwich seals the deal.  can't go wrong with that! chicken mushroom wontons weren't what i expected, in a good way.  i thought it'd come as a thin crisp (kind of like thai restaurant crispy wontons), but these were something else.  plump sized wontons gently fried.  not too greasy!  good stuff.  and the seasonal ginger coconut carrot soup is delicious! this is definitely one of the better restaurants in palo alto- in terms of service and food quality.  not uppity like some places... paid great attention to me even though i showed up in a beat up sweatshirt.  :)
My favorite Palo Alto lunch spot.  There's always something healthy on the menu, so I can eat out and not worry I won't have healthy options. Great wait staff and ambiance as well.  After reading through the other reviews, I plan to head to St. Mikes for brunch this weekend!
What I loved! Really good earl grey - always makes my day. And they had honey and milk to go with it, which I appreciate. Great service - very sweet waitress (the one with pinkish hair in the back). Outdoor seating - so pleasant on a sunday morning! Crayons and paper tablecloth - entertaining during the wait for the food, which was not long at all. Speedy! Good quantity of food - you won't leave hungry. Oregano herbed home fries were great. Nice biscuit too. I also love organic and local foods. :) What made me go 'meh...' The eggs florentine ($16) - hollandaise was flavorless, onions were not caramelized enough, english muffin would have been delicious if it hadn't drowned already in mushroom juices. Though the poached eggs were done perfectly. The ham and grilled pineapple omlette ($15) - eggs not very fluffy, low-quality cheese. Nice idea though. They need to step it up a notch on the food. For the price, I expect a little bit better. Atmosphere was perfect.
Mmm.. We arrived at opening time on a warm Saturday afternoon. After being greeted by our hostess, we were seated in this cozy little cafe. We ordered the blueberry pancakes, chicken apple sausage, and omelet. All of them were delicious. I'm excited to come back and try all the other goodies they have. :)
While wondering where to eat for brunch on Sunday while visiting my best friend, she suddenly remembered people raving about this place, and we decided to see what the fuss was all about. As we stood in waiting for a table in the chilly late morning, I know i was wondering if it was worth the wait.   After waiting almost an hour we were very happy to find that it infact was worth the wait. I am a huge Eggs Benedict fan, and i absolutely loved it.  The hollandaise sauce was not too rich, just perfect, the portion size was excellent and the potatoes were just right, you know a little crunchy on the outside, and soft on the inside, not chewy and not overly seasoned.  My best friend isn't a breakfast person, and absolutly loved the Eggs Florentine. I would definitly go recommend the food here if you have the time to wait.
We visited there on Sunday branch. Because it was rated high in Zagat, I may have expected too much. It was cold Sunday morning. So all waiting customers were waiting inside the door. Our table was close to the door. So it was cold because the door was opened and closed frequently and not comfortable because of standing people just behind the seats. I can see waiters and waitresses were trying hard for serving, but the premise was so packed that they couldn't move smoothly. Actually it took more than 10 minutes until coffee comes out and more than 30 minutes until french toast comes out. But, it's ok. It was fatal for us that our eggs and french toast were cold. That was disappointing. (Taste was good, though..) However, I like to believe this is not their normal situation. I hope I will be back in uncrowded hour next time.
This is my favorite place in downtown PA, at least for dinner(haven't been for lunch yet). It's small and intimate, which means you need reservations, but thankfully once inside you don't need to shout at the person across the table from you. It's the most elegant restaurant in the area, great presentation, inventive dishes but not over the top, and nothing is overpriced for the quality. It's a perfect place for special occasions. Great wine selection as well. My personal favorite dishes are the mushroom wontons and the ahi, but thankfully it's one of those places where you really can't go wrong. Make sure to leave room for dessert as well.
One of my favorite places for brunch in the area.  The pancake specials are reliably good.  The benedicts are excellent...particularly the florentine benedict.  I also love the St. Mike's Omelet. The staff is pleasant and efficient. Sure, there's usually a wait for brunch seating, but it's rarely very long unless there is more than one large group.
Five stars for brunch service only. It's my go-to place whenever my old co-worker and I meet up. Our visit today was superb! I was running a little late (Asian time!) and got there around 11:45 AM. My friend had arrived 5 minutes prior and the wait was maybe 3 minutes from the time I arrived (it pays to have a party of 2!). We both stuck with our standards: She ordered the Smoked Salmon Benedict (toasted english muffin topped with smoked salmon, tomatoes, shaved red onion, capers, 2 poached eggs, and a dijon hollandaise), coffee. And I, ordered the Breakfast Medley (2 pancakes, 2 eggs, 2 slices of bacon w/ their roasted potatoes) - subbed the daily special pancakes (Lemon Poppyseed w/ whipped cream and fresh strawberries ) instead of the buttermilk (for only 50 cents more) along with my usual pot of Earl Grey. Our food literally came out in 7 minutes! (Record for ANY restaurant). Everything looked scrumptious. My eggs were PERFECT (scrambled hard the way I like 'em) and the lemon poppyseed pancakes were sooo yummy! My friend's Smoked Salmon Benedict was just how she remembered them (we are creatures of habit and stick to the tried and true!) and we both cleaned our plates. The wait can be long - so, put your name down and walk over to Whole Paycheck for a gander. But trust, it's DEFINITELY worth  the wait.
LOOOOVE THIS PLACE! I almost always get the amazing eggs Benedict w/ smoked salmon, and I always find it awesome. The hollandaise is fresh and not overly done, the capers accent the sauce perfectly, and the baked potatoe chunks are just right.
Busy sunday brunch - good service. fresh food... Ordered the french toast with fresh strawberry on top. well done! Will come back again...
Being in the San Francisco Area of the first time, I have to say that this definitely made my trip a good one. I had their Eggs Benedict and bar none, one of the best's I have had.  Coming from Houston, where we have over 3000+ restaurants, thats something to say. The Raspberry Muffin I had that morning was AWESOME. The ambiance and setting was just too much as it was a perfect day to enjoy a Sunday brunch. Highlight:  Besides the food, seeing the owner come in on his roller blades.  Definitely put a smile on my face
Surprisingly, there wasn't a long wait so finally got to try this place. I really liked the Salmon benedict and Blue Monkey (Blueberry/banana) pancakes! The veggie scramble was good if you want something a bit more healthy. Their potatoes that came with the entrees were unique. Great service. Will probably try sitting outside next time.
Best brunch spot in town.  Delicious waffles, bacon, eggs Florentine.   Goes well with a mimosa carafe (ask for their fresh squeezed grapefruit juice instead of OJ!)
Good food. Would recommend: St. Michael's Alley omelette (egg is airy and lots of great fillings) and the frittata. However, 2 set backs: 1) Don't bring friends. You never know how long the wait is going to be. 2) It gets quite smokey (from the kitchen) inside, especially in the in winter time when they can't open the doors.
I went here once with my boyfriend on the recommendation of a roommate and had a great evening and then had another great evening with two close friends of mine. The menu is really good, they even have local wines on their list. The atmosphere is really pleasant but a little too loud for my personal preference. I do not feel that the service is slow, in fact I find the pace just right for a nice dinner and the staff are very polite. I hate being rushed through dinner and I like that they expect for their patrons to stick around and enjoy themselves. This type of restaurant is not common in Palo Alto. My one complaint was that the waiter told me sunchokes were a smaller artichoke. I went to the Mountain View Farmers Market a few weeks later only to discover that they are a tuber that looks a lot like ginger - and nothing like a small artichoke.
This place is the place to go in PA when you want reasonably priced homey food in a low key atmosphere. We had a great brunch.  I had French Toast (thick Challa bread) covered with strawberries and dusted with confectioners sugar.  Just writing about it makes me hungry. My companion had  Turkey club sandwich, generously portioned.  Both dishes were 10 bucks each.  You can't get much in Palo Alto for ten bucks, but here you can and we had a great meal. Restaurant is adorable, in an old building with lofty ceilings.  Service was fine, food was good, bill was low - what more  could you want?
Went there for Sunday brunch today. Had a bit of everything and all of it excellent--bacon, poached eggs, eggs Florentine, biscuits, pancakes--not just me alone! Noise level is a bit high, but maybe the new location will improve on this. Have had many lunches there and burger, turkey club, salads have all been exceptional. They also have a limited but good wine selection. I don't think you can do better in downtown Palo Alto for excellent food and service.
Lemon poppyseed pancakes = yum.  My favorite brunch place.  The lemon pancakes are a special that they rotate in about once a month - when I see them featured on the chalkboard outside my heart melts.  When they aren't available, I usually go for the belgian waffle with sliced banana and a dollop of yogurt  - it is also divine. As other yelpers have pointed out, St. Michael's Alley is probably the cutest place in Palo Alto.  It's very charming, there's lots of natural light, and the servers are kind and attentive.   I've gone for dinner as well and have never been disappointed.  They use fresh ingredients and feature local wines.  It's the kind of place that feels special, but without any pretentiousness - just good food and lovely surroundings. They are supposedly opening a second location a block away on Homer & High, but it seems to be taking forever...
St Michael's Alley is in my top 5 list of restaurants and I am extremely picky. It is consistently top notch, has excellent service (I've seen the same waiters there for over five years), uses high quality, fresh seasonal ingredients, has a well balanced menu (not too short, not too long, something for everyone from the vegan to the carnivore), and is reasonably priced for a good time out. I have been going here for ten years. I used to go for dinner and weekend brunch and both are excellent. Since having kids 3.5 years ago, we now only go for dinner. It's become our standard and reliable place to go to now. We don't get to eat out alone very often and when we do we want to make sure we have a good experience. So, St Michael's Alley is a safe bet for a good meal. The food is simply excellent. They have the best Caesar salad -- very fresh, crispy romaine, high quality reggiano, well balanced dressing, and good croutons. The soups are hearty and hit the spot. They are never overly salty. They are deep with flavor, never too creamy. The soups capture the essence of whatever kind it is, from butternut squash to gazpacho. The calamari appetizer is crispy, fresh, and not too greasy. They make use of mushrooms in various ways which often find their way into delicious appetizers. For entrees, I am very fond of their various pasta and fish incarnations. I've had risotto in various flavors, baked gnocchi w/ basil pesto & Gorgonzola, pasta and wild mushrooms, and all types of homemade ravioli (stuffed with beets, pumpkin, butternut squash and so on). For fish, I've had Wild California King Salmon there countless times and it's always cooked as it should be -- served hot, slightly crispy on the outside, juicy and slightly pink on the inside. It flakes off the fork just right and makes you smile when you eat it. The halibut is a no brain-er and always cooked to perfection. If you've ever cooked halibut at home, you know it can be tricky to get just right. I like to order it here because I know it'll be good. I've had their scallops which are succulent, a decent size, and served with different seasonal preparations. Dessert is also very good. Bread pudding, chocolate cake, gelato... they do it right. Order one dessert for two people and split it. I've even had their espresso and it's good. Wine and draught beer selection is good. They have many California wines by the glass. They are usually fresh. And, if you find the wine is not the proper temperature or has gotten a little vinegary, don't hesitate to tell the waiter. I'm usually too shy, but they are friendly there. They really aim to please. It's hard to find fault with St Michael's Alley, but you wouldn't believe me if I were 100% positive. My biggest gripe is the noise level. The ambiance in general is quite nice. They often have photographs on the wall, sometimes taken by the owner. But, when it's packed, it can be deafening. At first, you don't notice it. But, then you find yourself shouting to the person two feet away from you. Another minor complaint is their hot tea. I was excited to see their tea selection and to hear the waiter tell me it's loose leaf tea. They are correct, however it's served in a tiny tea ball which has very little infusion capability. The tea comes out like flavored water. So, just don't order the tea and you'll have a great experience!
This place has great food and such a cute interior!  I've only been here twice.  The first time I got one of the specials of the day (a chicken wrap) and it was SO delicious.  The second time I got an omelette, and that was pretty good, but nothing special. They have paper covered tables and crayons provided so you can draw on the tables.  I suspect it's for kids, but my friend and I had fun with it anyway.  Don't be fooled, though, this place  is a little more on the fancy side. My only bad thing to report was the service.  I think we must have had a pretty junior waitress my second time there.  But, she was probably just learning still, so I don't think that should detract too much from my score. Overall, 5 stars!
This was our first time at St. Michael's Alley. My sister and her husband recommended it and joined us for dinner. Everything we had was amazingly delicious. We did an usual meal where we ordered many things and shared. Mushroom cake, heirloom tomatoes (locally grown), goat cheese bruchetta appetizers all delicious. Dinners we ordered were the chicken with peach sauce - absolutely melt in your mouth moist and flavorful and the lamb kabobs. Desserts were profiteroles and dark chocolate torte - so light and not too rich that we could actually eat it all and not feel sorry later. Topped it off with a perfectly made decaf latte. The waiter was perfectly attentive - not too hoovering and definitely kept things on task with well timed inquiries. My ice tea was never empty. We ate in the bar which was very warm and comfortable but the outside area is wonderful as well with seasonal heaters for comfort. I would highly recommend this for any event, casual or special.
Yelpers rave about the brunch, but we came here for dinner. High marks for quality and affordability. Wines were well-priced. We had two good bottles for around $40 each. They had an excellent selection of beers. Service was good. Dessert rocked - strawberry bread pudding floored my wife. Why not five stars? Most entrees were good (we had a party of 8), but not great. And you can't have five stars if your entrees don't kill. Another recommendation: This place is small and comfortable, but is too loud for a party of 8 to have good conversation.
Perfect for a date or for brunch... This small restaurant is a gem in Palo Alto.  Nice wait staff; the menu that uses fresh, seasonal ingedients, and is satisfying if you are looking for a yummy meal.  I'm a fan of this place any time of year.  Many friends I have recommended it to have loved it as well.
I've eaten every meal here - brunch, lunch, and dinner. It's not inexpensive, but you get what you pay for - outstanding service (shout out to Rigel!), delicious food, and a pleasant atmosphere. It's a great place to meet with your special someone, some friends, family, or even the office. Come for brunch around 11:00 a.m. on a Sunday morning and you're looking at an hour wait - but just pull up a chair at the bar inside and sip on a mimosa and enjoy a fresh scone while you're waiting for your table. You might even run into the owner, Michael. Reservations certainly recommended on the weekends, and they're not on OpenTable. The food is outstanding - for brunch I recommend the St. Mike's omelet, although it's very rich, so you might want to go for the blue monkey pancakes (blueberries and bananas mixed into the batter), for lunch you could opt for the Salad Nicoise, which features seared ahi instead of regular tuna... for your dinner appetizer the wild mushroom cake is amazing. Wine list is also great - lots of local wineries are featured.
Came here on dinner recommendations for an anniversary and was blown away.  The place has a great ambiance and the service is up to par.  Perfect for dates and the waiter was always checking up on us. We ordered a brisque for an appetizer and it was terrific.  I ordered bacon-wrapped scallops and the texture was amazing.  The scallops were huge and the freshness was definitely apparent.  My girlfrend  got the lamb and she was really satisfied.  The prices are decent for the quality.  I definitely recommend the place for anyone who's looking for a romantic dinner.  The one thing I do need to try is their brunch.
Great (creative) taste. Overpriced tiny portions. This is not the place to go if you're hungry.
St Michael's alley has the best brunch food in the Peninsula.  Everything is done right- the food, the ambiance. My only knock on this place is that it can get crowded (just like any good brunch places on weekends).  Try to avoid peak hours if possible.
Food was delicious- St. Mike's Omlette- Fluffy eggs, fresh spinach bacon and melted cheese, not a big fan of the cream cheese. will order without next time. The country potatoes were very well seasoned not to light or heavy and didn't feel like you were killing your atkins diet by digging in. Fruit Parfait Sundae- Fresh fruit and yogurt with some nuts, pretty basic but the yogurt is homemade and awesome. Orange Juice- just need to know that every table in the restaurant and outside someone has a glass Service- You are in Palo Alto, and although I know you can expect to run into some noble prize winner of physics douche you don't expect that from your server. Chris was our douche server. For food that good i would guess you have service to match but here is where he messed up. took our order and didn't see him again until after our food arrived, we would ask him for refills which he would acknowledge but never bring. His other servers had to help him out kind of like when you do a group project and there is that one guy who is tardy, not interested and lazy. So the other servers were very nice. He messed up one of our orders but that's ok, everything was good. When he brought the check i took it and gave him my amex, told me they dont except, no problem, just gave him my MC. he walked 10 feet processed it and came back and put it in front of my dad. I felt slighted, but i was upset not so much for the miscues but more for the fact this guy just seemed a little snobby. that's all. We were the only Asian people in the restaurant so maybe he thought we were your typical cheap Asians. It crossed my mind so I tipped 20% just to prove the contrary. So basically I paid 20% for crappy service. ugh
My boyfriend and I were SO excited to come here, but we always seemed to think of the too late and couldn't get a reservation- the leave a message system is the worst! By the time we ended up going to St michael's, our expectations were pretty high, so maybe it's not fair the level of disappointment we had in our experience there. So, here's what happened: We went the Saturday before valentine's day and had a reservation for 8:00 pm, which is later for a dinner res, but not totally out of the norm. Even though we had a reservation, we were not seated until 8:30 pm, which was pretty annoying. We were seated by a large party with a baby, which although not the restaurants fault entirely, it entirely sucked to have a baby crying through what should have been a relaxing quiet meal. My boyfriend and I ordered quickly, but were then sitting at put table waiting for our appetizer for an entire hour!! It ended up being served with our entrees. Totally unacceptable. When the food did arrive, the portions were comparable to the cheesecake factory, as was the quality of the food. I had the gnocchi, my boyfriend had a pork sholder, or something similar. After waiting for so long, the food seemed just so-so.  Not what I expected at all. With so many great restaurants in the area with awesome service, I am baffled why this establishment does so well. Perhaps we caught them on an off night.
I was very satisfied with my complete dinning experience here.  The place is classy, clean, my waitress was attentive, cool, nice and the food was totally delicious and it sure hit the spot!  I went there during brunch with a very classy lady because we were craving Smoked Salmon Eggs Benedict and after looking for spots that served this particular dish we settled on this place. Every bite of that damn dish was heavenly and you must check out the photo I'm including so you can be a judge for yourself.  Of course we had to top our meal with a Mimosa because it was Sunday after all!  Can't wait to come back and bring my mother here.
Delish and a great atmosphere! I spent my Birthday brunch on a Sunday here and the staff nicely accommodated 10 of my friends. All the waiter and waitresses were really great refilling mimosas and water.  Everyone enjoyed their food. I can't wait to go back!
What an excellent little find.  Out of the way (near Whole Foods) in a little corner of Palo Alto.  The food is excellent!  The Mushroom Cake is devine!  My Salmon was excellent!  Service is very attentive... Take a friend!
What a horrible restaurant and poor dining experience. I went for Sunday brunch. While the place looks like a charming New York City street side cafe from the outside, the resemblance ends there. Although the menu is nicely put together and looks delicious, the food quality is poor. The fruit on my plate was not fresh and the taste of the dishes on the table was marginal at best. The service is lousy and a little pretentious - which I'm actually OK with if the quality is good. It wasn't. Criticisms of the food quality and service permeate this restaurant's reviews.
For one of the highest ranked places in Palo Alto, St. Michael's Alley disappointed me. A LOT. 1. We waited a lot for our drinks (an orange juice and a coffee). The ice cubes on our water, served previously, were all melted by the time the drinks arrived. 2. I ordered the Eggs Florentine, my husband ordered the peach waffle with a side of sausage. Again, it took a while for the food to arrive. The side of sausage didn't come at all. 3. We decided not to wait for the sausage and asked for our check. When my husband told the waiter (a different one from the person who actually took our order) that the sausage never came, he replied "Well, we're out of sausage". Nobody bothered to tell us that. 4. The check arrived. The side of sausage was charged. We complained. 5. With yet another misstep corrected, we finally paid. And left for never to return again. Oh, and the food is actually pretty average if you ask me. Nothing "oh wow, this is good!". The peach waffle that sounds so good is a very plain dish. There are better places around, for both service and food.
Had the smoked salmon eggs benedict. The potatoes that came with it were dried and shriveled,  I barely touched them. The biscuit seemed like an afterthought, also nothing special. My salmon eggs benedict came out lukewarm and were difficult to cut through because they were in their own separate dish. Personally, I like having all the sauce and egg mix with my potatoes. The taste of the dish was pretty decent, though not worth 18 bucks in my opinion. The hollandaise was not too heavy and the red onion and capers were a nice contrast to the sauce. The ambiance of the place is nice and clean, though the noise level is relatively high. The highlight of the brunch was the mimosa which was a good balance of champagne and orange juice, not too bitter. Overall a decent experience, however I most likely won't be going back.
I don't like that I had to give this place a star. A couple weeks ago I had what I thought was the worst restaurant experience of my life. At least I thought "It can't get any worse than this." Boy was I wrong! Picture this. You sit down to Valentine's Day brunch with your fiancee. She orders french toast with strawberries. She starts to eat and then spits a strawberry out. It has a clump of dirt on it. She stirs the strawberries around and finds there is a watery puddle of dirt on the plate. Seriously? My food was fine, so I still would have given them at least three stars, except the manager actually had the nerve to say this to me. "Well, they do come out of the ground, we do the best we can." No, your best is thoroughly cleaning the dirt out of your food until it's clean. In a weird kind of way, it's like your job or something. If she had just said "I apologize, there's no excuse for that, I hope you give us another chance to make it up to you." we would have been cool. On the upside, at least I have a good story now to tell my 20 or so local clients who eat our regularly. Owned. Thanks for ruining valentine's day St. Michael's Alley. Edit: Apparently the owner thought he was helping himself with his comment. There is a big difference between a bit of dirt and a clump. You can read my other reviews, I don't just run around slamming people for no reason. You have to work really hard to get me tweaked out at you. Keep on digging that hole deeper Mike. A professional would understand that arguing with a dissatisfied customer is not the way to go. If you had just apologized for the bad experience and asked me to give you another chance I would have taken it as a sign that you've worked to correct the problem and automatically upgraded your review to reflect that. I love that comment by the way: "Organic strawberries come from the ground." Thanks for the hot tip. Where do non-organic strawberries come from? Are you saying that if I come to St. Michael's I should expect dirt on my food?
I'm re-posting my original comment for this place, because YELP  just informed me that my post was removed because I had the wrong address.  Sorry bout that YELP! Unfortunately, Mike (The owner's comments) didn't follow which is too bad because his response to my personal experience, was not only off the charts it was clearly out of line!  His vile unprofessionalism that was expressed to me I would never go back.  I'm satisfied in knowing that the original post has already been shared with my personal and professional network. I didn't deserve to be called names and reprimanded for expressing my opinion. Original Post and my comments to Mike's original reply to me: I went there yesterday for brunch. Typically a good crowd outside signals a pretty good breakfast! The wait wasn't as bad as I thought it was so I was happy about that, another STAR. Very cute place nicely decorated and the restrooms are clean! All good! Now let's get to the real nitty gritty! Service: Our server was awesome! Very courteous and helpful when I ordered my meal, since I don't eat pig he suggested if I would like fruit instead! Also, he was able to request my eggs the way I liked!! TWO BIG STARS for him! Most servers would have just said..oh well..can't substitute anything in place of the piggy that was offered! He rocked!! Food: Ehh! I've had better for the price. My house potatoes were luke warm and were pretty bland for the color and they way they looked. The egg whites  were good. The Buttermilk  pancakes...ICK! Taste like fast food pancakes. MINUS A BIG STAR! You know I read a lot of good reviews from Yelp so I went for the first time to try it out. Perhaps my expectations were too high but, if you have to wait (which I didn't mind...it was so beautiful out) the food better be damn good and hot too!! I could have make a better breakfast! I wouldn't suggest going here! However, Peet's Coffee and Whole Food is right across the street! Attention! Attention! Sorry folks...Thanks to Mike the owner for pointing out to me that I had the wrong address!! Forgive me! Yes the correct address is 806 Emerson St., Palo Alto, CA After the remarks from Ower Mike to me!! His restaurant just got reduced to ONE STAR! **In his original comment to me he called me a BRAT and then went off in a irate tirade at me for my opinion!** Professionalism at it's best here! Please note his comments to me NOW are much more docile than before!!! Mike, Don't get pissed at me because the food sucked that I RECEIVED! Good service does not overcompensate for poor quality food! Second, I'm entitled to my opinion on what was served to me...I'm not going paint a rosy picture for you...take the criticism and do better however, don't bother bitching at the customer!! If you know anything about marketing...bad news travels a lot faster than good, and now my wonderful circle of YELPERS knows about your attitude towards your customers that didn't have a 4 or 5 star review!!! YOU single handily just commented yourself on the bad list of my friends reading this!! Good thing your waiters don't take customer service lessons from you! Being in the customer service industry myself I would never treat my customers (past, present or potential) the way you just did to me! This is basic business! LEARN IT!!
Been waiting to come here since I pass by trying to find Whole Foods. Plus I love brunch and reading all these great reviews. Its a cute little restaurant but perfect for brunch. I end up ordering the Spring Scramble. It was de-lish! I didn't enjoy the potatoes that came with it but the biscuit was good. I just I had jam. I also test out the Banana Pancakes, the pancakes was very fluffy but the bananas was okay. They just add bananas but I wish they would caramelized them and totally add extra flavor. Overall it was a great experience and I would like to come back and try other dishes.
My boyfriend's mom lives in Palo Alto and we recently went to St. Michael's for brunch... Let me start by saying I don't remember what I had exactly. I want to say I had the Autumn Scramble...but that may just be because my name is Autumn and I'm getting it confused with the name of the scramble. It was some sort of scramble. I'm almost positive there was a season or month or day of the week in the name, and I am dying to call it an Autumn Scramble. In any event, it was pretty good. I ate it all. But I usually eat it all. And then I usually eat some more. The scramble in question came with house potatoes, which I had them replace with a large pile of spring mix (there goes the season again...) that came lightly dressed with a zippy vinaigrette. I don't need my own potatoes because I am on a diet and the ones on my boyfriend's plate always taste better anyway. And boy, were his potatoes ever out of this world! They had me wishing I had my own. The food was fine and all, but the real stand-outs here are the atmosphere and service. The restaurant is on the small side and is very cozy and warm with crisp table linens and soft colors. This is a great place for a casual family breakfast, brunch, or lunch. The service was friendly and efficient. A man who appeared to be one of the owners was there and was extremely nice and welcoming. Brunch dishes were in the $12-$15 range; a steal considering the location and great environs. We're not in Palo Alto too often, but we'll definitely go back with Mamacita.
Aight, I was seriously tempted to give this place 4 and a HALF stars, but I wasn't technologically savvy enough to accomplish that. Great Cali fusion.  One can never get enough of the stuff.... Service, for starters... they were busy, so we weren't given the ideal amount of attention, but I must say our server was incredibly friendly, knowledgable, and helpful when we DID have his attention. I had the 910 house Savignon Blanc, which was pretty great for a summer white.  My companion had the Santa Cruz D-something Chardonnay (sorry, the excellent wine renders my memory a bit fuzzy), that was NOT the Dehlinger (allegedly more oaky and $$$) by the glass. To start, my companion had the cream of mushroom soup, which was good, and I had the wild mushroom cakes, at the suggestion of a few Yelpers.  Maybe a little too much hype, but it was enjoyable.  In a moment of weakness and utter self-indulgence, I actually dipped a morsel of the cake into the soup, and found that to be excessive-yet-delicious-fungigoodness.  I also enjoyed the bread, which had WALNUTS in it.  Christ, that's brillance if I ever heard of it. So my companion had the maple glazed salmon, which he apparently enjoyed.  Me, The VegYelptarian, ordered the roasted corn risotto...which in all honesty, would have paired better with a Chardonnay (but I knew that going into it, TOTALLY my fault), and could have been better, quite simply.  It was a bit more runny than a risotto should be.  it's a shame, because the website promised (and I was expecting to order) a unique beet ravioli special. For dessert, I ordered the banana blueberry bread pudding with amaretto gelato on top, and my companion the pineapple white chocolate tart.  Both were good, but some weird part of my brain is remorseful for having skipped the dark chocolate mousse tort.  I guess there's always next time, that of which I'm confident there will be.... In closing, good coffee afterwards, and the bathroom passed the test with flying colors.  I think it is certainly something any Palo Alto diner should experience at least once...
3.5, a bit pricey for the fare had the blue monkey pancakes which were delicious thick fluffy with full juicy blueberries (not shriveled) and perfect banana flavor eggs benedict could have been done better side potatoes were tasty didn't care for the hollandaise sauce, didn't like the tang could have poached the eggs better -- were not liquidy, really $16 for it? ambiance is nice
I used to work down the street from this place and have only had lunch here. The prosciutto wrapped salmon makes for a great entree and the roomis a quaint little space hidden behind La Morenita. I understand that they're doing brunch here on the weekend so as the weather gets nicer, I'll have to check that out.
This is a great place for a ladies brunch...especially if you get there right before it opens (the wait can be a monster if you arrive a little later).  This type of restaurant makes me so happy to be living in Northern California where there is sunshine and food is fresh.  YUM.
Do not go here. Valentines Day Brunch, we wait 20 mins for a table and watch a quasi famous young actress get seated before us even though she arrived 15 mins after us, but I let that one go. They claim fresh squeezed orange juice but I saw the waitress pour it from an Odwalla bottle. Cheaters. This place somehow got Palo Alto's "Most Romantic" but I find it chaotic, too smokey and way too LOUD. Still I am a laid back gal, and when my French Toast with Strawberries arrives looking sexy I dive right in. I had taken a few bites when I got a mouth full of what I thought was possibly a rotten strawberry, I swallow. Then another, and I hear sand or something in my teeth, I spit in napkin. I Look down at my plate to see what has become a 3x3 section of, MUD ON MY PLATE. I start flipping strawberries to find the are still dirty! But Im cool, and polite to our sweet waitress as I explain to her my experience and what we are all now looking at on my plate. She acts suprised, but somehow has an expression on her face that tells me this is not the first time she has seen MUD ON A CUSTOMERS PLATE. She then asks if I want another meal or a free glass of juice. NO thanks. I am busy watching the ever growing mud take over my plate. Then she leaves. The plate is still infront of me. Bad form. The WORST: We get up to leave and approach the manager. She actually has a fuss about comping us the strawberries! She has THE NERVE to tell us, "Well, they DO come from the ground" !!!##@@$$???? Happy Valentines Day.
I would kill myself for failing to discover this place in four years of living in the Bay, but I would need some assurance that there was a St. Michael's Alley in heaven, or wherever else my sinning suiciding ass would go.  So live to see another brunch on my next visit it is. We went for Sunday brunch at 1:30 and were seated within five minutes.  The restaurant is sweetly decorated, and on a gorgeous Palo Alto day, the wide windows let in the golden sunlight, and happiness settles in even before the food arrives. We ordered a pot of English breakfast tea, which was a mere $5.50 (a cup was $2.75), and it stretched out to eight cups for four people with one refill of hot water that still provided plenty of favor.  The tea was brewed from loose leaves and came to us perfectly steeped.  We sipped on the good, comforting tea and drew on the paper covering the tabletop with crayons, picking up even more happiness as we waited for the food. Then the food came, and my life was complete.  By sharing strategically, I managed to sample a good portion of the menu.  I split side orders of chicken apple sausage and overeasy eggs with one friend, and shared french toast and peanut butter pancakes (a special) with another.  I also stole several bite's of my friend's St. Michael's omelette.  The portions were no joke, either.  I finished everything and left in a state of potbellied bliss.  Prices were not bad for what we got, either.  I put in a little over $20 all told. Every bite of every dish was superb.  The chicken sausage was the absolute best chicken sausage I've ever tasted.  It was flavorful and nuanced, and the texture was spot on with just the tiniest bit of resistance meeting the teeth at every bite.  The eggs were cooked beautifully.  The St. Michael's omelette - fluffy eggs stuffed full of crispy bits of bacon, juicy mushroom, spinach, and cheddar and cream cheese melted into this perfect, gooey creamy filling - was heavenly.  It didn't even need ketchup.  It came with potato wedges, which were also wonderful, and a biscuit, which was maybe the only not-entirely-excellent part of the meal, as it was just the tiniest bit dry.  The challah french toast with strawberries and powdered sugar was some of the best french toast I've ever had.  It was spongey and tasty on its own, but with a drizzling of maple syrup, it was straight up wrongfully delicious.  I think the best thing I had, though, was the peanut butter pancakes - pancakes made with peanut butter in the batter and served with sliced banana and powdered sugar.  The pancakes were wonderfully soft and fluffy and the peanut butter flavor was pronounced.  I'd never had peanut butter pancakes before, and it was eye-opening.  With the banana and maple syrup, these pancakes definitely made one of the best brunch dishes I've ever had in my time on this planet.  I will dream of them, and I will probably cry the next time I visit St. Michael's Alley and they are not on offer.
An excellent brunch spot.  The place is small and cute, food is excellent and the service is pretty good.  The only downside is that it's a bit pricey ($12-16 for a brunch dish).  They don't take reservations for brunch so you want to get there not much after 10am opening, or you'll risk waiting for a long time.
FANTASTIC. LOVED our brunch this morning. If you like salmon, order the salmon scramble. It was deeeelish. and of course a mimosa. or two. Cute and cozy atmosphere.
It's your California food fare--can't go wrong. I'm more of lunch fan at St. Mike's just because there's not that long of a wait if at all that is if you make a reservation. Their chicken waldorf salad has always been a hit! The grilled chicken sandwich and seared ahi tuna sandwich is what order--all great--fresh. And believe or not--super fast service. Prices are super reasonable for the fresh & yummy food.
great place ot have brunch. try the eggs benedict. Like everyone says, the potatoes are to die for.
Man was I let down on this place.  I went in with great expectations and nothing really stood out giving it the WOW factor.  I ordered the Salmon scramble and the ingredients didn't mix well.  The salmon tasted dry, too much dill, coffee was bland and the biscuit was overcooked!  I will give credit to the potatoes, they were crispy and moist.
Great service, an interesting take on eggs benedict and nice outdoor seating. A little on the pricey side.
mmmm...this is a great, cute place for brunch...that is, if you can get seated!!  they don't take reservations for brunch, so it's first come, first serve.  i tried to come here for mother's day brunch, and the wait was basically 2 hours. yesterday, i came w/ two friends around 12:15, and we were seated in about 10 minutes.  we started w/ a carafe of mimosas, which was actually an entire carafe of fresh oj and then half a bottle of champagne.  we got to make them ourselves to our taste. for food, i got the smoked salmon scramble, which came w/ a side of potatoes, and it was delish.  my friend got the corn and pepper risotto, and my other friend got the st mike's omelet, which she says she never strays from.  everything was really good, and the restaurant is intimate and cute.
great service. it was so hard to decide on a plate since they all sounded wonderful. i eventually settled on the prosciutto wrapped halibut with sauteed spinach and buttermilk mashed potatoes and he decided on a 4 cheese ravioli. to start we shared a zucchini tart (perfectly flaky crust) and a spicy-SUPER DELICIOUS gazapcho with glasses of rose. perfect for the summer. i want gazpacho all the time now. i made this reservation about a month ahead since it was for a birthday dinner and they made sure to put a candle on his dessert and wish him happy birthday (btw, it was bread pudding and it was delicious; i had the vanilla panna cotta with fresh orange sorbet...yum!) the wine list is great. it is set up in terms of price and color which makes selecting a bottle really easy!
I really like the atmosphere here.  This place gets a lot of natural light which makes it perfect for a brunch.  You can order some nice mimosas, breakfast food, lunch food.  The ravioli here is splendid.  A good place for a family lunch, drinks with the gals, or a romantic morning breakfast.
Great place for brunch. We were a party of four. Everything was delicious. The only down side was the wait - 40 minutes for a party of 4 for brunch on Sunday at 12pm.
Been here twice for dinner, and while I can't for the life of me remember any of the dishes we had, I remember being absolutely satisfied and pleased.  Great California fusion in an atmospheric setting.  Tried to get in a number of times for weekend brunch and were always shut down because there were 9 million yuppies trying to do the same thing (and no, that doesn't make me a yuppie too).
I'm actually surprised they have so many stars with the service we received last night. I ordered the halibut not knowing it had bacon with it and I don't eat bacon, at all. So I apologized for overlooking that part of the menu and said if I could get one that didn't have bacon I would appreciate it. The waiter said, "well you're going to have to wait" I said that would be fine and waited for my food. Up until this point the waiter seemed great. When I got my food it tasted delicious, until I found more bacon in the dish. We then told him there's still bacon in the dish and he said "so...", like what do you want me to do about it. In which we replied, "we just thought you should know" he didn't ask us did we want something else, he didn't apologize (which is the least he could have done, since I've waited an hr for something I can't eat), or remove the food from the table. Then when we received the bill he had charged us for the uneaten halibut. When we kindly asked him to remove it because I couldn't eat it he grabbed the bill and had the audacity to say within earshot, "now that's two halibut gone". We asked to speak to the owner because we felt that he should know how his customers are being treated. After we saw the waiter obviously filling the owner in on what was going on, the owner went directly to another table to socialize with the people at the next table, which I thought was rude, if someone is having a problem that you know about you should go to them first before you want to hang out. He came over, we explained what had happened and said that waiter had worked there 10 years and people want to sit in his section, to which we replied, "well then I don't know why he was treating us this way," in no way was the owner even apologetic. If you go here god forbid you have a problem with your food because believe it or not it will always be your fault. I would expect this attitude from Applebee's not somewhere you're paying over $150 for 3 dinners.
Had an excellent dinner here with my mother one night and had brunch here with a friend this morning.  A bit on the expensive and noisy side but it's cozy and the waitstaff are really friendly.  The chilaquiles were great for brunch...never had them before but I highly recommend trying them.
Not impressed. Benedict sauce way too thin, filling the dish with watery sauce; "fresh orange juice" from plastic gallon containers (not fresh squeezed of course). Service is spotty. Lunch dishes may be better (haven't tried) - hence 2 stars.  Won't be back though. There are much better options out there.
I'm not super Palo Alto savvy, but I've generally found myself unimpressed with the over-priced / underwhelming restos there  *beat* until I met friends at St. Michael's Alley.   We enjoyed a delightful evening -- food was scrumptious, staff were friendly and casual, atmosphere was quaint and the company was ass-kicking.  SMA is a great recco for dinner with a few friends and/or something more intimate/romantic.
***BRUNCH REVIEW*** St. Michaels is the kind of place that is fancy enough to serve you coffee while your table is being prepared, but they don't.  They make you stand on the sidewalk in their "ambience" bushes amongst the tables that qualify for "outdoor seating" while people with parties smaller than six continuously excuse themselves past you for twenty minutes at 10:30am.  I guess I should make that 10:50. Their $2.50 blueberry muffins were dense and tough.  My grandma can get six muffins better than that for half the price on double coupon days at Stop and Shop.  Coffee was decent and they were polite enough when we actually were seated. After hearing others talking up the Blue Balled Monkey, I decided to let them have their fun, and after seriously considering the Belgain Waffle with peaches, opted instead at the last minute for the Veggie scramble since it included pesto.  I'm thinking I should have gone with the Benedict. The pesto was good for about half of the quantity of the meal, after that it was too overpowering.  I did quite enjoy the biscuit that came as a side, and the potatoes were finished nicely. Next time I'm going for the Monkey Cakes, and I'll see if i'm really getting my value for the $40 it will cost me to take my lady out to a nice brunch place.  Maybe afterwards I'll go spend $17 on a quart of organic ice cream at Whole Foods.
Great decor, friendly staff, reasonable prices, huge portions, and to top it off, super yums. "Blue monkey" pancakes are my favorite. Love this place!  Definitely New York-brunchy style and a rare find on the Peninsula. Love it! Also, they have crayons and drawing paper on tables. That makes it a 5 star breakfast/brunch place for me!
Great place for weekend brunch.
This is a very nice place for either a small group (up to 8 people) or dinner for two.  They have a very nice wine list and offer a solid menu selection.  One of the folks in our group who dines out a lot was stumped on what to order due to so many goo options.  While the place is cozy with high ceilings & tile floors, it was not extremely loud.  People in out group order a variety of entres and all were enjoyed.  Highlights were the Duck & Risotto.  The duck had a very nice cranberry orange demi-glaz that was delicious and a perfect fall meal.  The risotto was so good, my wife and I tried to make at home (it really was not as good).  If you get desert, go for the chocolate bread pudding.  The staff was freindly and attentive.  I am looking forward to trying brunch here one weekend.
I've been here for lunch and really liked it, so I decided to come here with my family for brunch on account of all the good reviews. Unfortunately, all we found was a long line and almost incredibly bland food. To top it all off, the food took nearly one hour to get to us after ordering. I have no idea why because it came out lukewarm and obviously heatlamped. I had the ham and pineapple omlette and shared the blue monkey pancakes. For my money, the pancakes were good, but not great (I liked the Old Pancake House much better).
Had the special pancakes (orange zest with strawberry & whipped cream topping) and the St. Mike's Omelet.  Both awesome!  I gotta try cream cheese in my own omelets!
I joined Yelp just because this place is way better than a lot of the recent reviews have suggested and people should know that. First, St. Michael's Alley has the best value of any upscale restaurant on the Peninsula.   A statistical estimator (a non-parametric one for those who care)  of restaurant quality using Zagat scores created by colleagues at Stanford ranks St. Mike's in the top five value restaurants in the Bay Area.  I think that's about right.  A great dinner for two with wine for 100 can't be beat.  That value is on par with Chapeau! in SF. I've been to this restaurant probably about 15 times over the past five years, maybe ten times for brunch and 5 for dinner.  Both are definitely worth it, especially if you're looking for California cuisine for dinner.  As for brunch, there aren't any better options between Santa Clara and Menlo Park.  Trust me. Wrapping up this, my first review, I have to strongly disagree with the comments of a previous poster that the service at this restaurant isn't great.  I could back time and again because of the service.  The servers are top notch and always go the extra step.  They added little 'happy birthday' confetti to the table after our reservation mentioned that special occasion.  The service when we get there is also warm and inviting.  On a recent visit, our waitress even asked about a trip we'd mentioned in a previous visit 3 months before.  IMHO, the staff are a pleasant bunch. Ok, enough.  Overall, St. Mike's deserves a better rating given the value of its great food, the variety of its menu and the pleasantness of the staff.
St Michael's Alley is easy to miss if you don't exactly know where it is located. However if you're familiar with Whole Food Market on Emerson, it is just on the corner of Emerson situated in a quaint little house-like location. The menu is a mix of Californian style and more 'traditional' items. To give you an idea of the variety, at lunch time, there is are sesame beef satays and then there is the Warldorf salad. Seared ahi tuna sandwich (with a wasabi aioli no less) sits comfortably alongside turkey melt panini. The dinner menu is more upscale with items such as Wild Mushroom Cake (ooh so delicious!), Chili and Cumin rubbed pork, to something as simple as spinach creamed risotto. Menu changes seasonally. There is also a brunch menu served on the weekends with choices like pancakes, omelettes, salads, sandwiches and soup.
Brunch is my fav meal, and St. Michael's Alley def knows their brunch.  I've been here for lunch during a weekday too and that was solid, but oh man if you're in the mood for gourmet brunch, come get it here.  Would go back more often if it was a geared a bit more toward a student budget, but every once in a while, it's worth a splurge, esp if you're like me and brunch is one of your fav meals!
Love this place....so much so that I eat here EVERY weekend on BOTH DAYS!! Fruit is always fresh and the granola is always tasty. Back in the "day" when I was not a Vegan, I tried almost everything on the Brunch menu...I still dream about the Blue Monkey Pancakes and my Husband the Florentine...SOOOOOO GOOD! The service is top notch and its a friendly neighborhood kinda place. I WISH WISH WISH Mike would incorporate a tasty tofu scramble into the menu...!!
my favorite brunch in palo alto and one of the reasons I LOVE CALIFORNIA. this is a perfect californian neighborhood joint with a french accent. Here's a blog post with some food porn to show you how gorgeous their food is: http://brokedamouth.blog... my friends swear by the pancakes and i swear by the omelettes, soups and salade nicoise. better than joanie's! dinner is supposed to be romantic, but not quite as delicious. they have crayons to doodle around with. my boyfriend always draws a broccoli head guy with google eyes. scary.
Very average brunch place, not worth the price and the wait.
This is a nice little place with outdoor seating.   We came here for brunch on a sunday, about a... Read more 
They have a wonderful seasonal menu serving Cal Cuisine. I have never had a disappointing dining experience here. I agree with other reviewers... they need to brush up on their reservation skills. Nonetheless St Michael's Alley has a great charm and inviting atmosphere.
The cranberry-champagne [Codders] were nice. The challah french toast was really good, but the bleu cheese omelet was nothing to write home about. They seemed to really want to usher us out, so we were over it.
another lovely lunch date with the boo :) food is great but the best part is the outdoor seating. we went on a lovely day and had the cutest lunch outside. the best part was just having conversations with my love and drinking ice cold pellegrino and limes. our faves ;) cute place
Possibly the most excellent, boutique restaurant on the Peninsula.  Spectacular wine list (focus on local = santa cruz mountains).  Menu is composed of fresh/organic/sustainable ingredients.  A romantic locale as well.
the first time i came here i thought it was pretty good but it didn't blow my mind. my friend really liked the eggs benedict. so i gave it a second chance and went again...the second time wasn't as exciting as the first. they accidentally marked us off the list of people who were waiting so they gave our table to someone else first. boo.. good thing we already were drinking mimosas we got the EGGS FLORENTINE and ST. MIKE'S OMELET. neither of them left an impression on me. it wasn't bad, it wasn't amazing. it was good. nothing spectacular. not worth the wait or the price..
This place is like a hidden gem--just off of Univ ave, but I never hear people talking about it. It's lovely inside and the food is always excellent. Great for dates or just when you feel like having a good meal in a casual environment.
food was good. we got the eggs florentine and the pancake special (peanut butter pancakes with sliced bananas and honey drizzled on top). i still think Bette's up in Berkeley has fluffier and more flavorful pancakes. not sure if it was because i had a bite of pancakes before the eggs florentine, but i thought the eggs florentine were a tiny bit on the bland side. - they wouldn't seat me until my friend showed up. + didn't rush us into ordering nor did they rushed us out of the restaurant when we were done + nice ambiance.
Love it, love it! I've lived in the area for the last 5 years and I cannot believe I just discovered the yumminess of St. Michael's Alley. Hello, i've walked by it countless times on my way to Whole Foods and I finally made the trip for brunch. It's just a fabulous little spot for breakfast or dinner if you are craving that perfect ambience of a European style neighborhood restaurant. Today, I had the special orange ricotta pancakes topped with strawberries....simply delectable...frankly, the combination of orange flavors with berries is simply heaven! Note to the restaurant.....please include these as a staple on your regular brunch menu ALWAYS! It's also a great dinner spot for date night. My husband and i went there for dindin and we had a great dinner! The paella was delish! All in all, you will love your dining experience at this sweet spot in Palo Alto. Food is done right!
This is definitely as good as it gets in Palo Alto. While we had to wait for 30 minutes to get a table - they don't take reservations for Sunday brunch - it was well worth it. We had the St. Mike's Omelet, the Salmon Scramble and French Toast with fresh Strawberries.  All dishes were outstanding - plenty of fresh, juicy ingredients combined with great service in a charming and intimate setting. I can highly recommend this place.
We had an AMAZING brunch here a couple weeks ago!! I loved the ambiance of this restaurant - it was cozy and homey with a cafe vibe to it. I ordered the curried vegetable scramble with egg whites - it was probably the best egg scramble I've ever had. I loved how fresh tasting all the fruits and vegetables were that were served with my dish! You can see pictures of what I ate and more details here: http://pickyeaterblog.wo...
Tasty food, good service, overall great brunch experience. Had brunch here on a Sunday with a group of friends to catch up.  There were 9 of us, so we waited about 30 min for a table. Not bad for a small location and large group.  Staff were excellent, very accommodating and not at all put off by our group. Everyone enjoyed their food, mimosa and coffee.  We'll be back again soon.
Delicious brunch, though compared to the more reasonably priced but also delicious brunch places in the city, this place is really overpriced.
Delicious Californian cuisine.  I've come here both on dates and with small groups and always enjoyed the experience.  The small dining room can get noisy when crowded, as the tables are a little close, but the out-of-the-way location helps keep this place a comfortable neighborhood bistro.
One of those gems in downtown PA that most people never hear of.  It's not glamorous or fancy, but it's just great American cuisine.  I had the chicken pot pie and bread pudding.  Service was excellent.  It is the kind of place you have great conversation, good food, and a bottle of wine to reminisce and dream.  Definitely in the repoirtoire now, so if you end up here with me, it means i think you're cool.
The salmon bendicts was da bomb. The blue monkey pancakes were also to die for!! One star down for charging so much just for brunch.
We both had the bluemonkey pancakes and I also had eggs benedict! Yummmm yummm! I also ordered a latte and it was pretty finger-lickin' delicious! My husband doesn't even really like coffee and he thought it was tasty! Quick and efficient service and the line didn't take a terribly long time to get through even for a Sunday morning! Happy eating!
We LOVE this place!  Food is always a delight as the menu does change (never get tired of the food).  I'm still waiting for the chocolate bread pudding to come back as it's to die for!  Setting is quaint, cozy and classy.  Went for brunch once...not what I expected, not bad but not as good as the dinner foods...we'll stick to their dinner seating!
A very nice place, and we have had good meals there, but be aware that the rack of lamb dish has problems.  The fig and port wine sauce is so sweet that it largely masks the taste of the lamb.  Also, they served us our racks without the chops separated and we found it impossible to cut them apart with the knives they gave us. We finally asked to have the kitchen do it and then had to wait seven or eight minutes to get our plates back. They should have done it faster than that, since it had totally stopped our meal.  When we got our plates back we found the chops to be rather meager in the amount of meat on the bone, a fact it seemed was being hidden by serving the rack whole and smothered in sauce.   A disappointing dish from such a high-caliber restaurant.
This is a great and intimate place to get together for a weekend brunch.  It's located on Emerson Street, right by Whole Foods, and also has a very elegant and yuppie feel to it.  Food and service are superb.  The place is known for its omelettes and great tasting pancakes.  During the autumn season, they serve entrees including pumpkin related ingredients.  Try their pumpkin ravioli and banana pancakes.  The latter are light and fluffy and taste great with the provided maple syrup.  Hot chocolate is superb as well.  Great date place.
Had both dinner and brunch here before. I like the decor in here and the cozy restaurant feel. It's funny that you have to walk through the kitchen to get to the bathroom. Both dinner and brunch were so so. You know you're not enjoying the food that much when you start asking everyone around you if they want to try some of your entree. Would probably not come here again.
Thoroughly disliked my dinner meal of soup and pork medallions. Even the mashed potatoes were not tasty. The only thing saving this restaurant from a 2 star review is decent service.
I love a good brunch spot.  The best part about St. Michael's is the ambiance.  The food strikes me as somewhat forgettable but delicate which is nice.  It would be three stars but gets four for being so awesome as to serve brunch, lots of coffee and general prettiness.
Hidden gem of Palo Alto. I don't hear much about it but it's a small restaurant with excellent food and wine topped with great personal service. And not too spendy so it doesn't only need to be for special occasions-- any nice date or meal with friends would be great here. I'll definitely be back.
This place was great!  I made a reservation for the same day without any trouble.  When we got there, it was slightly confusing because there was not a customer in sight!  It quickly filled up in a matter of minutes.  The wait staff was great when they finally made it to our table.  They were truthful when we asked about some of their dishes and gave us great suggestions.  We didn't get too much attention during dinner, which we wouldn't have minded.  The mushroom cake was delicious!!!  Overall, the place was great and I would definitely come back again!
I really like the whole package of this restaurant. It has that rustic, cozy feeling that adds warmth and comfort. And more importantly, the food is legit. Mushroom fritter accompanied by a very tasty sauce had great texture, lacking a little mushroom flavor though. The pork tenderloin was superb, very moist and tender. Highly recommend the dining experience here if you have the budget.
We got here around 1pm for brunch and only had to wait 5-10 minutes to be seated.  It was a pretty nice day and I didn't mind spending a few minutes outside.  I enjoyed the rustic look and feel of St. Michael's Alley and they also delivered on the food.  I had a mixed greens salad with chicken and it was outstanding - the greens were fresh, the vinaigrette was light and not overpowering, the chicken was perfectly grilled.  My husband had the banana chocolate chip pancakes that were also great.  I enjoyed my food while sipping on a mimosa and was happy to see if it was actually a pretty good size.  I was a little surprised by the prices - my salad was $12 and salad with seared tuna was $16.  I understand it's an expensive location and high quality ingredients, but it is still a little pricey.  This place does deserve 4 stars for the really good food and relaxing ambiance.
Finally, I found my brunch place in the heart of downtown Palo Alto.... This small location on Emerson street has become our new brunch home.  The service was superb and the food was amazing.  I enjoyed eggs Benedict, my wife enjoyed the breakfast medley, while my kids devour a stack of pancakes.  I have to say a brunch is not a satisfying meal with out the enjoyment of a great MIMOSA...
Surprisingly, the service here was pretty quick. Visually, the food was well prepared, and tasted good. As in the previous reviews, nothing to knock your socks off, but a very decent restaurant, worthy of multiple visits.
Quaint place with good brunch. It's a little pricey but not bad for a once in a while brunch. It was a hot day so we were very warm. Outside might be a better option. I had an omelet that was pretty good. The blueberry pancakes and burgers looked tasty too!
The atmosphere is intimate mainly because the restaurant is so small. It is great for a date, but not a large crowd. The food was outstanding and the dessert selection was yummy. Try their seafood stew or roasted beet and ricotta ravioli. I would call their food creative California cuisine.
i'm surprised more people don't have dinner reviews because when i went the place was packed.  plus, about 4 couples dropped by and were turned away due to lack of space.  st. michael's alley is california comfort food served in a homey atmosphere. our food was delicious and the atmosphere reminded me of all the restaurant-in-a-home type places in austin.  i had the pork medallions with spinach and buttermilk potatoes (yum!).  my guests ate the wild mushroom risotto and the lambchops with bleu cheese mashed potatoes and broccoli.  the lambchops plate could have had more meat, but otherwise, dinner was excellent and well-balanced.  plus, the iced tea was iced-cold, refilled often and had an interesting flavor. for dessert i had the pumpkin spice cake with cinnamon ice cream.  hands down, it was the best dessert i've ever had.  the cake was fluffy, moist and had such a rich flavor.  matched with cold ice cream, it was truly heavenly. we happily looked on as a server decorated a neighboring table with stamps and confetti for a birthday - what a nice touch!  get there on time or you might get seated by the door.  on a cold day, this made quite the difference.
We had an enjoyable meal here. The scallops were by far the best dish at our table Good wine list and the banana bread pudding with the Jack Daniels ice cream was killer.
Excellent especially considering the reasonable prices. The food was just great. We got: bruschetta with goat cheese, ahi tuna poke with watermelon (get this!), zuchini tart (just alright). Main entrees were perfect. Definitely can't go wrong with the paella, lamb, or porkchops. The porkchop was huge and perfectly cooked. The paella was just right. For dessert try the bread pudding. It's perfect. The peach cobbler was amazing. The sorbets tasted like fresh fruit. I can't say enough about this place. You can't lose.
My sister and I decided to try this place for brunch based on the strength of its reviews.  I can honestly say that we are a bit baffled by the excessively wonderful reviews for the brunch.  Mind you, the service was great and the ambiance was cool (except something there kept making us sniffle!).  However, the food was just OK.  Nothing spectacular and certainly not what we'd expected based on the rave reviews.  Maybe normal lunches and dinners are better?
minus 1 star for price? but was not crowded at all on a saturday. great food great service no complaints
Was taken here by my firm for lunch. I forgot what I ordered, but I do remember it was good!
I've been here for brunch/lunch only. I liked the restaurant's cute and quaint atmosphere, but the food is not spectacular. I've had a great chicken sandwich there but was disappointed with an omelet that was too greasy. Still, it's a great place to catch up with friends on a lazy Saturday. Beware of this place during the hot summers. They only have a ceiling fan and no air conditioning!
Love the french toast here!  Great setting, great place for brunch, but get there early to avoid the rush.
I had the salad Nicoise and it was really good and beautifully plated.  The veggies were just so well picked - green beans were large, ripe, and fresh and the cherry tomatoes were so cute.  The potatoes were really well seasoned.  The tuna was fresh.  I also tried the calamari - pretty good and the wild mushroom cake - really good.  I ended with the tiramisu - which was good as well.
I ordered the salmon scramble for brunch.  It was delicious.  The atmosphere (inside and out) is great.  The service was adequate, but no one made me feel special or valued.  I was just a customer.  The food was great and I will definitely go back.
Great place for bunch; Their Eggs Florentine and mimosas made my day!
Came here for a Saturday brunch. Got there just before the mad wait for a table. They were nice enough to set up an outside table for us since we had a dog with us. We got the Eggs Benedict, St Mike's Omelet and tomato soup. The english muffin in the benedict was a bit too soggy from the sauce but otherwise it was good. The omelet was quite 3-D. By that I mean you could measure a width, length and height! Plus had fresh grapefruit juice and it was a great brunch overall.
My parents and their friends really like this place, but I think it's a little overrated.  I've only been here for dinner.  I got a pretty dull salad.  Really, it was nothing to write home about.  For my main course, I ordered this seared tuna in a nice asian broth with noodles and shredded veggies.  I only got it because nothing on the menu looked particularly appetizing.  And I didn't know it at the time, but it was exactly what I wanted.  I should probably try the brunch before I pass judgement.
St Michael's for a business lunch during the week has been my experience twice.  Each visit was about 3 months apart.  The first visit was a disappointment.  I went with my boss (who is a fan) so I figured the food would be good (she has good taste in restaurants).  But it was not up to expectations.  I had a gnocchi dish that was way too soaked in oil, and lacked flavor.  She had a salad, and seemed to pick at it. On the second visit, I sat outside with another work colleague and stuck to simplier choices.  He had the grilled chicken sandwich, and I had the grilled ham and cheese.  Mustard was dull (could use a sharper bite with those ingredients) but otherwise good.
I've eaten here once, with mixed results:  It was brunch, and we ordered a breakfast dish and a lunch dish.  The breakfast dish was wonderful, a ham and brie omlette with arrugala that really was very good.  The lunch dish was pretty bad, an oddly spiced ravioli dish that had obviously been left under a heat lamp too long.  The service was slow.   I'll probably try it again, just to see which is more normal for this place - most reviews seem positive, so I'm hoping for better next time.
I love the food, the ambiance, and the service.  St Michael's Alley is different from the usual restaurants in Palo Alto.  This is a place Jeff and I like to go when we want something nice, quiet, and intimate.  Can't wait to go again!
Three stars for dinner, four stars for their big, fluffy omelets for the weekend brunch, lovely setting and nice jazz music in the background.
This restaurant is a perennial favourite. We discovered it by chance about 5 months ago, walking past one day on the way to Whole Foods, this quaint, cute restaurant looked absolutely charming with its soft lighting, candlelight and warm, homey ambiance all round. The food is always excellent - they change their menus seasonally and there's always something exciting offered for their specials. Service is top-notch - attentive and engaging but not intrusive - combined with yummy food and a decent wine list, its hard to say no to a meal at St Michael's Alley. Your only challenge would be to choose the right seats in the restaurant to avoid smelling of food as the kitchen door is always open.
This is actually my FAVORITE restaurant in Palo Alto. That's saying a lot. The attention to detail in the decor, atmosphere, and cuisine make this restaurant wonderfully elegant without being pretentious. Their brunch is one of Palo Alto's best kept secrets, and there's almost always a line on the weekends. Stick it out! It's worth the wait! If you're adventurous, give the Blue Monkey pancakes (blueberry & banana pancakes) a try. Wonderful service, cozy atmosphere.
This place has wonderful food, great wine, very sweet servers, cozy atmosphere, and feels special without seeming overly fancy.  It is one of my favorite places in Palo Alto.  But I don't want anyone else to go there or else it'll get too crowded and popular and not be cute anymore.
This is a great place to come for brunch. It's pretty expensive, but yummy. The best thing I've had is the salmon benedict. A few of the omelets were kinda bland....they don't saute or cook any of the items before they put them in. The waffle looked delicious too. If you need a nice place to come for brunch this is a great place to come. Make sure you're whole party is there though because they won't seat you until you're all there. Also, be prepared to wait because this place can get pretty crowded on the weekends.
Barely shy of mind blowing, friendly service, bit of a wait.
This is the best breakfast/brunch spot in Palo Alto and peninsula (in my opinion). The food is just in a different league. Weekends can be crowded sometimes but bar seats are a great viable option. My favorite dish is the Eggs Florentine
With a party of 12 in a relatively small restaurant during their busy brunch period, everything was in place for a bad experience.  And yet it didn't happen.  Everyone came away from brunch loving their food, appreciating the efficient service (almost all of us got our food at the same time or within a short time), and they were nice people, too.  It was the perfect storm, mother of all....it was a very good experience. Having mooched off of others at the table I can say all of the brunch items were terrific.  When you go to a place like SMA you can appreciate how well simple dishes (French Toast or pancakes) can be done when in the hands of the right people.  The pancakes were substantial without being dense, the French toast was pefectly prepared with not too much batter and perfectly ripe strawberries.  Omlettes and other items were also great. For brunch I cannot think of a better experience I have had in recent memory.  And for a large group in a pretty small place that is pretty impressive. Yes, there is outdoor seating but only about 4-5 small tables on the small sidewalk in front of the place- so don't go there for that necessarily.
Maybe I had really high expectations based on reviews from yelp. I had pancakes, eggs, chicken apple sausage, potatoes, and fresh baked pastry. The eggs were good, and the chicken apple sausage was fine. The potatoes were a bit over-seasoned, and they got  mixed into my pancakes (which sucks, but that happens everywhere). The pancakes were just okay. Not very light and fluffy. Honestly, I could make better pancakes at home. Overall, pretty good if you want to go out for breakfast/brunch.
the food and service was average. In my opinion, its not worth the price you pay. I had the salmon scrambled for $16 which was somewhat bland. On the plus side, the server was nice and its located in a nice area. But I don't think I'll be coming back again.
Came here with the office last year (sorry, finally started yelping) for lunch.  We had high expectations due to such good buzz about the place that we expected a great meal, but sadly, ended up with a rather mediocre experience.  While I enjoyed my dish, salad nicoise with seard ahi, the rest of my party were all disappointed with their dishes.  The gnocchi was dense and not at all airy and fluffy (I took a bite and confirmed the assessment) and the two other dishes were just OK.  The person who suggested the restaurant was so apologetic about recommending the place and kept saying that it must have been the chef's day off because her brunch a few weeks back was fabulous.  That was the second meal I've had at St. Michael's (previously I came for brunch and didn't think it was so memorable then) and don't think I will give it a 3rd go.  Just not worth the expense for a hit or miss meal.
St. Michael's Alley is civilized.  Nice space, nice white tablecloths, most waiters are good, they have a good sensibility and food approach, and it's located on lovely little Emerson Street in verdant Palo Alto. St. Michael's Alley has been around since before 1983. For a while there it was a restaurant with a bar next door, but it's current state is that of a lovely, refined restaurant, with a dash of California Cuisine, a smattering of classical cooking, and wonderfully fresh ingredients. Although a brunch for three will put you back over $50, we come here often.  Mostly because we think that most of the brunch places in this area bite, to be honest.  At St. Michael's alley, you get consistent high-quality food, which is both a blessing and a relief. My child loves their "blue monkey" pancakes, which are blueberry-banana.  My husband loves their omelettes, and I love their soups, their sandwiches, and their eggs benedict. No specific notes here, except for one:  St. Michael's Alley pours the most vile tea in Palo Alto.  It's that nasty "sports tea."  Ick. Also, with regard to them being "good for kids."   Well, it depends.  If you have little brats, this isn't the place for you.  But if you have raised your child to be able to sit nicely and enjoy good food at a restaurant, even a 2 year old can have fun here.  They aren't kid UNfriendly.  Just smallish. We met some of our very good friends here because we took our kids to brunch every Sunday.  At the time, their kid was 2 and ours was about 5.  We'd sit outside and have a lovely time.
Great menu, the wait staff has been here forever and they are honest, fun and make great recommendations! The Page Mill Chard, believe it or not, is actually really nice and refreshing!
after hearing things from friends and reading the reviews on yelp, decided to give this place a try! i come here again. i live about 25 minutes away, but it is worth the drive... had the day's special (apple cinnamon pancakes with apple bits in it), mike's omelet, ham & pineapple omelet, and french toast topped with strawberries. all VERY delicious! wasn't a fan of the potatoes though. the coffee was nice and strong and the OJ was fresh! everything here is fresh and has a homemade feel to it. got there before opening on a sunday but there were a couple groups already waiting in line! comes with friends or with a family of 4!
Went there for a birthday dinner. Nice dining room, nice staff, good food. Docking a couple of stars for service. There was no-one serving at the bar, so it took ~15minutes to get a cocktail even though no-one else was waiting. We asked our waiter to put a candle in dessert and she ignored the request. She was nice though - and all of the staff were very friendly and relaxed.
I went there for a Sunday brunch.  We ordered the smoked salmon benedict and the monkey pancakes.  The smoked salmon benedict was the best I have ever had.  Next time I would pass on the monkey pancakes because of its high price.  Althouth it tasted very good,  I could get the same thing at IHOP for half the price.   We also ordered orange juice that I thought would be freshly squeezed but appeared to come out of a container.  Overall, the quality of the food is great.  The place is really well decorated.
We had Sunday brunch here with our friends today.  We waited 45 minutes for a table for seven.  There are only a couple of tables in the restaurant which can accommodate a large group like us so the wait was longer than usual. The service was adequate.  They gave us one raspberry muffin on the house to share which i thought was stingy.  (7 people to share ONE muffin?)  I had the special of the day which was scrambled egg with chicken & tomato.  The biscuit was really dry but the egg was ok.  We also share one order of whole wheat pancakes with banana topping and that was pretty good.  At the end it was $25 per person which i thought was pretty expensive for brunch.
This is one of my favorite place to enjoy a proper brunch in the peninsula.  I like how it's quietly removed from the honks and car fumes of downtown Palo Alto, giving it a tucked-away charm.  The food, however, is even better than the charm.
Brunch here never disappoints. Delicious and large portions.  Great venue  for brainstorming meetings, white paper and crayons are on the table for you to draw with.
We had a nice dinner over there. The restaurant was crowded all the time. The wine list was very interesting because it was categorized by price range with lots of nice boutique wineries.  The mahi mahi was juicy and fresh. The duck confit was the signature dish, in my opinion. The lambchop was great taste but a little bit short on the meat. The cream  brulee was beautiful but common quality. The atmosphere was warm and enjoyable for small party. Service was very attentitive. Definitely a great restaurant worth keeping me coming back.
Had a nice dinner here last night. Started with the bruschetta and some mushroom cakes; I thougt the mushroom cakes were excellent, but they were a little heavy for some of my dining companions. I had a macadamia nut-crusted mahi-mahi which was good but needed a little more of the thai curry burre blanc to give it more flavor. The mashed sweet potatos were pretty bland, the beans were perfectly cooked but also a little flavorless. One friend had the cassoulet and thought it had a bit of an odd smoky flavor. Basics: good food, sort of pricey, nice dining room ambiance. Friendly service. It's kind of funny that you have to go through the kitchen to get to the bathroom; seeing soaking dirty plates and assorted food detritus in the sinks near the bathroom wasn't really conducive to ordering dessert.
As a life long Palo Altan- this is one of my favorite restaurants that I always suggest going to. I came here for my graduation dinner, for lunch with my boss, for a last summer date. The quaint yet classy chandelier and candle-lit atmosphere always brightens my day. The rotating artwork from local artists is also a lovely. A few blocks off of university, it proves that palo alto downtown's best finds are on the side streets! Order the mushroom tart!
The pancakes were sooo good. I had the blueberry pancakes. The decor was great and they have seasonal menu selections. There was no wait at 10am on saturday. Definitely a great brunch spot.
This is one of the best brunches I've had, ranking way over Stacks or Hobbes in terms of quality of food, originality, and presentation.  It is a couple dollars pricier than either of those places, but the extra cash is definitely worth it.  It does get crowded, so even with a reservation I'd get there early. An earlier reviewer commented that they were surprised that there were only two specials of the day-- but I'd actually take this as a sign that the restaurant's chefs know what they're doing, and can probably actually make those specials well.  Quantity is definitely not necessarily an indicator of quality.
i got scrambled eggs with salmon, dill and creamcheese. it was good :) a little pricey around $13 for brunch dish. my friend got the eggs florentine and that was amazing. and their blue monkey pancakes (banana and blueberry) were amazing. i dont usually like pancakes. but these were really yummy
I would have rated it 4.5 if I could. I've only been to St. Michael's Alley for dinner. Found it while walking to another eatery in Palo Alto after parking many blocks away. At first I thought it was a little arty-gallery type place when we passed by it and I just glanced through the window. It is a small establishment, and the interior seemed inviting to me. I finally made it there for dinner with my sister and a couple of girlfriends. We had a reservation and were seated right away. There are a few beers on tap, and lots of wine options. Not a ton by the glass, but there was enough variety that I think most folks could find something that would work with their meal if they didn't want a whole bottle. The wine list is great - I enjoy reading through it each time I go and the wait staff is very helpful. Or if they don't have knowledge of a specific offering, they find someone who does. The menu is pretty straightforward - not overwhelming in the number of choices but has something to offer everyone. There are options for those looking for something more home-y and options for those looking to try something a little different. It changes with the seasons, so I recommend going on a night where you're open to being inspired by the chef's offerings. There are also specials - so make sure you listen to those or review the chalk board before getting seated! Overall, I'd say the food is always nicely prepared, presented and tastes great. Only once did I get something that was good - but seemed like something I might have been able to concoct in the kitchen at home. There usually isn't any far-out combinations like - wasabi and veal covered with cranberries... The flavors and ingredients are nicely matched with a creative twist now and again. The interior is comfortable - the noise level can be a little challenging (I think there are some weird acoustics going on) but not annoying. Overall - one of my favorite "nicer" places to go for dinner. It won't break the bank, but you'll get a great meal, with a nice bottle of wine and really wonderful service. Easily worth the 30-minute drive from where I live to go visit.
Easily one of the best brunch locales in Palo Alto, and dinner is no slouch either. The pancakes are just amazing, the scrambles are bold and well-constructed (and enormous), the service is top-notch, the wine selection is very good, and the restaurant maintains a laid-back, even humorous air while not sacrificing quality in the slightest. It's easy to spend a lot of money here, and likewise easy to not. St. Michael's Alley manages to cater to a very wide variety of tastes, budgets, and dining groups. I've seen parties of ten with two strollers beside a single old man with a book, and both tables seemed very happy. For that, the menu is quite small, and you have to be exactly in the mood for its contents, or else it might just not appeal to you. However, it's rare you won't be in the mood for it; the offerings are just that good. An understandable detraction (not shared by myself) is that the restaurant is quite small and always crowded, intending for a European setting; which means tables are quite close together. All in all, an excellent restaurant in every respect.
Overpriced. brunch. food. The brunch food tastes decent, but really your money is mostly going into the nice decor. The waiting staff is nice, but if you're sick of the Palo Alto uppity prices and borderline pretentious clientele, take a pass on this place. Incidentally, just a warning for those celebrating birthdays; they have a "caking" fee, two dollars per person at your table -- it's like a corkage fee, but instead they insist on padding your bill if you bring a cake in. If you're saying WTF? right now, you probably the same kind of person who should probably avoid this overpriced meal.
Went here for dinner on a Thursday night at 7:45 as a party of six.  The good news is that every seat in the restaurant was filled.  The bad news is that the serving staff and kitchen felt overwhelmed. Mixed reviews on the food.  I thought my BBQ Pork Chop was fine, someone else thought their Scallops were cold, another thought their Corn Risotto was good but cold and felt pre-cooked. I couldn't tell if the wait-staff's lack of professionalism was the number of customers or simply their lack of training and supervision.  Lots of waving down waiters to get water glasses filled, and there was no attempt to clear off the table before they literally tossed desert menus on top of the sticky food detritus from the main courses. Felt like a place the owner should show up in a bit more often.  It could be great.
Had dinner here yesterday. I went because the reviews were great, but I have to say I was a tad dissapointed. I had the ahi tuna app- salty and the shredded cabbage was bitter??!! This was followed by my entree - halibut. The fish was perfectly cooked, but the portion was tiny, so I munched on my girlfriends gnocchi which was unspectacular. Service was very good and the ambiance is inviting and friendly.
the chilaquiles was yummmy!  tasted better with more salsa, but that's just me.  excellent service...very busy during brunch, but worth it.
We went here for Easter brunch and the place was packed. We didn't have reservations so we ended up waiting for about 45 minutes but the service was great and the staff was very friendly and accomadating. I ordered the salmon scramble and my friend ordered the chilaquiles. My food was very tasty and the hash browns were yummy! However, my friend's eggs were bland and not very flavorful. To top the meal off, we ordered  a blueberry muffin but it wasn't as good as the waitress had made it sound- it was just an average and rather large muffin.
I've eaten here twice now, both for workday lunches.   Both times I was asked if I had a reservation (didn't) but managed to get in without a wait.  Guess I should start calling ahead.  The service is pretty good, but the food is excellent - fresh & flavorful.  I had the pumpkin ravioli, which was very saucy, but dee-lish.   Will give five stars once I've had excellent service.  (read: friendly & genuine)
Brunch on Sunday with husband. Couldn't have been more delighted with this place. Ordered the eggs Florentine; they were perfectly poached. The spinach with caramelized onions and mushrooms were cooked to perfection. The English muffins underneath, however, were soggy so I didn't eat them. Trust me, there was enough bread on the table to substitute as I used the sliced sourdough walnut bread instead. We also split their home made muffin that was really yummy. The kir royale with brunch was nice with it. Husband had the Chinese chicken salad - the way every restaurant should make it: nicely chopped veggies, perfect amount of Asian dressing with authentic crispy rice noodles. Also, the corn chowder was divine, although rich. Our server was also the host and couldn't have been more pleasant. The only reason why I'm giving 4 stars instead of 5 is the soggy English muffins and the wait for acknowledgement and even taking a drink order for a good 10 minutes after we were seated. Looking forward to trying their new place around the corner for dinner.
Saturday brunch. Ordered summer vegetable scramble and chilaquiles. Large portions, beautiful presentation, perfectly prepared. Orange juice was clearly fresh squeezed. Vegetable scramble was not overpowered by the basil pesto. Chilaquiles were devine. Our server (Nancy) was so sweet and helpful. Some of the best service in Palo Alto.
This is a really cute place. It's not that far from the main drag, but it feels like it is. Life can move a little slower, take your time, savour the food. Chat, enjoy.
Love the Wild Mushroom Cake, burger, mussels. Been there 3 times over the past year and it's been consistently good each visit. Service is hit and miss, but the food makes up for it.
Came here for brunch after the recommendations on yelp... But were hugely disappointed. Poor ingredients (canned fruits!), overworked staff, poor quality of food... How can u go wrong with granola and eggs! ... Felt like we had eaten sandpaper... Overrated and distinctly franchised operation feel to the place. Would not recommend - there are way better places for brunch at  better price.
Had a good time with friends. Way too expensive!!! Bring your credit cards. Clean inside and out. Great atmosphere. Us girls could chat and talk easily inside as it is not TOO loud. Restrooms could step it up a bit. Servers could be a bit more attentive. But, except for the higher than normal prices in Palo Alto, we will continue to come once in a Blue Moon.
Eh . . I guess it's an option for Palo Alto brunch.
The perfect place for weekend brunch or a quite dinner.  I also love the seasonal menu - very fresh and flavorful.
GREAT ! awesome food great atmosphere. Local wines ! these people got it figured out. Everything was affordable and the service was on point ! try the mimosas there terrific !
Great brunch menu and atmosphere. I tried their salmon omelette which was beautifully presented and absolutely delicious. Definitely going back one of these days when I'm awake early enough.
